CLEAN  COAL  TECHNOLOGY 

S.  HRG.  110–1200 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, 

AND INNOVATION 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

APRIL  26,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

78–880 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE,  TECHNOLOGY,  AND  INNOVATION 

JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts,  Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 26, 2007  ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Boxer  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Chaisson, Joseph M., Technical and Research Director, Clean Air Task Force  .
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Denis, Roberto R., Senior Vice President, Sierra Pacific Resources  ....................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
McRae,  Gregory  J.,  Hoyt  C.  Hottel  Professor  of  Chemical  Engineering,  De-
partment of Chemical Engineering, Massachusetts Institute of Technology  ..
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Rencheck,  Michael  W.,  Senior  Vice  President—Engineering,  Projects,  and 
...........................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Wilson,  John  M.,  Chief  Operating  Officer,  Siemens  Environmental  Systems 
and Services  ..........................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Field Services, American Electric Power 

Page 
1 
5 
46 
1 
3 
4 
50 

6 
8 
13 
15 

19 
20 

24 
26 

35 
37 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

CLEAN  COAL  TECHNOLOGY 

THURSDAY,  APRIL  26,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, AND 
INNOVATION, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:02 a.m. in room 
SR–253, Russell Senate Office Building. Hon. John F. Kerry, Chair-
man of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator  KERRY.  The  hearing  will  come  to  order.  Thank  you  all 
very  much,  welcome  to  our  witnesses,  thank  you,  folks,  for  taking 
time to come in today. 

I  know  that  we  have  some  other  colleagues  coming,  but  I  also 
have  a  conflict.  The  Finance  Committee  is  meeting  now,  and  a 
number  of  members  are  caught  up  between  them.  We’re  going  to 
just proceed ahead and we’ll see who’s here. 

Obviously,  the  subject  of  climate  change  and  emissions  is  in-
creasing  in  its  importance  to  the  country  and  to  the  world  as  the 
evidence mounts regarding the impact of greenhouse gas emissions. 
This is a subject that I’ve followed in this Committee since 1987, 
or  slightly  before,  when  Al  Gore  and  I  held  the  first  hearings  on 
global  climate  change.  Subsequently  we  wound  up  going  down  to 
Rio for the Earth Summit where the voluntary Framework was en-
tered into in 1992. 

So, it’s been a journey of 20 years or more, with a lot of evidence 

mounting and a lot of knowledge gained in the interim. 

The science is pretty clear now, when you sit down with some of 
our  top  scientists  from  Jim  Hansen  to  Ed  Miles  or  John  Holdren 
at  Harvard  or  a  bunch  of  folks.  The  feedback  that  we’re  getting 
from  the  climate,  from  Earth  itself,  is  indicating  a  much  more 
rapid,  and  much  more  consequential  rate  of  change  than  had  been 
predicted.  The  predictions  are  coming  true,  but  in  greater  degree, 
and greater intensity. 

Senator Stevens, welcome. 
So the question we face is of how to deal with this? The scientists 
are telling us we have a 10-year window within which to try to get 
it  right,  and  that  10-year  window  has  now  narrowed  in  the  sense 
that  the  consensus  of  those  scientists  was  2  years  ago.  Two  years 
ago  the  consensus  was  that  we  could  afford  a  three-degree  centi-
grade  increase  in  the  Earth’s  temperature,  before  you  get  to  the 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

2 

is  moving 

catastrophic  tipping  point,  as  they  judge  it,  and  that  was  deemed 
to be about 550 parts per million of greenhouse gases in the atmos-
phere. 

They have now revised that, based on the rapidity and size of the 
feedback that they’re getting. They now deem it to be a two-degree 
centigrade  increase  that  we  can  tolerate,  and  a  450  parts  per  mil-
lion level of greenhouse gases in the atmosphere. 

So, we face an enormous challenge, and the question that we are 
all grappling with is how to do this responsibly, minimize economic 
dislocation,  maximize  economic  output,  growth,  productivity,  and 
lead  the  world,  hopefully,  in  the  creation  of  technologies  that  we 
can sell to India, to China, less developed countries, and others. 

Obviously there’s a lot of money that’s already beginning to chase 
in  significant 
these  technologies.  Venture  capital 
amounts into green technologies. But, at the same time leading in-
dustrialists,  leading  corporate  chieftains,  are  telling  us  that  they 
want  the  Government  to  create  a  certainty  about  the  direction 
we’re  going,  and  not  to  have  a  patchwork  of,  California  doing  this, 
and  New  England  Regional  Compact  doing  that,  and  different 
states  maneuvering.  They  believe  that  it’s  important  to  have  a 
standard, and we need to wrestle with that. 

I happen to believe that’s true, I just came back from the Milken 
Conference  out  on  the  West  Coast  where  this  was  one  of  the  top 
topics  of  conversation  with  a  lot  of  Wall  Street  folks  and  a  lot  of 
business people, all of whom believe that we probably need to move 
in  that  direction  of  having  a  cap  and  trade,  some  structure,  with 
perhaps auctions, and create value and move in that direction. 

The big question within that framework is, what’s going to be the 
new  mosaic  of  American  energy  sources?  And  to  the  greatest  de-
gree,  most  of  us  would  like  to  let  the  marketplace  decide  that.  I 
don’t  think  the  Government  ought  to  pick  the  winner  or  loser  in 
that effort, but I think we should create some strong incentives for 
people to move in certain directions. 

Obviously,  coal  is  a  big  deal  to  all  of  us.  We  have  a  lot  of  it,  it’s 
abundant, it’s cheap, we know how to get it, and there’s every indi-
cator that it’s going to be a significant part of the mix. But, to meet 
the  challenge,  we’re  going  to  have  to  find  a  way  to  burn  it  clean. 
Half  of  our  electricity  is  currently  generated  from  coal.  That  coal 
currently produces approximately 1.5 billion tons of carbon dioxide 
annually. 

According  to  the  National  Energy  Technology  Laboratory  at 
DOE,  those  numbers  are  going  to  get  bigger,  and  get  bigger  fast. 
Over  150  new  coal-fired  power  plants  are  proposed  for  construc-
tion in our country alone. And China, we are told, is going to build 
one  to  two  per  week.  Over  their  lifetime,  those  plants,  the  new 
plants that come online, are going to spew an additional 30 billion 
tons of carbon dioxide into the air. 

We  have  witnesses  today  who  will  share  with  us  their  expertise 
and their views about what the prospects are as we go forward. In 
response  to  this  challenge,  today  I  am  introducing  the  Clean  Coal 
Act  of  2007  which  will  seek  to  make  certain  that  whatever  plants 
we’re going to build are going to be built with the new state-of-the- 
art  technology  that  we’re  going  to  hear  about  today  from  our  wit-
nesses. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

3 

Recently,  one  of  the  world’s  top  climate  scientists,  Jim  Hansen, 
called for an end to building new coal-fired powered plants that use 
pulverized coal, without the new technologies, because of what they 
do  with  respect  to  global  warming.  Jim  Hansen  said,  ‘‘Coal  is  the 
big  amount.  Until  we  have  that  clean  coal  power  plant,  we  should 
not be building them, it is as clear as a bell.’’ 

The  threat  of  those  challenges,  I’ve  talked  about  a  little  bit,  and 
I don’t want to go on about it. Let me just say that we look forward 
to hearing from our 5 witnesses today, Joseph Chaisson, the Direc-
tor of Research and Technology for the Clean Air Task Force, based 
in  Boston;  Roberto  Denis,  the  Senior  Vice  President  for  Sierra  Pa-
cific  Resources,  a  utility  in  the  Pacific  Northwest;  Dr.  Gregory 
McRae,  the  Bayer  Professor  of  Chemical  Engineering  at  MIT,  and 
one  of  the  authors  of  the  recent  MIT  Coal  Study;  Michael 
Rencheck, the Senior Vice President for Engineering, Projects, and 
Field Services at American Electric Power; Mr. John Wilson, Chief 
Operating  Officer  for  the  Environmental  Systems  and  Services 
Group at Siemens Corporation. 

Before  I  introduce  Senator  Stevens  and  Senator  Boxer,  let  me 
say that I have had a number of conversations in the recent weeks 
with  Lou  Hay  at  Florida  Power  and  Light,  and  with  AEP’s  CEO, 
and  AEP  is,  as  we  will  hear  today,  building  two  new  plants  with 
IGCC  technology,  in  West  Virginia  and  Ohio,  and  FPL  is  a  power-
ful  advocate  for  the  notion  that  we  need  this  cap,  as  are  other 
major  CEOs  from  the  USCAP  effort.  They  are  growing  in  number 
in terms of the companies they represent in the country. So, there’s 
a  movement  in  this  direction,  but  obviously  time  is  of  the  essence, 
and we need to grab this baton and run with it. 

Senator Stevens? 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  I 
have  a  conflict  and  will  have  to  leave  soon.  I  did  want  to  hear  the 
witnesses  if  we  could,  but  I  ask  that  my  statement  appear  in  the 
record, if you will. 

And,  I  want  to  add  to  it  that  most  people  don’t  realize  that  half 
of the coal in the United States is in Alaska. Access to it is denied 
because  of  a  provision  that  was  placed  in  Federal  law  back  in  the 
days when the projection was that we were entering into a new Ice 
Age,  and  the  decision  was  made  to  prohibit  the  production  of  coal 
in Alaska unless the original contour of the land was restored. But, 
if  you  take  out  the  coal,  you  have  to  melt  the  ice,  and  if  you  melt 
the  ice,  it  would  be  hard  to  replace  the  act  of  God  and  freeze  it 
back  so  that  you  had  the  same  elevation  and  the  same  contour,  so 
we haven’t had a new coal operation in Alaska for a long time. 

We  are,  now,  proceeding  with  the  coal  gasification  plant  at 
Nikiski in the Kenai peninsula, that will allow the company known 
as Agrium to produce fertilizer and ammonia, and also clean diesel 
fuel. It is something that, as a project, we’re all looking forward to 
see  if  it  will  work,  it  is  one  of  the  alternative  energy  technologies 
currently being partially financed by the Federal Government, and 
I really support that activity. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

4 

I do have some serious questions, however, about the role of car-
bon and CO2 in the air, and I hope that one of these days we’ll lis-
ten  to  the  scientists  from  International  Arctic  Research  Institute 
who  have  studied  this,  this  process  of  change,  now,  for  20  years, 
and they do disagree with the current concepts that are being pur-
sued  by—in  this  Nation,  and  to  a  certain  extent,  in  Britain,  and  I 
think  it’s  time  we  took  stock  of  looking  at  the  accuracy  of  some  of 
the comments that have been made in the past concerning the im-
pact of global warming on our economy and its cause. 

But, I do ask that my statement be put in the record, completely. 

Thank you. 

Senator KERRY. Without objection, it will be put in the record. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  today  on  clean  coal  tech-

nologies. 

In  the  United  States  alone,  coal-fired  power  plants  satisfy  more  than  half  of  the 
Nation’s  energy  needs  and  this  percentage  is  likely  to  increase  in  the  future.  Coal 
is  both  abundant,  inexpensive,  and  represents  one  of  our  most  important  natural 
resources. 

It  is  a  stable  commodity  and  a  key  component  in  satisfying  the  United  States’ 
growing  energy  demands.  Coal  production  is  an  important  element  to  our  national 
security. Without it, we would be increasingly reliant on unstable or unfriendly na-
tions for our energy needs. 

Most people don’t realize that half the coal in the U.S. is located in Alaska. Access 
to  it  is  denied  because  of  a  provision  that  was  placed  in  Federal  law  back  in  the 
days when the projection was that we were entering into a new ice age. The decision 
was  made  to  prohibit  the  extraction  of  coal  in  Alaska  unless  the  original  contour 
of the land was restored. But if you take out the coal you have to melt the ice, and 
if  you  melt  the  ice  it  is  hard  to  replace  the  act  of  God  and  freeze  it  back  so  you 
have  the  same  elevation  and  the  same  contours.  We  haven’t  had  a  new  coal  oper-
ation in Alaska for a long time. 

Continued  reliance  on  imported  energy  from  volatile  regions  of  the  world  is  not 
a  solution.  We  must  increase  our  domestic  production  in  order  to  remain  globally 
competitive  and  we  must  do  so  in  an  environmentally  responsible  manner.  New 
technologies  to  make  this  possible  are  on  the  horizon.  Carbon  capture  and  seques-
tration  is  just  one  of  many  processes  already  in  development.  Ground  breaking  re-
search  is  being  conducted  to  develop  new  ways  to  burn  coal  in  order  to  maximize 
energy yield and employ cleaner and more efficient processes. 

One of these processes, which we will hear about today, is called Integrated Gas-
ification Combined Cycle or IGCC. The IGCC process is a promising new technology 
which  has  the  potential  to  increase  efficiency  by  40  percent.  However,  this  process 
is  not  conducive  to  all  regions  because  of  its  limitations  on  the  type  of  coal  which 
can  be  used.  Solutions  must  be  found  that  will  accommodate  these  differences  and 
we must continue to research and develop other methods. 

In my state, Agrium Incorporated is developing coal gasification at its Nikiski fer-
tilizer  plant.  This  process  would  allow  the  plant  to  switch  from  natural  gas  to  coal 
as a chemical feedstock. This coal gasification project will allow Agrium to not only 
produce  the  fertilizer  and  ammonia  currently  in  production  but  also  clean  diesel 
fuel.  In  addition,  the  excess  energy  produced  by  this  project,  estimated  at  75 
megawatts,  could  be  injected  into  the  existing  power  grid  of  the  surrounding  com-
munity. Agrium is also evaluating carbon sequestration, which can be utilized in ex-
isting oil and gas fields to yield additional energy supplies. 

Like many of the alternative energy technologies currently in development, no one 
single solution will solve the problem of meeting energy needs in a responsible man-
ner. However, we should continue to explore the benefits clean coal can continue to 
offer  our  economy.  I  look  forward  to  hearing  our  witnesses’  testimony  and  their  re-
sponse and their insight into how we can achieve this goal. 

I do have some serious questions about the role of carbon and CO2 in the air and 
I hope that one of these days we will listen to the scientists from the International 
Arctic Research Institute who have studied this process of change for twenty years. 
They  do  disagree  with  the  current  concepts  that  are  being  pursued  in  this  Nation 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

5 

and to a certain extent in Britain. I think it is time we took stock of looking at the 
accuracy  of  some  of  the  comments  that  have  been  made  in  the  past  concerning  the 
impact of global warming on our economy and its cause. Thank you. 

Senator  KERRY.  And,  Senator,  I  would  be  delighted,  I  think 
there’s nothing more important than to get at the science, so I’d be 
happy to have those folks come in here, have a good dialogue here 
with  them  and  with  some  others  that  have  a  different  point  of 
view,  because  I  think  we  obviously  need  to  proceed  forward  intel-
ligently,  and  whatever  theories  are  out  there,  we  are  all  smart 
enough  here  to  pick  our  way  through  them.  So,  I’d  be  delighted  to 
have  those  scientists  come  in  here,  and  we’ll  try  to  set  that  up  as 
soon as we can. 

Senator Boxer? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BARBARA BOXER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM CALIFORNIA 

Senator BOXER. Mr. Chairman, thank you so very much for your 
leadership,  not  only  in  this  particular  hearing  this  morning,  but 
thank  you  for  your  leadership  in  general  on  global  warming.  We 
need  that  leadership  from  many  people  in  the  Senate  and  the 
House  and  the  Administration,  because  as  we  know,  we  face  a 
threat here that’s pretty grave. 

I’m  going  to  speak,  probably  as  long  as  Senator  Stevens  spoke, 

no longer than that. 

We  know  that  advanced  cleaner  coal  can  help  us  solve  one  of 
the—this, this great threat that is facing us. And, you know, we’ve 
had seven hearings in the Environment Committee, Senator Kerry, 
you’ve  been  part  of  a  couple  of  those.  The  most  disturbing  thing, 
of  course,  is  what  could  happen  if  we  don’t  respond  to  this,  and  I 
won’t  go  through  it—it’s  in  my  statement—but  what  was  stunning 
in  new  news,  was  that  a  scientist  testified  that  40  percent  of  the 
species on the planet could be at risk, if the worst predictions come 
true. We just can’t abide by that. 

Global  warming  puts  the  web  of  life  that  we  take  for  granted  in 
jeopardy. At current utilization rates we have more than 250 years 
worth of coal in the ground right here in the United States, we are 
the Saudi Arabia of coal. If we could figure this out, how to do this 
in  a  clean  way,  we’ll  be  way  on  our  way  to  energy  independence 
in  a  very,  I  think,  responsible  way  that  will  lead  the  way  for  the 
world. 

Right  now,  40  percent  of  our  greenhouse  gas  emissions  come 
from electricity generation. More than half of that comes from coal- 
fired  power  plants.  Plans  are  on  the  books  to  build  hundreds  of 
new  coal-fired  power  plants.  That’s  why  I  think  your  legislation, 
we’re analyzing it now, is a very important contribution to this, be-
cause  if  we  don’t  deal  with  this  we’re  going  to  keep  going  back-
ward. We can’t afford to go backward on global warming. 

So,  we  have  a  big  challenge,  but  I  think  it’s  doable.  Some  of  the 
technologies  are  commercially  available,  some  are  in  operation  at 
pilot  projects,  others  remain  in  early  research.  Some  work  on  all 
kinds of coal, others do best with only one kind of coal, so this isn’t 
a kind of a one-size-fits-all operation. 

But,  we  need  additional  research.  I’ve  been  one  to  say,  we  need 
a  Manhattan  Project  on  clean  coal.  We  need  to  get  very  strongly 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

6 

behind  that  effort,  because  all  the  countries  in  the  world,  I  think, 
are  looking  to  us.  The  Administration  keeps  saying,  ‘‘We’re  not 
going  to  get  anywhere  unless  China  and  India  get  involved,’’  we 
can’t wait. We never wait for other countries when it comes to the 
health and safety of our people, our planet, or our economy. 

So, we need to move forward. If we do solve this problem, it will 
be  exported  across  the  world,  we  will  create  jobs,  and  our  grand-
children  will  be  able  to  have  a  similar  experience  living  on  this 
planet, as we have had. 

So,  thank  you,  again,  Mr.  Chairman  for  your  leadership,  I  look 
forward  to  working  with  you  continually  as  we  solve  this  problem. 
Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you,  Senator.  I  reciprocate—you’ve  been 
terrific  over  in  the  Environment  Committee  and  you’re  moving 
ahead and we’re enjoying working together on this and we look for-
ward to continuing to cooperate. 

Folks, thank you, again, for taking time to be here, this is a very 
important topic, there’s a lot of discussion here, as you know, about 
how to do this, so we anxiously look forward to your testimony. 

Mr. Chaisson? 

STATEMENT OF JOSEPH M. CHAISSON, TECHNICAL AND 

RESEARCH DIRECTOR, CLEAN AIR TASK FORCE 

Mr. CHAISSON. Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee, 
my  name  is  Joseph  Chaisson,  I’m  the  Technical  and  Research  Di-
rector of the Clean Air Task Force, or CATF. Thank you for the op-
portunity  to  testify  this  morning  about  advanced  coal  technology 
and the environment. 

Founded in 1996, CATF is the only national environmental advo-
cacy organization with an exclusive focus on protecting the Earth’s 
atmosphere  and  human  health  from  air  pollution  and  climate 
change. 

A major CATF focus is working with state and regional environ-
mental groups, state governments and private sector project devel-
opers  to  facilitate  early  domestic  deployment  of  advanced  coal  gas-
ification technology, including carbon capture and geologic storage, 
where feasible, today. 

We’re  also  exploring  how  to  remove  barriers  to  promising  ad-

vanced coal technologies that have not yet entered the market. 

Today,  I  will  address  why  we  need  to  deploy  radically  cleaner 
coal  technology,  highlight  several  recent  advanced  coal  market  de-
velopments,  list  key  challenges  to  deploying  cleaner  coal  tech-
nologies,  and  outline  what  I  think  the  Federal  Government  could 
do to address these challenges. 

Conventional  coal  combustion  technology  is  responsible  for  some 
of the most important environmental problems on Earth, including 
air pollution that damages human health and ecosystems, land dis-
ruption,  depletion  of  water  resources,  toxic  solid  waste  production, 
and global warming. 

Despite  these  problems,  coal  will  continue  to  be  widely  used 
throughout  the  world  for  many  decades,  at  least.  Therefore,  we 
must  act  to  develop  and  commercially  deploy  much  cleaner  coal- 
using technologies, as soon as possible. 

The good news is that much commercial activity, typically too re-
cent  to  be  reflected  in  available  studies,  is  already  underway  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

7 

both  coal  gasification  power  production,  or  IGCC,  and  in  carbon 
capture and geologic storage. 

Some key highlights include, first, the emergence of Siemens and 
Mitsubishi  as  full-systems  IGCC  vendors,  offering  coal  gasifiers  as 
well  as  combustion  and  steam  turbines  in  an  integrated  package, 
with both of these gasifiers being well-suited to using low-rank sub- 
bituminous and lignite coals. 

Second,  we  have  several  next-generation  commercial  IGCC 
plants  under  development,  and  these  plants  are  driving  important 
engineering  design  work,  including  serious  exploration  of  options 
for adding carbon capture to these plants in the future. 

Third, we see innovative hybrid coal gasification projects moving 
forward  by  independent  power  project  developers  that  combine 
electricity and substitute natural gas production. These are very in-
teresting projects. 

We  also  see  several  promising  advanced  gas-fired  technologies, 
moving  into  the  process  demonstration  stage,  it  could  be  commer-
cially available within the next 2 or 3 years. 

And  finally,  projects  using  coal  gasification,  a  new  technology 
with  significant  implications,  including  the  potential  to  avoid  most 
adverse  environmental  impacts  associated  with  coal  mining,  trans-
portation and solid waste disposal, to significantly lower coal gasifi-
cation  project  costs,  and  potentially  to  triple  our  economic  coal  re-
serves. 

The  first  domestic  underground  coal  gasification  project  is  being 

developed in Wyoming by the Gas Tech Company. 

However, several serious challenges exist to deploying these very 
clean coal technologies. First, proposed IGCC projects face the very 
significant  global  run-up  in  large  energy  project  construction  costs 
that  is  impacting  and  slowing  down  most  proposed  coal  plants 
today. 

Second,  and  very  importantly,  in  the  absence  of  a  stringent  cap 
on  carbon  dioxide  emissions,  there  is  no  economic  incentive  today 
to incorporate carbon capture and geologic storage into most IGCC 
projects. 

Third,  Federal  advanced  coal  research,  development,  and  dem-
onstration  programs  lack  sufficient  scope  to  help  promptly  develop 
and deploy the technologies we need. 

And,  fourth,  and  this  is  actually  quite  important,  we  do  not  yet 
have  a  low-cost  practical  technology  for  capturing  carbon  dioxide 
from conventional coal-plant combustion flue gas, which will be es-
sential  to  substantially  reducing  CO2 emissions  from  the  existing 
global coal-powered plant fleet. 

Several  Federal  policies  could  help  overcome  these  challenges. 
First,  a  production  tax  credit,  or  some  other  form  of  equivalent  fi-
nancial  incentives  for  new  coal  power  plants  that  include  full  car-
bon capture and geologic storage. 

Second,  a  carbon  emissions  performance  standard  for  new  fossil 
power plants that would require significant carbon capture and se-
questration for all new coal-powered plants. 

Third,  an  effective  carbon  emissions  cap  and  trade  system;  and 
fourth,  to  expand  and  broaden  DOE’s  advanced  coal  research,  de-
velopment and demonstration programs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

8 

In  summary,  I  believe  the  technology  we  need  to  transition  coal 
to much more environmentally sustainable systems could be either 
deployed  or  developed  promptly,  if  effective  Federal  advanced  coal 
technology policies were implemented. 

Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  testify,  and  I  look  forward  to 

your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Chaisson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOSEPH M. CHAISSON, TECHNICAL AND RESEARCH 

DIRECTOR, CLEAN AIR TASK FORCE 

Introduction 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee, 
My name is Joseph Chaisson. I am Technical and Research Director of the Clean 
Air Task Force (CATF). Thank you for the opportunity to testify today on advanced 
coal technology and the environment. 

Founded  in  1996,  CATF  is  the  only  major  national  environmental  advocacy  orga-
nization  with  an  exclusive  focus  on  protecting  the  Earth’s  atmosphere  and  human 
health  from  air  pollution  and  climate  change.  This  singular  focus  enables  CATF  to 
field  deep  analytic  and  strategic  resources  equal  to  the  significant  and  complicated 
atmospheric challenges we face over the next fifty years. 

Over the past several years, one of CATF’s major activities has been to work with 
state and regional environmental groups, state governments and private project de-
velopers  in  several  parts  of  the  country  to  facilitate  early  domestic  deployment  of 
coal  gasification  technology—with  carbon  capture  and  geologic  sequestration  (stor-
age) where currently feasible. We have briefed numerous Congressional offices—ac-
companied  by  state  environmental  partners—about  the  promise  of  coal  gasification 
technology. Another related CATF focus has been exploring how to remove barriers 
to  promising  advanced  coal  gasification  and  carbon  capture  technologies  that  have 
not  yet  entered  the  market.  This  ‘‘hands  on’’  project  facilitation  and  market  entry 
work  provides  us  with  a  useful  perspective  on  what  is  happening  on  the  ground  in 
today’s marketplace. 

In this testimony, I will briefly restate the importance of moving forward radically 
cleaner  coal  technology  than  is  deployed  today;  highlight  current  market  develop-
ments  on  the  ground  which  the  Subcommittee  may  not  be  aware  of;  and,  finally, 
discuss  key  challenges  to  radically  cleaner  technology,  and  what  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment might do to help tackle those challenges. 
I. The Current and Projected Environmental ‘‘Footprint’’ of Coal 

Coal-fired power generation is today one of the planet’s most environmentally de-
structive activities. It is responsible for most of the Nation’s sulfur dioxide emissions 
that, even after recent regulatory reductions, will still take 15,000 lives prematurely 
in  the  U.S.  each  year  by  EPA’s  own  estimate.  It  contributes  substantially  to  nitro-
gen oxides, which add to smog, haze, and crop and ecological damage. It emits most 
of the Nation’s manmade mercury air pollution. Current coal mining practices have 
scarred  land  and  threatened  water  and  habitat.  Coal  power  generation  consumes 
and  discharges  enormous  quantities  of  water,  while  generating  nearly  100  million 
tons of toxic wastes each year, the disposal of which is not regulated by the Federal 
Government.  Finally,  coal  power  generation  is  responsible  for  nearly  40  percent  of 
the  planet’s  man-made  emissions  of  carbon  dioxide  that  contribute  to  global  warm-
ing. 

Despite  these  problems,  coal-fired  power  generation  is  likely  to  be  relied  on  for 
decades  to  come  and  is  projected  to  expand  dramatically.  World  electric  demand  is 
expected to triple by 2050, coming largely from developing countries like China and 
India.  Most  analyses  agree  that  this  underlying  demand  growth  will  substantially 
outpace even the most aggressive energy efficiency policies. Renewable energy, while 
it should and will be widely deployed, faces significant physical, environmental and 
economic challenges that will practically limit its share of total electrical supply for 
several  decades.  Natural  gas  is  relatively  expensive  and  its  reserves  are  far  more 
limited  than  coal.  Finally,  nuclear  power  faces  considerable  hurdles  of  scale,  eco-
nomics  and  environmental  opposition.  For  these  reasons  among  others,  China  is 
building  as  much  new  coal  capacity  each  year  as  the  entire  U.K.  power  grid,  and 
coal  power  generation  in  India  is  projected  to  grow  rapidly—matching  current  U.S. 
coal consumption by 2020 and China’s current coal consumption by about 2030. The 
United  States  faces  both  growing  demand  for  electricity  and  an  aging  power  plant 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

9 

fleet; coal will remain economically attractive to meet some portion of electricity de-
mand growth and to replace some existing power plants. 

Turning to climate, numerous analyses performed or commissioned by such bodies 
as  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change,  the  European  Union,  the  Na-
tional  Commission  on  Energy  Policy,  academic  institutions  such  as  Harvard,  MIT, 
and  Princeton  University  as  well  as  environmental  organizations  such  as  Friends 
of  the  Earth-U.K.  have  concluded  that,  even  with  aggressive  energy  efficiency,  re-
newable energy development and in some cases nuclear expansion, coal-fired power 
generation is likely to remain a significant part of any 2030–2050 global power sup-
ply.  Accordingly,  each  of  these  studies  has  identified  the  critical  importance  of 
transitioning coal use to technologies that minimize health-related air emissions and 
allow  for  the  removal  and  storage  of  carbon  dioxide,  and  to  begin  to  demonstrate 
and scale up those technologies on a commercial basis as soon as possible. 

In  short,  the  planet  is  unlikely  to  be  able  to  live  without  coal  for  some  time  to 
come.  But,  at  the  same  time,  the  planet,  from  an  environmental  standpoint,  can’t 
stand to live with coal as it is currently used to produce electricity. This leaves only 
one path forward: we need to change how we use it—and we need to do so as quickly 
as possible. 
II. What Is to Be Done? 

acceptable air, water, solid waste and climate impacts. 

An environmentally responsible coal policy would do the following: 
• Ban the construction of new coal combustion plants due to their inherently un-
• Rapidly  commercialize  the  use  of  integrated  coal  gasification  combined  cycle 
(IGCC)  for  electric  power  generation,  because  it  has  a  much  smaller  environ-
mental footprint for air emissions and waste than does coal combustion. 
• Rapidly  demonstrate  the  feasibility  of  large-scale  geologic  storage  of  carbon  di-
oxide  and  then  require  all  new  coal  power  plants  to  capture  and  sequester  at 
least 90 percent of their coal carbon content. 
• Demonstrate  and  deploy  advancements  such  as  underground  coal  gasification, 
that could further shrink IGCC’s environmental footprint by substantially mini-
mizing mining impacts and waste management. 
• Reform  coal  mining  practices  worldwide,  impose  effective  Federal  regulation  of 
coal plant solid waste disposal and reduce coal generation water use and associ-
ated impacts to the minimum practical levels. 
• Increase the energy efficiency of IGCC power generation to the maximum prac-
• Establish effective carbon dioxide emissions controls. 
Commercializing IGCC is of special importance. Because it is an inherently clean-
er  process—the  gas  it  produces  from  coal  must  be  free  of  most  contaminants  to 
power  a  gas  turbine—IGCC  reduces  deadly  sulfur  and  nitrogen  oxide  emissions  to 
very low levels—approaching those achievable by natural gas combined cycle power 
plants.  Gasification  is  the  only  coal  power  generation  technology  that  can  virtually 
eliminate  mercury  air  emissions  and  capture  most  of  the  coal  mercury  content  in 
a concentrated form that can potentially be sequestered from environmental release; 
IGCC is the only way we can continue to use coal to produce power without adding 
significantly  to  the  global  mercury  burden.  Total  solid  waste  from  gasification  is 
typically  half  the  volume  generated  by  conventional  coal  plants,  and  gasification 
water use is substantially lower as well. 

tical levels over time. 

Underground  coal  gasification  (UCG),  a  promising  further  advancement  in  IGCC 
would gasify the coal directly within the deep, unmineable coal seams. This process 
can  potentially  eliminate  the  environmental  impacts  of  current  coal  mining  and 
transportation practices, as well as significantly reduce the challenges of coal waste 
management. 

Finally,  IGCC  is  the  key  enabling  technology  for  capture  and  storage  of  carbon 
dioxide from coal power generation and will be essential to meeting any reasonable 
climate  stabilization  target.  While  it  is  possible  to  retrofit  a  coal  combustion  plant 
with carbon capture technology, it is expensive and inefficient to do so today, costing 
twice  as  much  for  plants  using  bituminous  coal  as  capturing  carbon  from  an  IGCC 
plant  and  reducing  plant  efficiency  by  as  much  as  40  percent.  While  development 
of more cost-effective coal-combustion carbon capture alternatives is important, cur-
rent  efforts  are  very  early  in  the  technology  development  stage,  and  it  is  unclear 
whether  and  when  cost-effectiveness  will  be  fully  demonstrated  for  this  technology. 
If  we  are  to  turn  the  world  coal  tide  to  a  near-zero  carbon  footprint  in  the  next  20 
years,  IGCC  power  generation  is  likely  to  be  the  most  availing  path  forward  based 
on current information. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

10 

III. Recent Market Developments 

The  good  news  about  cleaner  coal  power  and  carbon  capture  is  the  many  recent 
coal  gasification  market  developments,  nearly  all  of  which  are  too  new  to  be  re-
flected  in  academic  studies  and  many  of  which  are  being  conducted  by  companies 
not  well  represented  by  Washington  trade  groups  or  research  organizations.  When 
we ‘‘look out the window’’ at these market developments, we see a substantially dif-
ferent situation than is typically presented in available studies or by traditional in-
stitutions. 

Key highlights include the areas listed below. It should be noted that the coal gas-
ification  market  developments  described  below  do  not  reflect  a  complete  survey  of 
recent developments, but rather are intended to illustrate the contrast between the 
relatively  static  and  out-of-date  study  characterizations  of  coal  gasification  tech-
nology with today’s rapid pace of market development. 
Emergence of New ‘‘Full System’’ IGCC Vendors 

Prior  to  last  summer,  GE  was  the  sole  ‘‘full  systems’’  IGCC  vendor  capable  of  of-
fering all major IGCC components (that is, gasifier, combustion turbines and steam 
turbines)  in  a  single  package.  Since  that  time,  Siemens  and  Mitsubishi  have  devel-
oped  full  system  commercial  IGGC  offerings,  significantly  expanding  vendor  choice 
for  potential  IGCC  project  developers.  Siemens  emerged  as  a  full  systems  vendor 
last  summer  when  the  company  acquired  the  Future  Energy  gasifier.  NRG’s  recent 
selection of Mitsubishi as the technology supplier for their proposed domestic IGCC 
plants introduced the entry of Mitsubishi as a full systems vendor. 
Emergence of New Coal Gasifiers 

Up  until  last  summer,  there  were  only  three  serious  commercial  coal  gasifier  of-
ferings:  the  GE  (Texaco  technology),  ConocoPhillips  (E-Gas  technology)  and  Shell 
gasifiers.  These  gasifiers  have  different  characteristics  that  affect  their  suitability 
for various coal types, with Shell appearing most suited to low-rank coals (sub-bitu-
minous and lignite). These gasifiers are also estimated to vary significantly in cost. 
Nearly all IGCC studies and academic literature have been restricted to analysis of 
these gasifiers. 

Several  additional  coal  gasifiers  have  moved  into  the  marketplace  over  the  past 

year: 

• The Future Energy gasifier, developed in the former East Germany and recently 
acquired by Siemens, should be well suited to low rank coals and shows promise 
of being quite economically competitive. 
• The British Gas Lurgi (BGL) gasifier is an evolution of the Lurgi gasifiers used 
extensively  in  South  Africa  and  at  the  Dakota  Gasification  plant  in  the  U.S. 
This gasifier should also be well suited to low-rank coals. 
• The  Mitsubishi  gasifier  is  partially  oxygen  blown,  should  also  be  well  suited  to 

low-rank coals and shows promise of being quite economically competitive. 

As  all  three  of  these  gasifiers  are  well  suited  to  low-rank  coals,  they  provide  a 
much  more  competitive  set  of  market  offerings  for  projects  using  these  coals  and 
should  reduce  pre-inflation  low-rank  coal  IGCC  project  costs.  This  point  is  particu-
larly important as some critics have suggested that some conventional gasifiers are 
not  well-suited  to  low  rank  coals,  and  that  there  may  not  be  an  economic  path  for 
low-rank coal use. 
‘‘Next Generation’’ IGCC Plant Development 

At  least  four  ‘‘next-generation’’  IGCC  projects  are  moving  forward  in  the  U.S.,  in 
addition  to  the  ‘‘hybrid’’  coal  gasification  plants  described  below.  These  projects  are 
AEP’s Meigs plant in Ohio and Mountaineer plant in West Virginia, Duke Energy’s 
Edwardsport  plant  in  Indiana  and  BP’s  Carson  Refinery  Hydrogen  project  in  Cali-
fornia. 

These projects all use the most advanced available combustion turbine (for exam-
ple,  GE’s  7FB)  and  are  a  major  ‘‘scale-up’’  from  the  several  IGCC  plants  built  at 
refineries  in  Europe  about  5  years  ago.  They  are  also  much  larger  than  the  two 
early  demonstration  plants  built  in  the  U.S.  (Wabash  Station  in  Indiana  and  Polk 
Station in Florida) about a decade ago. These projects will typically have about 600 
MW  of  generating  capacity.  The  BP  Carson  project  will  use  petroleum  coke  (a  coal- 
like  refinery  waste  product)  and  will  include  90  percent  carbon  capture,  which  re-
duces  plant  output  to  about  500  MW.  The  BP  Carson  project  will  be  the  first  com-
mercial project in the U.S. to include and demonstrate ‘‘full’’ carbon capture. 

Several  additional  ‘‘next-generation’’  plants  may  also  be  moving  forward,  but  at 
a  slower  pace,  including  additional  AEP-proposed  plants  in  Kentucky  and  NRG’s 
proposed Huntley plant in New York State. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

11 

These ‘‘next generation’’ plants are important for several reasons, including lower 
inflation  adjusted  costs  and  higher  operating  efficiencies.  They  also  are  driving  sig-
nificant  detailed  engineering  design  work,  including  in  the  case  of  Duke  and  AEP, 
serious engineering analysis of options for adding carbon capture to these plants at 
some future time, and provisions that can economically be built into the initial plant 
to  facilitate  carbon  capture  retrofit.  The  good  news  is  that  this  very  significant 
amount  of  engineering  work  will  provide  much  more  detail  than  is  currently  avail-
able  on  next  generation  costs,  performance  and  carbon  capture  retrofit  feasibility. 
The  bad  news  is  that  this  information  remains  proprietary  and  is  not  yet  available 
in open literature. 
‘‘Hybrid’’ Projects 

Some  independent  IGCC  project  developers  like  the  ERORA  Group  and  Summit 
Power are developing coal gasification projects that produce both electric power and 
substitute  natural  gas,  typically  allocating  about  50  percent  of  the  project  coal 
syngas to each of these products. The ERORA group is developing projects in Illinois 
(Taylorville)  and  Kentucky  (Cash  Creek)  and  Summit  Power  is  developing  projects 
in Oregon and Texas. 

These developers are pursing ‘‘hybrid’’ projects because they have economic advan-
tages  over  next-generation  ‘‘power  only’’  IGCC  plants,  including  reduced  overall 
project cost, high availability—particularly in projects using several of the new Sie-
mens  gasifiers—and  attractive  overall  project  economics  for  power  generating  com-
panies  that  have  existing  natural  gas  power  plants  by  allowing  them  to  have  coal- 
based fuel pricing for both their new coal generation and some portion of their exist-
ing natural gas generation. 

Some  of  these  projects  are  close  to  final  permitting  and  full  financing.  Several 
projects plan to include some carbon capture and will initially use the captured car-
bon  for  enhanced  oil  recovery  (EOR).  At  least  one  project  is  exploring  full  carbon 
capture and sequestration. In many respects these projects reflect efforts by project 
developers to overcome current economic barriers to stand-alone IGCC plants. 
Advanced Coal Gasifiers 

Several  innovative  coal  gasification  technologies  are  conducting  process  dem-
onstrations and could be commercially available within the next 2 years. Two exam-
ples among several such systems being developed include Great Point Energy’s cata-
lytic  coal  gasifier  (a  technology  originally  explored  in  the  1970s)  and  Texas  Syngas’ 
molten metal bath gasifier. Both technologies can potentially be produced modularly 
in a factory and both appear to have potential to reduce gasification costs compared 
with traditional gasifier designs. 
Underground Coal Gasification 

Underground coal gasification (‘‘UCG’’) is just beginning to be recognized as a po-
tential option for utilizing coal. UCG is a gasification process conducted in deep coal 
seams.  Injection  and  production  wells  are  drilled  into  the  coal  seam  and  are  then 
linked  together.  Once  linked,  air  and/or  oxygen  is  injected  and  the  coal  is  ignited 
in  a  controlled  manner  to  produce  hot,  combustible  coal  syngas  that  is  captured  by 
the  production  wells,  brought  to  the  surface  and  cleaned  for  power  generation  and/ 
or production of liquid hydrocarbon fuels or substitute natural gas. This technology 
has been used at a minor level since the early 2000s and DOE conducted many pilot 
UCG projects in the 1970s. 

A  successful  modern  pilot  project  was  conducted  about  6  years  ago  in  Chinchilla, 
Australia  by  the  Ergo  Exergy  Technologies,  Inc.  and  the  first  modern  commercial 
UCG  electric  power  production  project  started  up  this  January  in  Mpumalanga, 
South  Africa.  I  understand  that  two  commercial  UCG  projects  producing  hydrogen 
for  chemical  plants  have  been  developed  in  China.  The  GasTech  Company  is  devel-
oping  the  first  North  American  pilot  UCG  project  in  Wyoming.  The  initial  GasTech 
project  will  be  conducted  in  the  Powder  River  basin  and  will  use  a  coal  seam  950 
feet  deep.  Current  estimates  are  that  the  pre-clean-up  syngas  will  be  produced  for 
about  $1.90/mmbtu  (as  compared  with  current  U.S.  gas  forward  prices  of  about 
$8.00/mmbtu for the next several years). 

UCG technology is potentially quite significant for several reasons: 

1.  It  can  avoid  most  of  the  adverse  environmental  impacts  associated  with  coal 
mining and transportation; 
2. It leaves coal residuals (ash and some other constituents) underground; 
3. It can potentially reduce coal gasification costs—perhaps significantly; and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

12 

4.  It  can  open  up  large  amounts  of  deep  coal  reserves  that  are  currently  not 
economic  to  mine.  Lawrence  Livermore  National  Laboratory  (LLNL)  estimates 
that UCG could potentially triple domestic economic coal reserves. 
5. Carbon capture costs may be somewhat lower than with above-ground gasifi-
cation and a significant fraction of captured carbon can potentially be stored in 
the underground gasification cavities created by a UCG project. 

Once  this  technology  emerges  from  the  pilot/demonstration  stage,  which  will  be 
necessary  to  clarify  technology  costs,  it  may  be  deployed  rapidly  if  it  proves  to  be 
more  economic  than  conventional  pulverized  coal  plants  or  advanced  above-ground 
gasification system IGCC’s. LLNL has recently produced a summary of current UCG 
knowledge that is available at https://eed.llnl.gov/co2/11.php. 
IV. A Key Technology Gap 

Developing a practical and very-low cost method of capturing carbon dioxide from 
existing power plant flue gases would be an enormous boost to global efforts to reduce 
carbon  dioxide  emissions  and  may  be  the  only  practical  opportunity  to  significantly 
reduce future carbon dioxide emissions from the rapidly developing coal power plant 
‘‘fleet’’  in  China  and  India.  Current  technologies  that  can  accomplish  this  task  are 
too  expensive  and  consume  far  too  much  energy  to  be  practical  to  apply  broadly 
throughout  the  world.  While  current  research  in  this  area  is  focused  primarily  on 
what  are  essentially  incremental  improvements  in  existing  technology  systems,  a 
‘‘break  through’’  technology  is  needed.  Potential  ‘‘high-risk/high-reward’’  break-
through  technologies,  like  structured  fluids,  have  been  identified  (in  this  case  by 
MIT  researchers)  but  there  appear  to  be  no  relevant  sources  of  Federal  support  for 
such research. 
V. Challenges to Advanced Technology Deployment 

Several problems are constraining rapid deployment of advanced coal gasification 
technologies  and  associated  carbon  capture,  including  the  recent  substantial  in-
crease in large energy project costs; the lack of an economic incentive to build IGCC 
projects  with  full  carbon  capture  today;  and  Federal  advanced  coal  research,  devel-
opment  and  deployment  programs  that  are  not  adequately  funded  or  sufficiently 
broad. 
Recent Large Energy-Project Cost Inflation 

For  several  reasons,  including  massive  infrastructure  development  in  China  and 
very  large  investments  in  Persian  Gulf  oil  and  gas  projects,  the  construction  cost 
of large energy projects has significantly increased over the past two to three years. 
In  some  cases,  this  cost  inflation  may  have  doubled  project  costs—including  some 
domestic  proposed  coal  plants.  While  it  is  not  clear  how  long  costs  will  continue  to 
rise or for how long they will remain inflated, it does not appear that this cost-infla-
tion period will be short. 

The  current  cost-inflation  environment  will  also  affect  the  economics  of  carbon 
capture  and  sequestration  for  new  coal  projects,  raising  the  estimated  costs  from 
roughly  1.5  cents/kwh  to  about  2.5  cents/kWh.  This  suggests  that  if  this  cost  envi-
ronment  prevails,  carbon  capture  will  begin  to  be  economic  at  a  carbon  emissions 
price of about $40 per ton of CO2, at least initially. 
No Economic Incentive To Build New Coal Plants With Full Carbon Capture Today 
While the technology exists to develop new coal IGCC plants with full carbon cap-
ture  and  sequestration  today,  as  is  being  demonstrated  by  BP’s  Carson  project, 
there  is  no  economic  basis  to  do  so  except  possibly  in  the  very  few  cases  (like  BP’s 
Carson  project)  where  all  captured  carbon  can  be  used  for  enhanced  oil  recovery. 
This disincentive to adding CCS to new coal plants will continue until captured and 
sequestered carbon is worth roughly $40/ton of carbon dioxide. 
Limitations  of  Federal  Advanced  Coal  Research,  Development  and  Demonstration 

Programs 

We  have  not  conducted  a  serious  review  of  the  relevant  Federal  ‘‘clean  coal’’  re-
search,  development  and  demonstration  programs,  but  we  have  observed  several 
‘‘disconnects’’ between such programs and both promising market activity and need-
ed  ‘‘breakthrough’’  technology.  We  note  that  all  EPAct  financial  support  for  new 
IGCC  projects  has  been  awarded  to  next-generation  commercial  IGCC  projects, 
which  in  nearly  all  cases  are  being  proposed  by  large  investor-owned  utilities.  In 
contrast, no innovative ‘‘hybrid’’ IGCC/SNG projects being developed by independent 
project  development  companies  were  awarded  financial  support.  We  also  note  that 
none  of  the  promising  advanced  coal  gasifiers  being  developed  that  we  are  aware 
of  are  receiving  significant  DOE  support  nor  are  these  advanced  gasifier  concepts 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

13 

listed  in  the  various  technology  evolution  ‘‘road  maps’’  developed  by  DOE  and  oth-
ers.  And  as  we  noted  above,  no  Federal  programs  exist  today  that  would  provide 
financial  support  for  new  IGCC  project  developers  seeking  to  include  full  carbon 
capture and sequestration in their projects. 

MIT’s  Future  of  Coal  Study  reviewed  current  DOE  clean  coal  research,  develop-
ment and demonstration programs and outlines one approach to expanding and bet-
ter  targeting  these  programs.  We  see  MIT’s  proposals  as  a  good  starting  point  for 
discussion, but believe they would not be sufficient to address all research, develop-
ment and demonstration gaps or ‘‘disconnects’’ we have observed. 
VI.  What  Can  the  Federal  Government  Do  to  Accelerate  Deployment  of 

Needed Technology? 

Several  Federal  actions  could  accelerate  development  and  deployment  of  the  ad-
vanced  coal  technology  needed  to  address  climate  change  and  dramatically  reduce 
coal’s environmental impacts: 

1.  Establish  a  production  tax  credit  or  some  other  form  of  equivalent  financial 
incentives for new coal power plants with full carbon capture and sequestration. 
These  incentives  would  be  in  effect  until  a  national  carbon  emissions  reduction 
program  has  been  established  that  creates  a  carbon  emissions  allowance  price 
sufficient  to  offset  carbon  capture  and  sequestration  costs.  At  current  energy 
project  prices,  such  a  production  tax  credit  would  likely  need  to  be  at  least  2.5 
cents per kWh. 
2.  Establish  a  carbon  emissions  performance  standard  at  some  future  date  for 
new  fossil  power  plants  that  would  require  significant  carbon  capture  and  se-
questration for new coal power plants. 
3. Establish effective carbon emissions controls. 
4. Significantly expand and broaden DOE’s advanced coal research development 
and demonstration programs. 

The recent MIT Future of Coal Study outlines one approach for expanding DOE’s 
advanced coal programs and suggests that such programs need to be funded at lev-
els as high as $800–$900 million per year. Beyond MIT’s recommendations, it would 
be  useful  to  review  current  research  and  market  activity  in  this  field  to  identify 
promising  technologies  that  are  slipping  through  the  cracks  in  current  DOE  pro-
grams  to  help  develop  more  effective  programs.  It  is  also  critically  important  that 
appropriate support be established for developing ‘‘breakthrough’’ technology in crit-
ical areas like practical, low cost carbon capture at existing power plants. 

In summary, I believe that the technology we need to transition coal use to much 
more  environmentally  sustainable  systems  could  be  either  deployed  or  developed 
promptly  if  effective  Federal  advanced  coal  technology  policies  were  implemented. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you, sir, we look forward to it. 
Mr. Denis? 

STATEMENT OF ROBERTO R. DENIS, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, 

SIERRA PACIFIC RESOURCES 

Mr.  DENIS.  Thank  you  very  much,  Chairman  Kerry,  Members  of 
the Committee. I’m Roberto Denis, I’m Senior Vice President of Si-
erra Pacific Resources, a holding company that serves the electrical 
needs of 1.2 million customers throughout most of Nevada. 

Our company has been taking significant steps to lessen our car-
bon  footprint,  while  at  the  same  time,  investing  in  new  tech-
nologies to meet our ever-increasing demand for energy. 

Nevada  is  a  high-growth  state.  We  have  been  adding  about 
55,000  new  customers  per  year,  at  an  annual  growth  of  5  percent, 
an envy in the industry. 

Over  the  next  several  years,  we  intend  to  invest  more  than  $1 
billion  annually  to  add  new  generating  capacity,  and  transmission 
infrastructure. 

In 1997, Nevada enacted one of the Nation’s first renewable port-
folio  standard  laws.  As  a  state  and  as  a  company,  we  are  com-
mitted  to  renewable  energy.  As  evidence  of  this  commitment,  by 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

14 

year-end,  Sierra  Pacific  Resources  will  lead  the  Nation  in  genera-
tion of solar and geothermal energy in relation to the total electric 
energy sold to consumers, even exceeding California. 

However, Sierra Pacific Resources cannot meet our future energy 
demands  solely  from  renewable  projects.  We  are  building  over 
2,800 megawatts of new, efficient natural gas generation. This will 
cause  our  company  to  become  about  75  percent  dependent  on  nat-
ural gas for the electricity that we deliver. 

Last year, we announced that we were pursuing the development 
of the Ely Energy Center, a four-unit coal-powered complex totaling 
2,500  megawatts.  The  first  two  units  will  utilize  the  newest,  com-
mercially  available,  supercritical  generation,  highly  efficient  and 
emissions  controls  technology.  These  two  units  will  be  followed  by 
two  more  Integrated  Gasification  Combined  Cycle,  or  IGCC  units, 
once those units become commercially viable. 

Ely  will  also  be  the  catalyst  for  the  development  of  wind-to-en-
ergy  in  the  mountains  of  eastern  Nevada.  Ely  will  make  a  $600 
million, 250-mile transmission line economically possible, providing 
the means for wind energy to reach consumers. 

It is also important to point out, as new generation is developed, 
Sierra  Pacific  Resources  is  decommissioning  older,  less  efficient 
coal  and  natural  gas  units,  a  move  that  mitigates  our  CO2 emis-
sions. These combined actions will ensure that even when the first 
two  coal  units  of  the  Ely  Energy  Center  are  completed,  our  com-
pany’s  carbon  footprint  will  mirror  that  of  a  utility  that  burns  100 
percent natural gas. 

We  particularly  urge  Congress  to  be  mindful  that  the  most 
knowledgeable  source  of  our  collective  ability  to  capture  and  store 
CO2,  the  Electric  Power  Research  Institute,  estimates  that  even 
with  the  most  aggressive  technology  development  actions  that  can 
be  realistically  contemplated,  we  will  not  have  the  ability  to  cap-
ture and sequester carbon on a commercial scale until 2020. Thus, 
a policy—any policy choices should recognize that our economically 
viable  generation  strategies  must  include  clean  supercritical  coal 
generation, and when viable, IGCC. 

As  recognized  in  the  recent  MIT  study,  instead  of  excluding  the 
most viable domestic energy source, we must focus on seeking tech-
nological solutions to mitigate the adverse effect of the current and 
future  use  of  coal.  In  such  regards,  we’re  working  with  EPRI  and 
25 other utilities to fund a pilot-scale demonstration project in Wis-
consin  of  a  promising  new  CO2 capture  technology  for  pulverized 
coal. While integrated gasification combined cycle technology offers 
promise  in  the  near-term,  it  has  been  shown  to  be  more  economic 
using eastern bituminous coals. 

The  use  of  IGCC  with  eestern  sub-bituminous  coals,  which  have 
different  characteristics  and  contain  higher  moisture,  has  not  yet 
been proven commercially viable, particularly at the higher altitude 
sites available in our State. 

I would like to quote Dr. Bryan Hannegan’s recent testimony be-
fore  the  Senate  Energy  and  Natural  Resources  Committee.  ‘‘EPRI 
stresses  that  no  single  advanced  coal  generating  technology  .
. 
has clear-cut economic advantages across the range of U.S. applica-
tions.  The  best  strategy  for  meeting  future  electricity  needs  while 
addressing  climate  change  concerns  and  economic  impacts  lies  in 

.

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

15 

developing multiple technologies from which power producers—and 
their  regulators—can  choose  the  best,  when  suited,  to  local  condi-
tions and preferences.’’ 

In  conclusion,  innovative  technological  advances  must  be  sup-
ported and encouraged to the maximum extent feasible. But, in the 
meantime, we should not curtail the construction of new generation 
needed  to  serve  our  customers.  Walking  away  from  coal-powered 
generation altogether would mean higher prices for consumers, and 
even a greater national reliance on energy imports. 

We  must  be  careful  to  avoid  arbitrary  efforts  to  pre-ordain  win-
ners in the race to develop new generation technologies. Our indus-
try is large, and geographically diverse, and winners must be mar-
ket-driven if we are to serve our customers well. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Denis follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROBERTO R. DENIS, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, 

SIERRA PACIFIC RESOURCES 

Introduction 

Chairman  Kerry,  Senator  Ensign,  Members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  very 
much  for  the  opportunity  to  be  with  you  today.  My  name  is  Roberto  Denis  and  I’m 
Senior Vice President of Energy Supply for Sierra Pacific Resources, a holding com-
pany  that  serves  most  of  the  electrical  energy  needs  of  Nevada.  Our  company  has 
been  taking  significant  steps  to  lessen  our  carbon  footprint  while  at  the  same  time 
meeting  the  ever  increasing  demand  for  energy  in  one  of  fastest  growing  regions  of 
the  country.  There  are  many  factors  that  make  this  an  especially  difficult  task. 
These  involve  managing  the  tradeoffs  between  renewable  energy  and  fossil  fuel 
plants, different fuel types, self generation versus market purchases, the commercial 
application  of  current  and  emerging  technologies  and  of  course,  the  cost  of  energy 
to our customers. 
Company Profile 

Sierra  Pacific  Resources  is  the  holding  company  for  two  utility  subsidiaries,  Ne-
vada  Power  Company  and  Sierra  Pacific  Power  Company  that  provide  electricity  to 
1.2 million electricity customers in Nevada and around the Lake Tahoe area of Cali-
fornia.  We  are  interconnected  to  the  western  transmission  grid  and  are  significant 
participants  in  the  western  power  markets  since  we  currently  purchase  about  half 
the energy we deliver. It is noteworthy that Nevada was a major victim of the melt-
down in the western markets several years ago when Enron and others were found 
to be illegally manipulating the power purchase market in California. 

Our state’s high growth rate is also a very important consideration. We have been 
adding  about  55,000  new  customers  per  year,  an  annual  growth  rate  of  5  percent, 
which  is  much  higher  than  the  electric  industry  as  a  whole.  Investing  to  meet  this 
growth is a constant challenge. Our company owns nine power plants with a diverse 
mix of fuels including coal and natural gas. For 10 years, Nevada has had a renew-
able portfolio standard in place and we have been contracting for geothermal, wind 
and  solar  energy  and  expect  to  be  making  direct  investments  in  renewable  energy 
projects as well for years to come. Because of our state’s rapid economic growth plus 
the  hard  lessons  learned  from  being  over  reliant  on  the  power  purchase  markets 
during  the  Enron  years,  Sierra  Pacific  Resources  is  committed  to  delivering  a  di-
verse power portfolio that protects against the volatility of fluctuating fuel costs and 
swings  in  the  purchased  power  markets.  Over  the  next  several  years  we  intend  to 
invest  more  than  $1  billion  annually  to  add  to  our  generating  capacity  and  build 
the infrastructure necessary to support the strong growth. 
Renewable Energy: An Important Source of Power 

Our  utility  in  northern  Nevada,  Sierra  Pacific  Power  Company  leads  the  Nation 
in  use  of  renewable  energy  as  a  percentage  of  total  energy  consumed.  In  1997,  Ne-
vada  enacted  one  of  the  Nation’s  first  Renewable  Portfolio  Standard  (RPS)  laws.  It 
required  all  electric  providers  in  the  state  to  acquire  renewable  electric  generation 
or  purchase  renewable  energy  credits  so  that  1  percent  of  the  energy  consumption 
of each utility was produced from renewable sources. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

16 

In 2001, the state amended the RPS law to become the country’s most aggressive 
renewable portfolio standard. The law then required that 15 percent of all electricity 
consumed in Nevada be derived from new renewables by the year 2013, with 5 per-
cent of that amount coming from solar energy. In June 2005, the Nevada legislature 
extended  the  deadlines  and  raised  the  requirements  of  the  RPS  to  20  percent  of 
sales  by  2015.  The  bill  also  allows  utilities  to  receive  credits  toward  meeting  the 
state’s RPS by investing in certain energy efficiency measures capped at one-quarter 
of  the  total  standard  in  any  particular  year.  The  law  phases  in  the  renewable  en-
ergy  commitment  over  time  as  follows:  9  percent  by  2007,  increasing  to  12  percent 
by 2009, 15 percent by 2011, 18 percent by 2013 and 20 percent by 2015. 

We  are  committed  to  renewable  energy  and  believe  that  such  investment  needs 
to  be  stimulated;  in  that  regard,  we  call  upon  Congress  to  extend  the  Investment 
Tax  Credit  (ITC)  and  the  Production  Tax  Credit  (PTC)  for  all  types  of  renewable 
energy  for  at  least  8  years  and  to  remove  the  outdated  provision  which  excludes 
utilities  from  participating  in  the  ITC  for  renewables.  This  nation  needs  the  finan-
cial  strength  of  the  Nation’s  utility  industry  if  we  are  to  substantially  attract  the 
investment of large sums of capital to renewable energy. 

This  year,  state  regulators  approved  three  new  geothermal  contracts  that  will 
bring an additional 73 megawatts of renewable energy to our customers. Two major 
Nevada  solar  projects,  including  the  largest  solar  thermal  plant  built  anywhere  in 
the  past  15  years,  will  this  year  begin  delivering  a  total  of  74  megawatts  of  power. 
Just  this  past  Monday,  I  attended  an  event  at  Nellis  Air  Force  Base  in  Las  Vegas 
celebrating  the  beginning  of  construction  for  the  largest  solar  photovoltaic  system 
ever  to  be  built  in  North  America.  I  can  assure  that  our  company,  in  cooperation 
with  our  state  leaders,  is  doing  everything  possible  to  be  at  the  forefront  of  renew-
ables development. By year end, Sierra Pacific Resources will lead the Nation in the 
generation  of  solar  and  geothermal  energy  in  relation  to  total  electric  energy  con-
sumed. 
Energy Conservation Programs 

Sierra Pacific Resources places a high priority on helping our customers conserve 
energy. It is our goal to achieve 50 percent of our energy savings from our residen-
tial customers. Our demand side management (DSM) program will result in the in-
stallation  of  2  million  compact  fluorescent  light  bulbs  each  year.  This  is  accom-
plished through a buy down subsidy we provide local retailers who sell these energy 
saving  light  bulbs.  We  perform  energy  efficiency  audits  for  our  customers  and  help 
almost  23,000  per  year  to  improve  the  efficiency  of  residential  AC  units.  We  con-
tinue  to  work  with  the  gaming  properties  to  convert  the  bright  lights  along  the  fa-
mous  Las  Vegas  strip  to  efficient  lighting.  We  have  a  program  to  improve  energy 
efficiency  of  swimming  pools  and  outdoor  water  features.  One-quarter  of  the  RPS 
goal  of  20  percent  by  2015  may  come  from  DSM  programs.  Below  is  a  projection 
of our DSM goals by company. 

Includes Both Sierra Pacific Power Company and Nevada Power Company 

Budget 
MWh Saved 
Sales MWh 
Customers 
$/Customer 
kWh Save as % of Sales 

Fossil Fueled Generation 

2007 

2008 

2009 

36,553,000 
205,220 
28,771,765 
1,127,132 
$32.43 
0.71% 

45,265,000 
242,417 
29,639,965 
1,160,946 
$38.99 
0.82% 

44,886,000 
233,750 
30,756,233 
1,195,774 
$37.53 
0.76% 

Despite years of experience coupled with one of the most aggressive renewable en-
ergy  programs  in  the  nation,  it  must  be  noted  that  Sierra  Pacific  Resources  cannot 
meet  our  future  energy  demands  solely  from  new  wind,  solar  or  geothermal.  By 
2008,  we  expect  to  be  about  75  percent  reliant  on  natural  gas  as  the  source  of  fuel 
for  the  power  we  sell.  This  dependence  is  due  to  the  addition  of  more  than  2,800 
megawatts  of  new,  efficient  combined  cycle  natural  gas  generation.  We  are  con-
cerned  however  about  the  price  stability  of  natural  gas  which  was  the  fuel  choice 
for the majority of new power plant additions during the past decade. 
Ely Energy Center 

Last  year  we  announced  that  we  were  pursuing  the  development  of  the  Ely  En-
ergy Center, a four unit coal power complex totaling 2,500 megawatt in eastern Ne-
vada. This facility will utilize the newest high efficiency, supercritical boilers, water 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

17 

saving  dry  cooling  and  the  latest  emission-control  technologies.  The  first  two,  750- 
megawatt units located near Ely, Nevada will not be completed until 2011 and 2013, 
respectively.  The  project  is  an  important  part  of  our  company’s  ongoing  strategy  to 
maintain  a  balanced  energy  portfolio  that  is  in  the  best  interests  of  the  state.  Ely 
will  also  be  the  catalyst  for  the  development  of  more  renewable  energy  resources 
(particularly  wind  energy  in  the  mountains  of  eastern  Nevada)  by  providing  trans-
mission  access  to  northern  and  southern  Nevada  via  a  proposed  250-mile  trans-
mission  line  between  our  two  companies.  This  transmission  line  that  would  not  be 
economically  justifiable  to  serve  a  stand  alone  renewable  energy  project.  Therefore, 
this  project  and  its  associated  transmission  should  provide  the  opportunity  to  de-
velop  additional  renewable  projects  that  would  not  otherwise  be  developed  in  Ne-
vada. 

It  also  is  important  to  point  out  that,  as  new  generation  is  developed,  Sierra  Pa-
cific  Resources  is  decommissioning  older,  less-efficient  coal  and  natural  gas  plants, 
a  move  that  conserves  the  use  of  natural  resources  and  mitigates  our  CO2 emis-
sions. After the Ely facility is built, we are planning to retire three aging coal units 
at the Reid Gardner Station in southern Nevada. And, with the anticipation of Ely, 
Nevada  Power  will  not  participate  in  efforts  to  restart  the  coal-fired  Mohave  power 
plant that was shuttered in 2006. These actions combined with the aggressive devel-
opment of renewables will insure that even when the first two units of the Ely En-
ergy Center are completed, our company’s carbon footprint will mirror that of a util-
ity that burns 100 percent natural gas. 
Climate Change Legislation 

As you can tell, we at Sierra Pacific Resources have not been waiting for Congress 
to impose carbon controls before we developed our own carbon mitigation and reduc-
tion  program.  In  addition  to  striving  to  meet  a  20  percent  RPS  goal  and  replacing 
our older natural gas units with highly efficient combined cycle plants and building 
new  state-of-the-art  supercritical  coal  units,  we  have  also  implemented  aggressive 
energy conservation programs. All of these measures will be needed if we are to face 
the  challenge.  Like  Sierra  Pacific  Resources,  many  other  utilities  in  the  Nation  are 
also moving to implement carbon reduction strategies. 

Should Congress eventually conclude however that these voluntary efforts are not 
sufficient;  we  would  favor  Federal  legislation  which  imposes  an  economy-wide  ap-
proach to carbon control with trading mechanisms for allowance distribution. Should 
Congress  impose  a  cap  and  trade  regime  as  is  reflected  in  most  of  the  legislation 
that  has  been  introduced,  we  believe  that  caps  must  be  applied  with  great  care  to 
avoid inequitable distribution of carbon allowances. 

As  the  fastest  growing  state  for  nineteen  of  the  past  twenty  years  and  with  ex-
pected  high  growth  anticipated  far  into  the  future,  a  simple  cap  would,  relative  to 
other  states,  severely  and  unfairly  disadvantage  Nevada’s  economy.  Additionally, 
Nevada  has  for  many  years  imported  a  large  proportion  of  its  electricity.  After  the 
serious market disaster created by the California energy crisis and with all western 
states  growing  far  faster  than  the  electric  supply  can  accommodate,  it  is  clear  that 
consideration  must  be  given  in  any  capping  mechanism  to  both  the  historic  use  of 
carbon  by  a  utility  (really  by  a  group  of  customers)  (whether  self  generated  or  not) 
and  the  growth  of  the  state’s  economy.  If  Congress  adopts  a  cap  and  trade  system, 
it  must  allocate  carbon  emission  allowances  for  growth  states  (as  was  done  for  SO2 
allowances  in  the  1990  Clean  Air  Act  Amendments)  and  for  power  purchased  and 
not just self generated. CO2 emission allowances must be distributed taking into ac-
count both historic and projected use of carbon. 
CO2 Capture and Sequestration and IGCC Technologies 

We  particularly  urge  the  Congress  to  be  mindful  that  the  most  knowledgeable 
source  about  our  collective  ability  to  capture  and  store  CO2,  the  Electric  Power  Re-
search  Institute  (EPRI),  estimates  that  even  with  the  most  aggressive  technology 
development  actions  that  can  be  realistically  contemplated,  there  will  be  no  ability 
to effectively capture and sequester carbon until at least 2020. 

Thus, any policy choices that may be made by the Congress should recognize that 
every  economically  viable  set  of  generation  strategies  to  serve  the  electric  needs  of 
the U.S. economy until then must include coal, clean supercritical coal or when via-
ble, IGCC. As recognized in the recent MIT study, instead of excluding the most via-
ble domestic energy source, we must focus on seeking technological solutions to miti-
gate any adverse effect of the current and future use of coal. 

Much has been said of the recent MIT study on the future of generation in a car-
bon constrained world. It is important to remember that the MIT study did not rec-
ommend  that  the  United  States  should  stop  building  coal-fired  generation.  Its  con-
clusion, with which we agree, was that new coal units must utilize the best commer-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

18 

cially  available  technologies  and  must  be  built  to  accommodate  retrofits  when  new 
large  scale  carbon  capture  and  sequestration  (CCS)  technologies  are  demonstrated 
feasible.  Our  new  Ely  coal  complex  will  do  just  that.  The  first  two  units  are  being 
designed  so  that  when  CCS  is  available  we  will  have  a  physical  facility  that  can 
be retrofitted to enable us to capture the CO2 and identified the land for a CO2 stor-
age  site.  Additionally,  we  are  working  with  the  Electric  Power  Research  Institute 
(EPRI)  and  25  other  utilities  to  fund  a  pilot-scale  demonstration  project  in  Wis-
consin  of  a  promising  new  CO2 capture  technology  for  pulverized  coal  units.  Amer-
ican  Electric  Power  has  already  announced  plans  for  scale-up  of  this  technology  at 
two of its coal-fired plants in West Virginia and Oklahoma. We hope we will be able 
to  deploy  these  emerging  technologies  by  the  time  the  final  two  units  of  our  Ely 
complex are scheduled to be constructed. 

While  integrated  gasification  combined  cycle  (IGCC)  offers  promise  in  the  near 
term,  it  has  been  shown  to  be  more  economic  using  eastern  bituminous  coals.  The 
use  of  IGCC  with  western  subbituminous  coals  which  have  different  characteristics 
and  contain  higher  moisture  has  not  yet  been  proven  commercially  viable.  Quoting 
from recent testimony given by EPRI’s Mr. Stuart Dalton: 

‘‘The  COE  cost  premiums  . . .  vary  in  real-world  applications,  depending  on 
available  coals  and  their  physical-chemical  properties,  desired  plant  size,  the 
CO2 capture  process  and  its  degree  of  integration  with  other  plant  processes, 
plant  elevation,  the  value  of  plant  co-products,  and  other  factors.  Nonetheless, 
IGCC  with  CO2 capture  generally  shows  an  economic  advantage  in  studies 
based  on  low-moisture  bituminous  coals.  For  coals  with  high  moisture  and  low 
heating  value,  such  as  subbituminous  and  lignite  coals,  a  recent  EPRI  study 
shows PC with CO2 capture being competitive with or having an advantage over 
IGCC.’’ 1 

The Pin˜ on Pine Clean Coal Technology Project 

Indeed,  Sierra  Pacific  has  a  history  with  gasification  of  coal.  In  1992,  near  Reno, 
we partnered with U.S. Department of Energy in one of the few western Clean Coal 
Technology Projects. The Pin˜ on Pine Project attempted to extract synthetic gas from 
coal  under  pressure  and  burn  the  synthetic  gas  stream  in  gas  fired  turbines.  Be-
cause  of  significant  challenges,  the  Pin˜ on  Pine  Project  was  not  completed  until  late 
2001  and  at  a  cost  of  $335  million.  It  was  never  able  to  operate  commercially  be-
cause  of  problems  we  encountered  with  the  first-of-a-kind  technologies  used  in  the 
plant. Ultimately, the plant was abandoned and converted to a pure natural gas fa-
cility. Our company ventured and lost millions of dollars on this experiment. 

I would like to quote from Dr. Bryan Hannegan’s recent restimony before the Sen-
ate Energy and Natural Resources Committee given on March 22, 2007. In express-
ing EPRI’s view on the MIT report he said: 

‘‘EPRI stresses that no single advanced coal generating technology (or any gen-
erating  technology)  has  clear-cut  economic  advantages  across  the  range  of  U.S. 
applications.  The  best  strategy  for  meeting  future  electricity  needs  while  ad-
dressing  climate  change  concerns  and  economic  impact  lies  in  developing  mul-
tiple technologies from which power producers (and their regulators) can choose 
the one best suited to local conditions and preferences.’’ 

I would also like to submit with my testimony a copy of the EPRI report entitled 
‘‘Technologies for a Carbon Constrained World’’ that was first released to the public 
in February 2007. 

[This information is being retained in Committee files.] 

Conclusion 

Clearly, innovative technological advances must be supported and encouraged and 
successful outcomes must be embraced, but in the meantime we should not stop the 
development  of  new  generation  needed  to  serve  customers  today  and  in  the  imme-
diate  future.  Walking  away  from  coal-powered  generation  altogether  would  mean 
higher  prices  for  consumers  and  an  even  greater  national  reliance  on  energy  im-
ports. Our nation’s energy independence must include the use of coal, our most plen-
tiful energy resource, in the production of new, environmentally responsible electric 
generation.  We  must  be  careful  to  avoid  arbitrary  efforts  to  pre-ordain  winners  in 
the race to develop new generation technologies. Ours is a large and geographically 
diverse industry and winners must be market driven if we are to best serve our cus-
tomers.  We  believe  this  is  an  appropriate  and  responsible  approach  to  addressing 

1 EPRI  House  Testimony  Carbon  Capture  and  Sequestration,  March  6,  2007  (Subcommittee 

on Energy and Air Quality). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

19 

environmental  concerns  while  keeping  our  commitment  to  deliver  reliable  power  to 
our customers. Thank you. 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much, Mr. Denis. 
Dr. McRae? 

STATEMENT  OF  GREGORY  J.  MCRAE,  HOYT  C.  HOTTEL 
PROFESSOR OF CHEMICAL ENGINEERING, DEPARTMENT OF 
CHEMICAL  ENGINEERING  MASSACHUSETTS  INSTITUTE  OF 
TECHNOLOGY 
Dr.  MCRAE.  Senator  Kerry  and  members  of  the  Committee, 
thank  you  very  much  for  this  opportunity  to  address  you  on  this 
important topic. 

My name is Greg McRae, I am a Professor of Chemical Engineer-
ing at MIT, and I’m one of the co-authors of the recent MIT report 
on  the  future  of  coal,  where  we  set  out  to  address  what  are  the 
issues about how we might burn this fuel in an environmentally re-
sponsible way. 

Our study involved many colleagues from across MIT, as well as 
advisory groups from outside of MIT, in fact, our first panelist Joe 
Chaisson was, in fact, a member of one of our advisory committees. 
The  key  premise  that  drove  our  report  was,  in  fact,  the  need  to 
think  about  global  climate,  and  warming,  and  the  need  to  think 
about—by  mid-century—that  we’re  going  to  have  to  sequester  sev-
eral  gigatons  of  carbon,  or  carbon  dioxide.  The  size  of  the  problem 
is  enormous,  and  one  of  the  things  that  we  were  interested  in  is 
how  do  we  actually  go  about  developing  a  strategy  for  coping  with 
these problems. 

A  key  conclusion,  and  you  touched  on  it  in  your  introduction,  is 
that  coal  is  an  important  part  of  this  problem.  And  while  we  fully 
support  and  are  actively  involved  in  a  lot  of  developments  associ-
ated  with  solar  and  wind  and  biomass  conversion,  the  key  issue  is 
that in order to meet our energy demands today, in fact, there are 
very few other fuel sources that we can supply at scale, other than 
coal. And so the key question is, how do we use this important fuel 
in an environmentally friendly way? 

And so, we believe that there are two crucial issues that need to 
be  addressed  in  order  to  use  coal  as  a  fuel  in  the  future.  The  first 
is  the  issue  of  sequestration.  Our  belief  is  that  there’s  a  critical 
need for demonstration projects at scale to show that you can safe-
ty store and capture CO2 in a way that imposes no risk to the com-
munity.  We  believe  that  most  of  the  technology  that’s  available  to 
do this exists already, what’s missing is the opportunity to do it at 
scale. 

And just to give you a sense of the size of the problem, a typical 
500  megawatt  coal-fired  power  plant  will  produce  about  ten  to 
twelve thousand tons a day of carbon dioxide, that’s roughly 4 mil-
lion tons a year. There are about, roughly, 500 power plants of this 
size  in  the  United  States.  The  biggest  sequestration  experiment 
that’s  going  on  right  now  is  less  than  1  million  tons  a  year.  And 
so,  in  order  to  be  able  to  develop  the  regulatory  framework,  the 
monitoring framework, and to build public confidence that you can 
safely  mitigate  and  store  carbon,  we  believe  that  it’s  crucial  that 
we  immediately  start  to  look  at  three  or  four  demonstration 
projects at scale, in the order of a million tons per year. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

20 

We  view  this  as  an  important  investment—almost  as  an  insur-
ance  policy—because  this  provides  us  with  the  information  and 
data  that  we  will  need  to  build  these  systems  at  scale  over  the 
longer time period. 

The second part associated with sequestration is the issue of cap-
ture  of  CO2 in  the  first  place.  And  again,  while  we  believe  that 
many  of  the  existing  technology  exists  to  be  able  to  do  that,  and 
there  are  exciting  developments  taking  place  on  a  daily  basis, 
again, we believe that these should be done at scale. We do not be-
lieve that focusing on IGCC per se is the right way to go. 

We,  in  fact,  think  that  we  need  to  look  at  a  spectrum  of  tech-
nologies  from  pressurized  oxified  combustion  processes,  chemical 
looping  combustion  systems—there  are  many,  many  other  tech-
nologies that are potentially out there that could significantly lower 
the cost of CO2 capture, but the issue is how to do it at scale. And, 
we  believe  that,  again,  that  you  need  demonstration  projects  to 
show that you can, in fact, capture CO2 at that scale. 

The  third  point  is  that  we  basically  need  to  put  the  two  pieces 
of the problem together—how do you actually capture CO2 at scale, 
and how do you sequester it at scale? And, again, our belief is that 
the demonstration project should be supported with adequate moni-
toring,  so  that  the  data  that’s  going  to  be  available  to  help,  builds 
public  confidence  that  this  is  a  viable  option  for  mitigating  carbon 
in the future. 

We  believe  that  there  are  many  opportunities  for  the  United 
States to become leaders in the supply of this important technology 
to  the  rest  of  the  world.  These,  and  many  other,  topics  are  dis-
cussed  in  our  report,  and  I  thank  you  very  much  for  the  oppor-
tunity to discuss these this morning. Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. McRae follows:] 

OF

CHEMICAL

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GREGORY J.  MCRAE,  HOYT C.  HOTTEL PROFESSOR OF 
ENGINEERING, 

ENGINEERING,  DEPARTMENT
CHEMICAL
MASSACHUSETTS INSTITUTE OF TECHNOLOGY 
Senator  Kerry  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  good  morning  and  thank  you  for 
the opportunity to address you on this important topic. My name is Gregory McRae 
and  I  am  a  professor  of  chemical  engineering  at  the  Massachusetts  Institute  of 
Technology.  In  addition  to  my  research  and  teaching  on  energy  and  environmental 
issues  I  am  also  one  of  the  co-authors  of  the  recent  MIT  Report  called  the  Future 
of  Coal—Options  for  a  Carbon  Constrained  World.1 This  study  involved  eleven  col-
leagues  from  various  disciplines  at  MIT  as  well  as  an  external  advisory  group  that 
represented diverse perspectives on the problem. This morning I would like to draw 
your attention to a few of the key recommendations from the report related to clean 
coal technology. 

Four key premises drove our study: 

1.  There  is  a  pressing  need  to  address  the  global  warming  problem.  The  risks 
are real and the United States and other governments should take action to re-
strict  the  emissions  of  carbon  dioxide  (CO2)  and  other  greenhouse  gases 
(GHG).1,2 
2.  Our  second  and  equally  important  premise  is  that  coal  will  continue  to  play 
a  large  and  indispensable  role  in  a  greenhouse  gas  constrained  world  because 
it  is  cheap,  abundant,  and  in  the  short  term  one  of  the  fuel  sources  that  can 
meet, at scale, the growing demands for electricity. 
3.  We  believe  that  CO2 capture  and  sequestration  (CCS)  are  the  critical  ena-
bling  technologies  that  would  significantly  reduce  CO2 emissions  associated 
with coal combustion. Much of the needed technology exists (CO2 capture, trans-
port and storage) but there is a critical need for several large scale demonstra-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

21 

tion projects to give policymakers and the public confidence that a practical car-
bon mitigation control option exits. 
4.  A  key  conclusion  based  on  experience  in  other  RD&D  programs  is  that  the 
government  should  not  pick  a  ‘‘technology  winner’’  per  se,  but  rather  create  an 
environment  that  will  enable  the  development  of  a  diverse  range  of  cost  effec-
tive options to reduce green house gas emissions. 

These  and  other  issues  are  discussed  in  much  more  detail  in.1 In  this  morning’s 
testimony  I  will  focus  on  two  key  technical  recommendations  related  to  the  future 
use of coal. 
The Driving Force for Change 

The  risk  of  adverse  climate  change  from  global  warming  is  serious  forced  in  part 
by growing greenhouse gas emissions. While projections vary, there is now wide ac-
ceptance among the scientific community that global warming is occurring, that the 
human  contribution  is  important,  and  that  the  effects  may  impose  significant  costs 
on  the  world  economy.  As  a  result,  governments  are  likely  to  adopt  carbon  mitiga-
tion  policies  that  will  restrict  CO2 emissions;  many  developed  countries  have  taken 
the  first  steps  in  this  direction.  For  such  carbon  control  policies  to  work  efficiently, 
national  economies  will  need  to  have  many  options  available  for  reducing  green-
house  gas  emissions.  The  Future  of  Coal 1 addresses  one  option,  the  continuing  use 
of coal with reduced CO2 emissions. 

Coal  is  an  especially  crucial  fuel  in  this  uncertain  world  of  future  constraint  on 
CO2 emissions.  Because  coal  is  abundant  and  relatively  cheap  ($1–$2  per  million 
Btu,  compared  to  $6–$12  per  million  Btu  for  natural  gas  and  oil)—it  is  often  the 
fuel  of  choice  for  electricity  generation,  and  perhaps  for  extensive  synthetic  liquids 
production  in  the  future  in  many  parts  of  the  world.  Its  low  cost  and  wide  avail-
ability make it especially attractive in major developing economies for meeting their 
pressing energy needs. On the other hand, coal faces significant environmental chal-
lenges in mining, air pollution (including both criteria pollutants and mercury) and 
importantly, emissions of carbon dioxide (CO2). Indeed coal is the largest contributor 
to  global  CO2 emissions  from  energy  use  (41  percent),  and  its  share  is  projected  to 
increase. 

The  U.S.  has  27  percent  of  the  total  global  recoverable  coal  reserves,  enough  for 
about 250 years at current consumption. Over 50 percent of U.S. electricity was gen-
erated  from  coal  last  year.  It  is  important  to  understand  the  magnitude  of  CO2 
emissions  associated  with  power  generation.  A  single  1,000  MWe coal-based  power 
plant  emits  between  5  and  8  million  tonnes  of  CO2 per  year.  A  few  statistics  give 
a sense of the enormity of the challenge.4 

• There  are  the  equivalent  of  more  than  five  hundred  500  megawatt,  coal-fired 

power plants in the United States with an average age of 35 years. 

• China  is  currently  constructing  the  equivalent  of  two  500  megawatt,  coal-fired 
power  plants  per  week,  a  capacity  comparable  to  the  entire  U.K.  power  grid 
each year. 

• At present the largest sequestration project is injecting one million tons/year of 
carbon dioxide (CO2) from the Sleipner gas field into a saline aquifer under the 
North Sea. 

By  mid-century,  given  the  expectation  that  coal  use  will  grow  substantially,  the 
annual sequestration of several gigatonnes of carbon dioxide is the scale needed for 
a  major  impact  on  climate  change  mitigation,.  This  translates  into  sequestration  of 
the CO2 emissions from many hundreds of utility scale plants worldwide. Each plant 
will  need  to  capture  millions  of  metric  tonnes  of  CO2 each  year.  Over  a  fifty-year 
lifetime,  one  such  plant  would  inject  about  a  billion  barrels  of  compressed  CO2 for 
sequestration 5,6 
Recommendation 1—Large Scale Demonstration of Carbon Dioxide Capture 

and Storage (CCS) 

Carbon dioxide capture and sequestration (CCS) is the critical enabling technology 
that would reduce CO2 emissions significantly, while also allowing coal to meet the 
world’s pressing energy needs. What is needed is a successful large-scale demonstra-
tion  of  the  technical,  economic,  and  environmental  performance  of  the  technologies 
that make up all of the major components of a large-scale integrated CCS system— 
capture, transportation, and storage. 

We have confidence that megatonne scale injection at multiple well-characterized 
sites  can  start  safely  now,  but  an  extensive  program  is  needed  to  establish  public 
confidence  in  the  practical  operation  of  large  scale  sequestration  facilities  over  ex-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

22 

tended periods, and to demonstrate the technical and economic characteristics of the 
sequestration activity.1,6 

An  important  additional  objective  of  the  demonstration  program  is  to  create  an 
explicit  and  rigorous  regulatory  process  that  gives  the  public  and  political  leaders 
confidence  in  effective  implementation  of  very  large  scale  sequestration.  A  regu-
latory framework needs to be defined for sequestration projects, including site selec-
tion, injection operation, and eventual transfer of custody to public authorities after 
a period of successful operation. 

Present  government  and  private  sector  sequestration  projects  are  inadequate  to 
demonstrate  the  practical  implementation  of  large  scale  sequestration  on  a  timely 
basis. 

Thus,  we  believe  that  the  highest  priority  should  be  given  to  a  program  that  for 
demonstrating CO2 sequestration at megatonne scale in several geologies, following 
‘‘bottom-up’’  site  characterization.  For  the  United  States,  this  means  about  three 
megatonne/year  projects  with  appropriate  modeling,  monitoring  and  verification 
(MMV),  focusing  on  deep  saline  aquifers.  Each  demonstration  project  should  last 
about  eight  to  10  years.  We  estimate  the  cost  for  the  total  program  to  be  about 
$500M  over  a  decade,  not  including  the  cost  of  CO2 acquisition.  The  CO2 costs  are 
likely  to  be  considerable  and  highly  variable  depending  on  the  acquisition  strategy 
(natural reservoirs, capture from existing plants, supply from large scale demonstra-
tions of new coal combustion and conversion plants).1,6 

We  estimate  that  for  new  plant  construction,  a  CO2 emission  price  of  approxi-
mately  $30/tonne  (about  $110/tonne  C)  would  make  CCS  cost  competitive  with  coal 
combustion and conversion systems without CCS. This would be sufficient to off set 
the  cost  of  CO2 capture  and  pressurization  (about  $25/tonne)  and  CO2 transpor-
tation and storage (about $5/tonne). This estimate of CCS cost is uncertain; it might 
be larger and with new technology, perhaps smaller. 

The  pace  of  deployment  of  coal-fired  power  plants  with  CCS  depends  both  on  the 
timing and level of CO2 emission prices and on the technical readiness and success-
ful commercial demonstration of CCS technologies. The timing and the level of CO2 
emission  prices  is  uncertain.  However,  there  should  be  no  delay  in  undertaking  a 
program  that  would  establish  the  option  to  utilize  CCS  at  large  scale  in  response 
to  a  carbon  emission  control  policy  that  would  make  CCS  technology  economic.  Se-
questration rates of one to two gigatonnes of carbon (nearly four to eight gigatonnes 
of CO2) per year by mid-century will enable appreciably enhanced coal use and sig-
nificantly reduced CO2 emissions. 

In  addition  to  the  value  of  the  scientific  and  engineering  data  that  will  emerge 
from  this  sequestration  demonstration  program,  we  should  not  underestimate  the 
value  of  demonstrating  the  ability  to  successfully  manage  the  program  over  an  ex-
tended  time.  Such  practical  implementation  experience  will  be  important  for  public 
confidence in committing to very large sequestration over many decades. 

Our highest priority recommendation is that as soon as possible the Congress, the 
Department  of  Energy,  and  other  private  and  public  sector  entities  work  to  launch 
a sequestration demonstration program with the characteristics identified above, in-
cluding  those  associated  with  development  of  the  regulatory  system.  A  sense  of  ur-
gency has been absent and this needs to change. 
Recommendation 2—Avoid Picking ‘‘Technology Winners’’ 

Our  second  recommendation  is  for  the  U.S.  Government  to  provide  incentives  to 
several  alternative  coal  combustion  and  conversion  technologies  that  employ  CCS. 
At  present,  integrated  gasification  combined  cycle  (IGCC)  is  the  leading  candidate 
for electricity production with CO2 capture because it is estimated to have lower cost 
than  pulverized  coal  with  capture.  For  lower  rank  coals  this  choice  may  not  be  so 
clear,  particularly  as  the  traditional  CO2 capture  technology  continues  to  improve. 
Thus,  it  is  too  early  to  declare  IGCC  the  winner  for  all  situations  at  this  time.1,5 
History  teaches  us  that  one  single  technology  is  almost  never  the  winner  in  every 
situation.  However,  neither  IGCC  nor  other  coal  technologies  have  been  dem-
onstrated  with  CCS  at  large  scale.  CO2 capture  will  add  significantly  to  the  Cost 
of Electricity (COE), independent of which approach is taken. 

It  is  critical  that  the  government  RD&D  program  not  pick  a  technology  ‘‘winner’’ 
especially  at  a  time  when  there  is  great  coal  combustion  and  conversion  develop-
ment activity underway in the private sector in both the United States and abroad. 
Approaches  with  capture  other  than  IGCC  could  prove  as  attractive  with  further 
technology development for example, oxygen-fired pulverized coal combustion, espe-
cially  with  lower  quality  coals.  Of  course,  there  will  be  improvements  in  IGCC  as 
well. R&D is needed on sub-systems, for example on improved CO2 separation tech-
niques for both oxygen and air driven power systems and for oxygen separation from 
air. The technology program would benefit from an extensive modeling and simula-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

23 

tion  effort  in  order  to  compare  alternative  technologies  and  integrated  systems  as 
well  as  to  guide  development.  Novel  separation  schemes  such  as  chemical  looping 
should continue to be pursued at the process development unit (PDU) scale. The re-
ality  is  that  the  diversity  of  coal  type,  e.g.,  heat,  sulfur,  water,  and  ash  content, 
imply  different  operating  conditions  for  any  application  and  multiple  technologies 
will likely be deployed. 

The U.S. Department of Energy (DOE) program needs considerable strengthening 
and diversification in looking at a range of basic enabling technologies that can have 
major  impact  in  the  years  ahead,  particularly  in  lowering  the  cost  of  coal  use  in  a 
carbon-constrained world. This work needs to be done at laboratory or process devel-
opment unit scale, not as part of large integrated system demonstrations. A signifi-
cant increase in the DOE coal RD&D program is called for, as well as some restruc-
turing. 

Government assistance is needed for a portfolio of coal combustion and conversion 
demonstration  projects  with  CO2 capture—IGCC,  oxyfuel  retrofits,  new  combustion 
technologies, coal to synthetic natural gas, chemicals and fuels are examples. Given 
the  technical  uncertainty  and  the  current  absence  of  a  carbon  dioxide  emissions 
charge,  there  is  no  economic  incentive  for  private  firms  to  undertake  such  projects 
at  any  appreciable  scale.  The  DOE  coal  program  is  not  on  a  path  to  address  our 
priority  recommendations  namely—enabling  technology,  sequestration  demonstra-
tions,  coal  combustion  and  conversion  demonstrations  with  capture.  The  level  of 
funding  falls  far  short  of  what  is  required  and  perhaps  as  a  result  the  program  is 
imbalanced. 

The flagship project FutureGen is consistent with our priority recommendation to 
initiate integrated demonstration projects at scale. However, we are concerned that 
the  project  needs  more  clarity  in  its  objectives.  Specifically,  a  project  of  this  scale 
and complex system integration should be viewed as a demonstration of commercial 
viability at a future time when a meaningful carbon policy is in place. Its principal 
call  on  taxpayer  dollars  is  to  provide  information  on  such  commercial  viability  to 
multiple constituencies, including the investment community. To provide high fidel-
ity  information,  it  needs  to  have  freedom  to  operate  in  a  commercial  environment. 
We believe that the Congress should work with the Administration to clarify that 
the project objectives are commercial demonstration, not research, and reach an un-
derstanding on cost-sharing that is grounded in project realities and not in arbitrary 
historical  formulas.  In  thinking  about  a  broader  set  of  coal  technology  demonstra-
tions,  including  the  acquisition  of  the  CO2 needed  for  the  sequestration  demonstra-
tion projects, we suggest that a new quasi-government corporation should be consid-
ered. 

The  2005  Energy  Policy  Act  contains  provisions  that  authorize  Federal  Govern-
ment  assistance  for  coal  plants  containing  advanced  technology  projects  with  or 
without CCS. We believe this assistance should be directed only to plants with CCS, 
both new plants and retrofit applications on existing plants. 
Recommendation 3—Regulatory Action 

Success  at  capping  CO2 emissions  ultimately  depends  upon  adherence  to  CO2 
mitigation  policies  by  large  developed  and  developing  economies.  We  see  little 
progress  to  moving  toward  the  necessary  international  arrangements.  Although  the 
European Union has implemented a cap-and-trade program covering approximately 
half of its CO2 emissions, the United States has not yet adopted mandatory policies 
at  the  Federal  level.  U.S.  leadership  in  emissions  reduction  is  a  likely  prerequisite 
to substantial action by emerging economies. Recent developments in the American 
business sector and in Congress are encouraging. 

A  more  aggressive  U.S.  policy  appears  in  line  with  developing  public  attitudes. 
Our study has polled the American public, following a similar poll conducted for the 
earlier  MIT  study  on  nuclear  power.  Americans  now  rank  global  warming  as  the 
number  one  environmental  problem  facing  the  country,  and  seventy  percent  of  the 
American public think that the U.S. Government needs to do more to reduce green-
house gas emissions. Willingness to pay to solve this problem has grown 50 percent 
over the past 3 years. 
Conclusion 

In conclusion the central message of the MIT study on the Future of Coal is that 
demonstration  of  technical,  economic,  and  institutional  features  of  carbon  capture 
and  sequestration  at  commercial  scale  coal  combustion  and  conversion  plants,  will 
(1)  give  policymakers  and  the  public  confidence  that  a  practical  carbon  mitigation 
control option exists, (2) shorten the deployment time and reduce the cost for carbon 
capture  and  sequestration  should  a  carbon  emission  control  policy  be  adopted,  and 
(3) maintain opportunities for the lowest cost and most widely available energy form 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

24 

to be used to meet the world’s pressing energy needs in an environmentally accept-
able manner. 

Mr. Chairman, thank you again for inviting my testimony on this important topic. 

References 

1.  The  Future  of  Coal—Options  for  a  Carbon  Constrained  World,  Massachusetts 
Institute  of  technology,  2007.  (See  the  website  http://web.mit.edu/coal  for  the  re-
port and the executive summary). 

2.  Ernest  J.  Moniz  and  John  M.  Deutch,  Hearing  on  the  MIT  Interdisciplinary 
Study:  The  Future  of  Coal,  Options  for  a  Carbon-Constrained  World,  Comments 
made  to  the  Senate  Committee  on  Energy  and  Natural  Resources,  22  March  2007, 
Washington, D.C. 

3.  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change,  Climate  Change  2007:  The  phys-

ical science basis, Summary for Policy makers, http://www.ipcc.ch/. 

4. A few statistics from 1 that illustrate the scale of the problem. 
• 50 percent of the electricity generated in the U.S. is from coal. 
• Today fossil sources account for 80 percent of energy demand: Coal (25 percent), 
natural  gas  (21  percent),  petroleum  (34  percent),  nuclear  (6.5  percent),  hydro 
(2.2  percent),  and  biomass  and  waste  (11  percent).  Only  0.4  percent  of  global 
energy demand is met by geothermal, solar and wind. 

power plants in the United States with an average age of 35 years. 

• There  are  the  equivalent  of  more  than  five  hundred,  500  megawatt,  coal-fired 
• China  is  currently  constructing  the  equivalent  of  two,  500  megawatt,  coal-fired 
power plants per week and a capacity comparable to the entire U.K. power grid 
each year. 
• One  500  megawatt  coal-fired  power  plant  produces  approximately  3  million 
• The  United  States  produces  about  1.5  billion  tons  per  year  of  CO2 from  coal- 
• At present the largest sequestration project is injecting one million tons/year of 
carbon dioxide (CO2) from the Sleipner gas field into a saline aquifer under the 
North Sea. 

tons/year of carbon dioxide (CO2). 

burning power plants. 

5. James R. Katzer, Coal-Based Power Generation with CO2 Capture and Seques-
tration,  Comments  made  to  the  Senate  Committee,  on  Commerce,  Science,  and 
Transportation,  Science,  Energy,  and  Innovation  Subcommittee,  March  20,  2007, 
Washington, D.C. 

6.  Julio  Friedmann,  Technical  Feasibility  of  Rapid  Deployment  of  Geological  Car-
bon Sequestration, Comments made to the House Energy and Commerce Committee, 
Energy and Air Quality Subcommittee. 2007: Washington, D.C. 

Senator KERRY. Well, we welcome it. Thank you very much. 
Mr. Rencheck? 

STATEMENT OF MICHAEL W. RENCHECK, SENIOR VICE 

PRESIDENT—ENGINEERING, PROJECTS, AND FIELD 

SERVICES, AMERICAN ELECTRIC POWER 

Mr.  RENCHECK.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of 
the  Committee.  Thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  participate  in  this 
hearing. 

I  am  Mike  Rencheck,  Senior  Vice  President  of  Engineering, 

Projects, and Field Services for American Electric Power. 

American  Electric  Power  is  one  of  our  nation’s  largest  utilities 
with  more  than  5  million  customers  in  11  states.  We  are  also  one 
of  the  Nation’s  largest  power  generators,  with  more  than  38,000 
megawatts of generating capacity from a diverse fleet. 

But  of  particular  note  for  today,  AEP  is  one  of  the  largest  coal- 
fired  generators  in  the  U.S.,  and  we  have  implemented  a  portfolio 
of  voluntary  actions  to  reduce  and  avoid  and  offset  greenhouse 
gases during the past decade. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

25 

Coal generates over 50 percent of the electricity used in the U.S., 
and is extensively used worldwide. As the demand for electricity in-
creases  significantly,  coal  use  will  increase  as  well.  In  the  future, 
coal-fired  electric  generation  must  be  zero  emission,  or  near-zero 
emission.  This  will  be  achieved  through  new  technologies  that  are 
being  developed  today,  and  are  not  yet  commercially  proven,  or 
commercially  available.  Like  most  companies  in  our  sector,  AEP 
needs  new  generation.  We  are  investing  in  a  new  clean  coal  tech-
nology  that  will  enable  AEP,  and  our  industry,  to  meet  the  chal-
lenge  of  reducing  greenhouse  gases  in  the  near-term,  and  for  the 
long-term. This includes plans to build new, integrated gasification 
combined cycle plants, IGCC plants, and two state-of-the-art, ultra 
supercritical  coal  units.  These  will  be  the  first  of  the  new  genera-
tion of ultra supercritical plants in the U.S. 

AEP  is  also  taking  the  lead  in  commercializing  carbon  capture 
technology  for  use  on  new  generation,  and  more  importantly,  for 
retrofitting the existing generation fleet. 

We  signed  a  Memorandum  of  Understanding  with  Alstom  for 
post-carbon  capture  combustion  technology,  using  Alstom’s  chilled 
ammonia  system.  Starting  with  a  commercial  performance 
verification project in mid- to late-2008 in West Virginia—a project 
that will also include storage and capture of carbon dioxide in a sa-
line aquifer, we will move then—after that’s completed—to the first 
commercial-size project at one of our 450-megawatt coal plants, our 
Northeastern plant, in Oklahoma, in 2011. 

This  would  capture  about  1.5  million  metric  tons  of  CO2 a  year, 
which  will  be  used  for  enhanced  oil  recovery.  We  are  also  working 
with  Babcock  &  Wilcox  to  take  its  oxy-coal  combustion  technology 
from  the  drawing  board,  to  a  commercial-scale  application  in  the 
next decade. 

AEP is very comfortable leading the way on technology. We have 
had  a  long  and  impressive  list  of  technological  firsts  during  our 
first 100 years, being in existence. But, we have identified one very 
important  caveat  during  our  century  of  technological  achievement, 
and  engineering  excellence—providing  a  technology  to  be  commer-
cially viable, and having that technology ready for widespread com-
mercial use, are two very different things. It takes time to develop 
off-the-shelf  commercial  offerings  for  technology  to  be  widely  de-
ployed. 

AEP  is  not  calling  for  an  indefinite  delay  in  the  enactment  of 
mandatory  climate  change  legislation  until  advanced  technology, 
such  as  carbon  capture  and  storage  is  developed,  however,  as  the 
requirements  become  more  stringent  during  the  next  10  to  20 
years, and we move beyond the ability of current technology to de-
liver  those  reductions,  it  is  essential  that  requirements  for  deeper 
reductions allow sufficient time for the demonstration and commer-
cialization of technologies. 

How can you help? It is also important to establish specific public 
funding,  as  well  as  incentives  for  private  funding,  for  the  develop-
ment  of  commercially  viable  technology  solutions,  as  well  as  pro-
viding the legal and regulatory structures to facilitate development. 
AEP  believes  that  IGCC  and  carbon  capture  technology  need  to 
be advanced, but the building of IGCC and the timely development 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

26 

of commercially viable carbon capture technologies will require ad-
ditional public funding. 

AEP  and  others  in  our  sector  have  already  invested  heavily  in 
the  research  and  early  development  of  the  technologies  that  may 
eventually  be  commercially  viable  solutions  to  address  greenhouse 
gases.  For  this  reason,  separate  investment  tax  credits  are  needed 
to facilitate both construction of IGCC plants now, and the develop-
ment of carbon capture technologies for future use. 

Of  significance  here,  the  final  decider  on  the  type  of  power  gen-
eration  that  can  be  built  in  many  states  is  the  public  utility  com-
mission  of  that  state.  That  commission  determines  how,  or  if,  a 
utility  can  recover  the  cost  of  new  generation,  or  retrofits  of  exist-
ing generation. 

How  do  you  reconcile  a  Federal  mandate  for  expensive  green-
house  gas  mitigation  with  states  that  desire  to  cap  energy  costs? 
The  utilities  and  their  shareholders  remain  caught  in  the  middle, 
and need your help to research, develop, and build this type of gen-
eration. 

American  industry  has  long  been  staffed  by  excellent  problem 
solvers, I am confident that we will be able to develop technologies 
to efficiently address emissions of greenhouse gases, in an increas-
ingly  cost-effective  manner.  We  have  the  brain  power,  we  need 
time, funding assistance, and legal and regulatory support. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Rencheck follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MICHAEL W. RENCHECK, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT— 
ENGINEERING, PROJECTS, AND FIELD SERVICES, AMERICAN ELECTRIC POWER 

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  distinguished  Members  of  the  Senate  Sub-

committee on Science, Technology, and Innovation. 

Thank you for inviting me here today. Thank you for this opportunity to offer the 
views of American Electric Power (AEP) and for soliciting the views of our industry 
and others on climate change technologies. 

My  name  is  Mike  Rencheck,  Senior  Vice  President—Engineering,  Projects  and 
Field Services of American Electric Power (AEP). Headquartered in Columbus, Ohio, 
we  are  one  of  the  Nation’s  largest  electricity  generators—with  over  36,000 
megawatts  of  generating  capacity—and  serve  more  than  five  million  retail  con-
sumers  in  11  states  in  the  Midwest  and  south  central  regions  of  our  Nation.  AEP’s 
generating  fleet  employs  diverse  sources  of  fuel—including  coal,  nuclear,  hydro-
electric,  natural  gas,  and  oil  and  wind  power.  But  of  particular  importance  for  the 
Committee members here today, AEP uses more coal than any other electricity gen-
erator in the Western hemisphere. 
AEP’s Technology Development 

Over  the  last  100  years,  AEP  has  been  an  industry  leader  in  developing  and  de-
ploying new technologies beginning with the first high voltage transmission lines at 
345  kilovolt  (kV)  and  765  kV  to  new  and  more  efficient  coal  power  plants  starting 
with  the  large  central  station  power  plant  progressing  to  supercritical  and 
ultrasupercritical  powers  plants.  We  are  continuing  that  today.  We  implemented 
over  11  selective  catalytic  reactors  (SCRs),  9  Flue  Gas  Desulphurization  units  with 
others  currently  under  construction,  and  we  are  a  leader  in  developing  and  deploy-
ing  mercury  capture  and  monitoring  technology.  In  addition,  we  continue  to  invest 
in new clean coal technology plants and R&D that will enable AEP and our industry 
to  meet  the  challenge  of  significantly  reducing  GHG  emissions  in  future  years.  For 
example, AEP is working to build two new generating plants using integrated gasifi-
cation combined cycle (IGCC) technology in Ohio and West Virginia, as well as two 
highly  efficient  new  generating  plants  using 
(e.g., 
ultrasupercritical)  pulverized  coal  combustion  technology  in  Arkansas  and  Okla-
homa.  We  are  also  supporting  a  leading  role  in  the  FutureGen  project,  which  once 
completed,  will  be  the  world’s  first  near-zero  CO2 emitting  commercial  scale  coal- 

the  most  advanced 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

27 

fueled  power  plant.  We  are  also  working  to  progress  specific  carbon  capture  and 
storage technology. 
AEP’s Major New Initiative to Reduce GHG Emissions 

Just  this  past  month,  AEP  announced  several  major  new  initiatives  to  reduce 
AEP’s GHG emissions and to advance the commercial application of carbon capture 
and  storage  technology  and  oxy-coal  combustion.  Our  company  has  been  advancing 
technology for the electric utility industry for more than 100 years. AEP’s recent an-
nouncement  continues  to  build  upon  this  heritage.  Technology  development  needs 
are  often  cited  as  an  excuse  for  inaction.  We  see  these  needs  as  opportunities  for 
action. 

AEP  has  signed  a  memorandum  of  understanding  (MOU)  with  Alstom,  a  world-
wide  leader  in  equipment  and  services  for  power  generation,  for  post-combustion 
carbon  capture  technology  using  Alstom’s  chilled  ammonia  system.  It  will  be  in-
stalled  at  our  1,300-megawatt  Mountaineer  Plant  in  New  Haven,  W.Va.  as  a  ‘‘30- 
megawatt (thermal) commercial performance verification’’ project in mid to late 2008 
and it will capture up to 100,000 metric tons of carbon dioxide (CO2) per year. Once 
the CO2 is captured we will store it. The Mountaineer site has an existing deep sa-
line  aquifer  injection  well  previously  developed  in  conjunction  with  DOE  and 
Battelle.  Working  with  Battelle  and  with  continued  DOE  support,  we  will  use  this 
well (and develop others) to store and further study CO2 injection into deep geologi-
cal formations. 

Following the completion of commercial verification at Mountaineer, AEP plans to 
install  Alstom’s  system  on  one  of  the  450-megawatt  coal-fired  units  at  its  North-
eastern Plant in Oologah, Oklahoma, as a first-of-a-kind commercial demonstration. 
The  system  is  expected  to  be  operational  at  Northeastern  Plant  in  late  2011,  cap-
turing  about  1.5  million  metric  tons  of  CO2 a  year.  The  CO2 captured  at  North-
eastern Plant will also be used for enhanced oil recovery. 

AEP  has  also  signed  an  MOU  with  Babcock  and  Wilcox  to  pursue  the  develop-
ment  of  oxy-coal  combustion  that  uses  oxygen  in  lieu  of  air  for  combustion,  which 
forms a concentrated CO2 post combustion gas that can be stored without additional 
post  combustion  capture  processes.  AEP  will  work  with  B&W  on  a  ‘‘30-megawatt 
(thermal)  pilot  project  in  mid-2007  then  use  the  results  to  study  the  feasibility  of 
a scale 100–200 Mw demonstration.’’ The CO2 from the demonstration project would 
be captured and stored in a deep saline or enhanced oil recovery application. 

Just  last  month,  AEP  voluntarily  committed  to  achieve  an  additional  five  million 
tons  of  GHG  reductions  annually  beginning  in  2011.  We  will  accomplish  these  re-
ductions through a new AEP initiative that will add another 1,000 Mw of purchased 
wind power into our system, substantially increase our forestry investments (in ad-
dition to the 62 million trees we have planted to date), as well as invest in domestic 
offsets, such as methane capture from agriculture, mines and landfills. 
AEP Perspectives on a Federal GHG Reduction Program 

While  AEP  has  done  much,  and  will  do  much  more,  to  mitigate  GHG  emissions 
from its existing sources, we also support the adoption of an economy-wide cap-and- 
trade type GHG reduction program that is well thought-out, achievable, and reason-
able. Although today I intend to focus on the need for the development and deploy-
ment  of  commercially  viable  technologies  to  address  climate  change  and  not  on  the 
specific policies issues that must be addressed, AEP believes that legislation can be 
crafted  that  does  not  impede  AEP’s  ability  to  provide  reliable,  reasonably  priced 
electricity to support the economic well-being of our customers, and includes mecha-
nisms that foster international participation and avoid creating inequities and com-
petitive issues that would harm the U.S. economy. AEP supports reasonable legisla-
tion, and is not calling for an indefinite delay until advanced technology such as car-
bon  capture  and  storage  (CCS)  is  developed.  However,  as  the  requirements  become 
more stringent during the next ten to twenty years, and we move beyond the ability 
of  current  technology  to  deliver  those  reductions,  it  is  essential  that  requirements 
for  deeper  reductions  coincide  with  the  commercialization  of  advanced  technologies. 
Phased-in Timing and Gradually Increasing Level of Reductions Consistent 

with Technology Development that is facilitated by Public Funding 

As  a  practical  matter,  implementing  climate  legislation  is  a  complex  undertaking 
that will require procedures for measuring, verifying, and accounting for GHG emis-
sions,  as  well  as  for  designing  efficient  administration  and  enforcement  procedures 
applicable to all sectors of our economy. Only a pragmatic approach with achievable 
targets,  supported  by  commercial  technology,  and  reasonable  timetables—that  does 
not  require  too  many  reductions  within  too  short  a  time  period—will  succeed.  Past 
experience  with  the  Clean  Air  Act  Amendments  of  1990  (which  involved  a  vastly 
simpler  SO2 allowance  trading  system  for  just  the  electric  power  sector),  strongly 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

28 

suggests  that  a  minimum  of  5  years  will  be  necessary  to  have  the  administrative 
mechanisms  in  place  for  full  implementation  of  the  initial  GHG  emission  targets. 
AEP also believes that the level of emissions reductions and timing of those reduc-
tions under a Federal mandate must keep pace with developing technologies for re-
ducing GHG emissions from new and existing sources. The technologies for effective 
carbon capture and storage from coal-fired facilities are developing, but are not com-
mercially engineered to meet production needs, and cannot be artificially accelerated 
through unrealistic reduction mandates. 

While  AEP  and  other  companies  have  successfully  lowered  their  average  emis-
sions  and  emission  rates  during  this  decade,  further  substantial  reductions  will  re-
quire the wide-scale commercial availability of new clean coal technologies. AEP be-
lieves that the electric power industry can potentially manage much of the expected 
economic  (and  CO2 emissions)  growth  over  the  course  of  the  next  decade  (2010– 
2020) through aggressively deploying renewable energy, further gains in supply and 
demand-side  energy  efficiency,  and  new  emission  offset  projects.  As  stated  above, 
AEP  supports  reasonable  legislation,  and  is  not  calling  for  an  indefinite  delay  of 
GHG  reduction  obligations  until  advanced  clean  coal  technology  is  developed.  How-
ever,  as  the  reduction  requirements  become  more  stringent,  and  move  beyond  the 
ability of current technologies to deliver those reductions, it is important that those 
stringent requirements coincide with the commercialization of advanced technology. 
This includes the next generation of low- and zero-emitting technologies. In the case 
of coal, this means demonstration and full-scale deployment of new IGCC units with 
carbon  capture,  new  ultrasupercritical  or  oxy-coal  plants  with  carbon  capture  and 
storage, as well as broad deployment of retrofit technologies for carbon capture and 
storage  at  existing  coal  plants.  The  next  generation  of  nuclear  technology  will  also 
play an important role in meeting significant reduction targets. 

However,  today’s  costs  of  new  clean  coal  technologies  with  carbon  capture  and 
storage are much more expensive than current coal-fired technologies. For example, 
carbon  capture  and  storage  using  current  inhibited  monoethanolamine  (MEA)  tech-
nology  is  expected  to  increase  the  cost  of  electricity  from  a  new  coal-fired  power 
plant  by  about  60–70  percent  and  even  the  newer  chilled  ammonia  carbon  capture 
technology we plan to deploy on a commercial sized scale by 2012 at one of our ex-
isting coal-fired units will result in significantly higher costs. It is only through the 
steady  and  judicious  advancement  of  these  applications  during  the  course  of  the 
next decade that we can start to bring these costs down, in order to avoid substan-
tial electricity rate shocks and undue harm to the U.S. economy. 

Simply  put,  our  Nation  cannot  wait  a  decade  or  longer  to  begin  the  development 
and  commercialization  of  IGCC  and  carbon  capture  and  sequestration  technologies. 
The need for new electric generating capacity is upon us now. The need is real and 
it  is  pressing.  Unfortunately,  the  deployment  of  advanced  coal  electric  generation 
technology, such as IGCC, is expensive now and will only become more so if develop-
ment is postponed. 

AEP  believes  that  IGCC  is  the  best  commercially-ready  technology  for  the  future 
inclusion of CCS but that the timely development of commercially viable CCS tech-
nologies will require additional public funding. Our IGCC plants will incorporate the 
space  and  layout  for  the  addition  of  components  to  capture  CO2 for  sequestration, 
but AEP does not plan to incorporate CCS equipment until after the plants are op-
erating and the technology is demonstrated and proven. 

Our IGCC plants will be among the earliest, if not the first, deployments of large- 
scale IGCC technology. The cost of constructing these plants will be high, resulting 
in a cost of generated electricity that would be at least twenty percent greater than 
that  from  conventional  pulverized  coal  (PC)  combustion  technology.  As  more  plants 
are  built,  the  costs  of  construction  are  expected  to  come  into  line  with  the  cost  of 
PC plants. 

To help bridge the cost gap and move IGCC technology down the cost curve, there 
is  a  need  for  continuation  and  expansion  of  the  advanced  coal  project  tax  credits 
that were introduced by the Energy Policy Act of 2005. All of the available tax cred-
its for IGCC projects using bituminous coal were allocated to only two projects dur-
ing  the  initial  allocation  round  in  2006.  More  IGCC  plants  are  needed  to  facilitate 
this technology. AEP believes an additional one billion dollars of section 48A (of the 
Internal  Revenue  Code)  tax  credits  are  needed,  with  the  bulk  of  that  dedicated  to 
IGCC projects without regard to coal type. 

Along  with  an  increase  in  the  amount  of  the  credits,  changes  are  needed  in  the 
manner  in  which  the  credits  are  allocated.  Advanced  coal  project  credits  should  be 
allocated  based  on  net  generating  capacity  and  not  based  upon  the  estimated  gross 
nameplate generating capacity of projects. Allocation based upon gross, rather than 
net, generating capacity potentially rewards less efficient projects, which is antithet-
ical  to  the  purpose  of  advanced  coal  project  tax  incentives.  AEP  also  believes  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

29 

the  Secretary  of  Energy  should  be  delegated  a  significant  role  in  the  selection  of 
IGCC projects that will receive tax credits. 

On  a  critical  note,  the  inclusion  of  carbon  capture  and  sequestration  equipment 
must  not  be  a  prerequisite  for  the  allocation  of  these  additional  tax  credits  due  to 
the  urgent  need  for  new  electric  generating  capacity  in  the  U.S.  AEP  also  believes 
that  this  requirement  is  premature  and  self-defeating,  since  the  technology  to  cap-
ture and sequester a significant portion of an IGCC project’s CO2 does not currently 
exist.  The  addition  of  yet-to-be-developed  carbon  capture  and  sequestration  tech-
nology  to  an  IGCC  project  would  cause  the  projected  cost  of  a  project  to  increase 
significantly,  making  it  that  much  more  difficult  for  a  public  utility  commission  to 
approve. 

AEP  also  believes  that  additional  tax  incentives  are  needed  to  spur  the  develop-
ment  and  deployment  of  greenhouse  gas  capture  and  sequestration  equipment  for 
all  types  of  coal-fired  generation.  We  suggest  that  additional  tax  credits  be  estab-
lished to offset a significant portion of the incremental cost of capturing and seques-
tering CO2. These incentives could be structured partly as an investment tax credit, 
similar  to  that  in  section  48A  (of  the  Internal  Revenue  Code),  to  cover  the  upfront 
capital  cost,  and  partly  as  a  production  tax  credit  to  cover  the  associated  operating 
costs. 

In  summary,  AEP  recommends  a  pragmatic  approach  for  phasing  in  GHG  reduc-
tions  through  a  cap-and-trade  program  coincident  with  developing  technologies  to 
support  these  reductions.  The  emissions  cap  should  be  reasonable  and  achievable. 
In  the  early  years  of  the  program,  the  cap  should  be  set  at  levels  that  slow  the  in-
crease  in  GHG  emissions.  Allowing  for  moderate  emissions  increases  over  the  first 
decade is critical due to limitations on currently available GHG control options and 
technologies.  The  stringency  of  the  cap  would  increase  over  time—first  stabilizing 
emissions  and  then  requiring  a  gradual,  long-term  decline  in  emissions  levels.  The 
cap  levels  should  be  set  to  reflect  projected  advances  in  new  carbon-saving  tech-
nologies,  which  advances  AEP  believes  can  be  facilitated  by  Federal  incentives.  In 
the  case  of  the  electric  power  sector,  additional  time  is  necessary  to  allow  for  the 
deployment  of  new  nuclear  plants  as  well  as  the  demonstration  and  deployment  of 
commercial-scale  gasification  and  advanced  combustion  facilities  fully  integrated 
with  technologies  for  CO2 capture  and  storage.  Substantial  GHG  reductions  should 
not be required until after the 2020 time-frame. 

Requiring  much  deeper  reductions  sooner  would  very  likely  harm  the  U.S.  econ-
omy.  For  AEP  and  the  electric  sector,  the  only  currently  available  strategy  to 
achieve substantial absolute CO2 reductions prior to 2020 without the full-scale de-
ployment  of  new  technologies  will  inevitably  require  much  greater  use  of  natural 
gas,  in  lieu  of  coal-fueled  electricity,  with  the  undesirable  effects  of  higher  natural 
gas prices and even tighter supplies. 
Technology is the Answer to Climate Change 

The primary human-induced cause of global warming is the emission of CO2 aris-
ing from the burning of fossil fuels. Put simply, our primary contribution to climate 
change is also what drives the global economic engine. 

Changing  consumer  behavior  by  buying  efficient  appliances  and  cars,  by  driving 
less, and by similar steps, is helping to reduce the growth of GHG emissions. How-
ever,  these  steps  will  never  be  nearly  enough  to  significantly  reduce  CO2 emissions 
from the burning of coal, oil and natural gas. Such incremental steps, while impor-
tant,  will  never  be  sufficient  to  stabilize  greenhouse  gases  concentrations  in  the  at-
mosphere  at  a  level  that  is  believed  to  be  capable  of  preventing  dangerous  human- 
induced  interference  with  the  climate  system,  as  called  for  in  the  U.S.-approved 
U.N. Framework Convention on Climate Change (Rio agreement). 

For  that,  we  need  major  technological  advances  to  effectively  capture  and  store 
CO2.  The  Congress  and  indeed  all  Americans  must  come  to  recognize  the  gigantic 
undertaking  and  significant  sacrifices  that  this  enterprise  is  likely  to  require.  It  is 
unrealistic  to  assume,  and  wrong  to  argue,  that  the  market  will  magically  respond 
simply  by  the  imposition  of  severe  caps  on  CO2 emissions.  The  result  will  not  be 
a positive response by the market, but rather a severe impact on the economy. Not 
when  what  we  are  talking  about,  on  a  large  scale,  is  the  capture  and  geologic  stor-
age  of  billions  and  billions  of  tons  of  CO2 with  technologies  that  have  not  yet  been 
proven anywhere in the world. 

CCS should not be mandated until and unless it has been demonstrated to be ef-
fective and the costs have significantly dropped so that it becomes commercially en-
gineered and available on a widespread basis. Until that threshold is met, it would 
be  technologically  unrealistic  and  economically  unacceptable  to  require  the  wide-
spread installation of carbon capture equipment. The use of deep saline geologic for-
mations  as  the  primary  long-term  geologic  formations  for  CO2 storage  has  not  yet 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

30 

been sufficiently demonstrated. There are no national standards for permitting such 
storage reservoirs; there are no widely accepted monitoring protocols; and the stand-
ards  for  liability  are  unknown  (and  whether  Federal  or  state  laws  would  apply),  as 
well  as  who  owns  the  rights  to  these  deep  geologic  reservoirs  remains  a  question. 
Underscoring  these  realities,  industrial  insurance  companies  point  to  a  lack  of  sci-
entific  data  on  CO2 storage  as  one  reason  they  are  disinclined  to  insure  early 
projects.  In  a  nutshell,  the  institutional  infrastructure  to  support  CO2 storage  does 
not  yet  exist  and  will  require  years  to  develop.  In  addition,  application  of  today’s 
CO2 capture  technology  would  significantly  increase  the  cost  of  an  IGCC  or  a  new 
efficient  pulverized  coal  plant,  calling  into  serious  question  regulatory  approval  for 
the  costs  of  such  a  plant  by  state  regulators.  Further,  recent  studies  sponsored  by 
the Electric Power Research Institute (EPRI) suggest that application of today’s CO2 
capture  technology  would  increase  the  cost  of  electricity  from  an  IGCC  plant  by  up 
to  50  percent,  and  boost  the  cost  of  electricity  from  a  conventional  pulverized  coal 
plant  by  up  to  60–70  percent,  which  would  again  jeopardize  state  regulatory  ap-
proval for the costs of such plants. 

Despite these uncertainties, I believe that we must aggressively explore the viabil-
ity  of  this  technology  in  several  first-of-a-kind  commercial  projects.  AEP  is  com-
mitted  to  help  lead  the  way,  and  to  show  how  this  can  be  done.  For  example,  as 
described  earlier  in  this  testimony,  AEP  will  install  carbon  capture  controls  on  two 
existing coal-fired power plants, the first commercial use of this technology, as part 
of our comprehensive strategy to reduce, avoid or offset GHG emissions. 

AEP is also building two state-of-the-art advanced ultrasupercritical power plants 
in  Oklahoma  and  Arkansas.  These  will  be  the  first  of  the  new  generation  of 
ultrasupercritical plants in the U.S. 

AEP  is  also  advancing  the  development  of  IGCC  technology.  IGCC  represents  a 
major breakthrough in our work to improve the environmental performance of coal- 
based  electric  power  generation.  AEP  is  in  the  process  of  permitting  and  designing 
two of the earliest commercial scale IGCC plants in the Nation. Construction of the 
IGCC plants will start once traditional rate recovery is approved. 

IGCC technology integrates two proven processes—coal gasification and combined 
cycle  power  generation—to  convert  coal  into  electricity  more  efficiently  and  cleanly 
than  any  existing  uncontrolled  power  plants  can.  Not  only  is  it  cleaner  and  more 
efficient than today’s installed power plants, but IGCC has the potential to be retro-
fitted  in  the  future  for  carbon  capture  at  a  lower  capital  cost  and  with  less  of  an 
energy  penalty  than  traditional  power  plant  technologies,  but  only  after  the  tech-
nology has been developed and proven. 

AEP  is  also  a  founding  member  of  FutureGen,  a  groundbreaking  public-private 
collaboration that aims squarely at making near-zero-emissions coal-based energy a 
reality.  FutureGen  is  a  $1.5  billion,  10-year  research  and  demonstration  project.  It 
is  on  track  to  create  the  world’s  first  coal-fueled,  near-zero  emission  electricity  and 
hydrogen  plant  with  the  capability  to  capture  and  sequester  at  least  90  percent  of 
its carbon dioxide emissions. 

As an R&D plant, FutureGen will stretch—and indeed create—the technology en-
velope.  Within  the  context  of  our  fight  to  combat  global  climate  change,  FutureGen 
has  a  truly  profound  mission—to  validate  the  cost  and  performance  baselines  of  a 
fully integrated, near zero-emission coal-fueled power plant. 

The design of the FutureGen plant is already underway, and we are making great 
progress.  The  plant  will  be  on-line  early  in  the  next  decade.  By  the  latter  part  of 
that  decade,  following  on  the  advancements  demonstrated  by  AEP,  FutureGen  and 
other projects, CCS technology should become a commercial reality. 

It is when these technologies are commercially demonstrated, and only then, that 
commercial  orders  will  be  placed  on  a  widespread  basis  to  implement  CCS  at  coal- 
fueled power plants. That is, roughly around 2020. Widespread deployment assumes 
that a host of other important issues have been resolved, and there is governmental 
and public acceptance of CCS as the proven and safe technology that we now believe 
it  to  be.  AEP  supports  rapid  action  on  climate  change  including  the  enactment  of 
well  thought-out  and  achievable  legislation  so  that  our  Nation  can  get  started  on 
dealing with climate change. However, the complete transformation of the U.S. elec-
tricity  system  will  take  time,  and  we  can’t  put  policy  ahead  of  the  availability  of 
cost-effective  technology.  The  development  of  technology  must  coincide  with  any  in-
crease in the stringency of the program. 

What  will  happen  if  the  Congress  does  the  opposite,  and  mandates  deep  reduc-
tions in the absence of a proven, viable technology? It is the proverbial road of good 
intentions, and only dangerous consequences can follow. The most immediate would 
be  a  dramatic—and  very  likely  costly—increase  in  the  use  and  price  of  natural  gas 
by  the  utility  sector,  since  there  would  be  no  other  identifiable  alternative.  This 
would have significant adverse impacts on consumers and workers by driving up the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

31 

cost  of  gas  for  home  heating  and  cooking,  and  would  further  increase  costs  to  any 
industry  dependent  upon  natural  gas  as  a  feedstock,  such  as  chemicals  and  agri-
culture with a further exporting of jobs overseas. 

A huge challenge that our society faces over the remainder of this century is how 
we  will  reduce  the  release  of  GHG  emissions  from  fossil  fuels.  This  will  require 
nothing less than the complete reengineering of the entire global energy system over 
the next century. The magnitude of this task is comparable to the industrial revolu-
tion, but for this revolution to be successful, it must stimulate new technologies and 
new  behaviors  in  all  major  sectors  of  the  economy.  The  benefits  of  projects  like 
FutureGen  and  the  ones  AEP  is  pursuing  will  apply  to  all  countries  blessed  with 
an  abundance  of  coal,  not  only  the  United  States,  but  also  nations  like  China  and 
India. 

In  the  end,  the  only  sure  path  to  stabilizing  GHG  concentrations  over  the  long 
term  is  through  the  development  and  utilization  of  advanced  technologies.  And  we 
must  do  more  than  simply  call  for  it.  Our  nation  must  prepare,  inspire,  guide,  and 
support  our  citizens  and  the  very  best  and  the  brightest  of  our  engineers  and  sci-
entists;  private  industry  must  step  up  and  start  to  construct  the  first  commercial 
plants; and our country must devote adequate financial and technological resources 
to this enormous challenge. AEP is committed to being a part of this important proc-
ess,  and  to  helping  you  achieve  the  best  outcome  at  the  most  reasonable  cost  and 
timelines  possible.  Thank  you  again  for  this  opportunity  to  share  these  views  with 
you. 

Media Contact: 
PAT D. HEMLEPP 
Director, Corporate Media Relations 
For Immediate Release 
AEP  to  Install  Carbon  Capture  on  Two  Existing  Power  Plants;  Company 

Analysts Contact: 
JULIE SLOAT 
Vice President, Investor Relations 

Will Be First to Move Technology to Commercial Scale 

NEWS from AEP 

As  climate  policy  advances,  ‘‘it’s  time  to  advance  technology  for  commercial  use,’’ 
CEO  says  Columbus,  Ohio,  March  15,  2007—American  Electric  Power  (NYSE:AEP) 
will  install  carbon  capture  on  two  coal-fired  power  plants,  the  first  commercial  use 
of technologies to significantly reduce carbon dioxide emissions from existing plants. 
The first project is expected to complete its product validation phase in 2008 and 

begin commercial operation in 2011. 

‘‘AEP has been the company advancing technology for the electric utility industry 
for  more  than  100  years,’’  said  Michael  G.  Morris,  AEP  chairman,  president  and 
chief  executive  officer.  ‘‘This  long  heritage,  the  backbone  of  our  company’s  success, 
makes  us  very  comfortable  taking  action  on  carbon  emissions  and  accelerating  ad-
vancement  of  the  technology.  Technology  development  needs  are  often  cited  as  an 
excuse for inaction. We see these needs as an opportunity for action.’’ 

‘‘With Congress expected to take action on greenhouse gas issues in climate legis-
lation,  it’s  time  to  advance  this  technology  for  commercial  use,’’  Morris  said.  ‘‘And 
we  will  continue  working  with  Congress  as  it  crafts  climate  policy.  It  is  important 
that  the  U.S.  climate  policy  be  well  thought  out,  establish  reasonable  targets  and 
timetables, and include mechanisms to prevent trade imbalances that would damage 
the U.S. economy.’’ 

Morris  will  discuss  AEP’s  plans  for  carbon  capture  during  a  presentation  today 
at the Morgan Stanley Global Electricity & Energy Conference in New York. A live 
webcast of the presentation to an audience of investors will begin at 12:10 p.m. EDT 
and  can  be  accessed  through  the  Internet  at  http://www.aep.com/go/webcast.  The 
webcast will also be available after the event. Visuals used in the presentation will 
be available at http://ww.aep.com/investors/present. 

AEP  has  signed  a  memorandum  of  understanding  (MOU)  with  Alstom,  a  world-
wide leader in equipment and services for power generation and clean coal, for post- 
combustion  carbon  capture  technology  using  Alstom’s  Chilled  Ammonia  Process. 
This  technology,  which  is  being  piloted  this  summer  by  Alstom  on  a  5-megawatt 
(thermal)  slipstream  from  a  plant  in  Wisconsin,  will  first  be  installed  on  AEP’s 
1,300-megawatt  Mountaineer  Plant  in  New  Haven,  W.Va.,  as  a  30-megawatt  (ther-
mal) product validation in mid-2008 where up to 100,000 metric tons of carbon diox-
ide (CO2) will be captured per year. The captured CO2 will be designated for geologi-
cal storage in deep saline aquifers at the site. Battelle Memorial Institute will serve 
as consultants for AEP on geological storage. 

Following  the  completion  of  product  validation  at  Mountaineer,  AEP  will  install 
Alstom’s  system  on  one  of  the  450-megawatt  (electric)  coal-fired  units  at  its  North-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

32 

eastern  Station  in  Oologah,  Okla.  Plans  are  for  the  commercial-scale  system  to  be 
operational at Northeastern Station in late 2011. It is expected to capture about 1.5 
million  metric  tons  of  CO2 a  year.  The  CO2 captured  at  Northeastern  Station  will 
be used for enhanced oil recovery. 

Alstom’s  system  captures  CO2 by  isolating  the  gas  from  the  power  plant’s  other 
flue  gases  and  can  significantly  increase  the  efficiency  of  the  CO2 capture  process. 
The  system  chills  the  flue  gas,  recovering  large  quantities  of  water  for  recycle,  and 
then utilizes a CO2 absorber in a similar way to absorbers used in systems that re-
duce  sulfur  dioxide  emissions.  The  remaining  low  concentration  of  ammonia  in  the 
clean flue gas is captured by cold-water wash and returned to the absorber. The CO2 
is compressed to be sent to enhanced oil recovery or storage. 

In laboratory testing sponsored by Alstom, EPRI and others, the process has dem-
onstrated the potential to capture more than 90 percent of CO2 at a cost that is far 
less  expensive  than  other  carbon  capture  technologies.  It  is  applicable  for  use  on 
new power plants as well as for the retrofit of existing coal-fired power plants. 

AEP  has  signed  an  MOU  with  The  Babcock  &  Wilcox  Company  (B&W),  a  world 
leader in steam generation and pollution control equipment design, supply and serv-
ice since 1867, for a feasibility study of oxy-coal combustion technology. B&W, a sub-
sidiary  of  McDermott  International,  Inc.  (NYSE:MDR),  will  complete  a  pilot  dem-
onstration of the technology this summer at its 30-megawatt (thermal) Clean Envi-
ronment Development Facility in Alliance, Ohio. 

Following  this  demonstration,  AEP  and  B&W  will  conduct  a  retrofit  feasibility 
study  that  will  include  selection  of  an  existing  AEP  plant  site  for  commercial-scale 
installation  of  the  technology  and  cost  estimates  to  complete  that  work.  Once  the 
retrofit  feasibility  study  is  completed,  detailed  design  engineering  and  construction 
estimates  to  retrofit  an  existing  AEP  plant  for  commercial-scale  CO2 capture  will 
begin.  At  the  commercial  scale,  the  captured  CO2 will  likely  be  stored  in  deep  geo-
logic  formations.  The  plant,  with  oxy-coal  combustion  technology,  is  expected  to  be 
in service in the 2012–2015 time-frame. 

B&W,  in  collaboration  with  American  Air  Liquide  Inc.,  has  been  developing  oxy- 
coal  combustion,  a  technology  that  utilizes  pure  oxygen  for  the  combustion  of  coal. 
Current generation technologies use air, which contains nitrogen that is not utilized 
in  the  combustion  process  and  is  emitted  with  the  flue  gas.  By  using  pure  oxygen, 
oxy-coal combustion excludes nitrogen and leaves a flue gas that is a relatively pure 
stream  of  carbon  dioxide  that  is  ready  for  capture  and  storage.  B&W’s  and  Air 
Liquide’s collaborative work on oxy-coal combustion began in the late 1990s and in-
cluded pilot-scale development at B&W’s facilities with encouraging results, burning 
both bituminous and sub-bituminous coals. 

The  oxy-coal  combustion  process,  as  envisioned,  uses  a  standard,  cryogenic  air 
separation unit to provide relatively pure oxygen to the combustion process. This ox-
ygen is mixed with recycled flue gas in a proprietary mixing device to replicate air, 
which  may  then  be  used  to  operate  a  boiler  designed  for  regular  air  firing.  The  ex-
haust  gas,  consisting  primarily  of  carbon  dioxide,  is  first  cleaned  of  traditional  pol-
lutants,  then  compressed  and  purified  before  storage.  B&W,  working  with  Air 
Liquide, can supply the equipment, technology and control systems to construct this 
new  value  chain,  either  as  a  new  application  or  as  a  retrofit  to  an  existing  unit. 
The  Alstom  technology  provides  a  post-combustion  carbon  capture  system  that  is 
suitable  for  use  in  new  plants  as  well  as  for  retrofitting  to  existing  plants.  It  re-
quires  significantly  less  energy  to  capture  CO2 than  other  technologies  currently 
being tested. 

The B&W technology provides a pre-combustion boiler conversion option for exist-

ing plants that promotes the creation of a pure CO2 stream in the flue gas. 

Both pre- and post-combustion technologies will be important for companies facing 
decisions on carbon reduction from the wide variety of coal-fired boiler designs cur-
rently in use. 

AEP anticipates seeking funding from the U.S. Department of Energy to help off-
set  some  of  the  costs  of  advancing  these  technologies  for  commercial  use.  The  com-
pany  will  also  work  with  utility  commissions,  environmental  regulators  and  other 
key  constituencies  in  states  that  have  jurisdiction  over  the  plants  selected  for  ret-
rofit to determine appropriate cost recovery and the impact on customers. 

‘‘We recognize that these projects represent a significant commitment of resources 
for  AEP,  but  they  are  projects  that  will  pay  important  dividends  in  the  future  for 
our customers and shareholders,’’ Morris said. ‘‘Coal is the fuel used to generate half 
of  the  Nation’s  electricity;  it  fuels  about  75  percent  of  AEP’s  generating  fleet.  By 
advancing carbon capture technologies into commercial use, we are taking an impor-
tant step to ensure the continued and long-term viability of our existing generation, 
just as we did when we were the first to begin a comprehensive, system-wide retrofit 
program  for  sulfur  dioxide  and  nitrogen  oxide  emissions  controls.  We  have  com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

33 

pleted the sulfur dioxide and nitrogen oxide retrofits on more than two-thirds of the 
capacity  included  in  the  program  and  we  are  on  schedule  to  complete  all  retrofits 
by shortly after the end of the decade.’’ 

‘‘By  being  the  first  to  advance  carbon  capture  technology,  we  will  be  well-posi-
tioned  to  quickly  and  efficiently  retrofit  additional  plants  in  our  fleet  with  carbon 
capture systems while avoiding a potentially significant learning curve.’’ 

AEP has led the U.S. electric utility industry in taking action to reduce its green-
house  gas  emissions.  AEP  was  the  first  and  largest  U.S.  utility  to  join  the  Chicago 
Climate  Exchange  (CCX),  the  world’s  first  and  North  America’s  only  voluntary,  le-
gally  binding  greenhouse  gas  emissions  reduction  and  trading  program.  As  a  mem-
ber  of  CCX,  AEP  committed  to  gradually  reduce,  avoid  or  offset  its  greenhouse  gas 
emissions  to  6  percent  below  the  average  of  its  1998  to  2001  emission  levels  by 
2010. Through this commitment, AEP will reduce or offset approximately 46 million 
metric tons of greenhouse gas emissions by the end of the decade. 

AEP  is  achieving  its  greenhouse  gas  reductions  through  a  broad  portfolio  of  ac-
tions, including power plant efficiency improvements, renewable generation such as 
wind  and  biomass  co-firing,  off-system  greenhouse  gas  reduction  projects,  reforest-
ation projects and the potential purchase of emission credits through CCX. 

American  Electric  Power  is  one  of  the  largest  electric  utilities  in  the  United 
States,  delivering  electricity  to  more  than  5  million  customers  in  11  states.  AEP 
ranks  among  the  Nation’s  largest  generators  of  electricity,  owning  nearly  36,000 
megawatts  of  generating  capacity  in  the  U.S.  AEP  also  owns  the  Nation’s  largest 
electricity  transmission  system,  a  nearly  39,000-mile  network  that  includes  more 
765  kilovolt  extra-high  voltage  transmission  lines  than  all  other  U.S.  transmission 
systems  combined.  AEP’s  utility  units  operate  as  AEP  Ohio,  AEP  Texas,  Appa-
lachian  Power  (in  Virginia  and  West  Virginia),  AEP  Appalachian  Power  (in  Ten-
nessee),  Indiana  Michigan  Power,  Kentucky  Power,  Public  Service  Company  of 
Oklahoma, and Southwestern Electric Power Company (in Arkansas, Louisiana and 
east Texas). AEP’s headquarters are in Columbus, Ohio. 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

* 

This  report  made  by  AEP  and  its  Registrant  Subsidiaries  contains  forward-Look-
ing  statements  within  the  meaning  of  Section  21E  of  the  Securities  Exchange  Act 
of 1934. Although AEP and each of its Registrant Subsidiaries believe that their ex-
pectations are based on reasonable assumptions, any such statements may be influ-
enced  by  factors  that  could  cause  actual  outcomes  and  results  to  be  materially  dif-
ferent from those projected. Among the factors that could cause actual results to dif-
fer  materially  from  those  in  the  forward-looking  statements  are:  electric  load  and 
customer  growth;  weather  conditions,  including  storms;  available  sources  and  costs 
of, and transportation for, fuels and the creditworthiness of fuel suppliers and trans-
porters; availability of generating capacity and the performance of AEP’s generating 
plants;  AEP’s  ability  to  recover  regulatory  assets  and  stranded  costs  in  connection 
with  deregulation;  AEP’s  ability  to  recover  increases  in  fuel  and  other  energy  costs 
through regulated or competitive electric rates; AEP’s ability to build or acquire gen-
erating  capacity  when  needed  at  acceptable  prices  and  terms  and  to  recover  those 
costs  through  applicable  rate  cases  or  competitive  rates;  new  legislation,  litigation 
and  government  regulation  including  requirements  for  reduced  emissions  of  sulfur, 
nitrogen,  mercury,  carbon,  soot  or  particulate  matter  and  other  substances;  timing 
and  resolution  of  pending  and  future  rate  cases,  negotiations  and  other  regulatory 
decisions (including rate or other recovery for new investments, transmission service 
and environmental compliance); resolution of litigation (including pending Clean Air 
Act  enforcement  actions  and  disputes  arising  from  the  bankruptcy  of  Enron  Corp. 
and  related  matters);  AEP’s  ability  to  constrain  operation  and  maintenance  costs; 
the  economic  climate  and  growth  in  AEP’s  service  territory  and  changes  in  market 
demand and demographic patterns; inflationary and interest rate trends; AEP’s abil-
ity to develop and execute a strategy based on a view regarding prices of electricity, 
natural  gas  and  other  energy-related  commodities;  changes  in  the  creditworthiness 
of the counterparties with whom AEP has contractual arrangements, including par-
ticipants in the energy trading market; actions of rating agencies, including changes 
in  the  ratings  of  debt;  volatility  and  changes  in  markets  for  electricity,  natural  gas 
and  other  energy-related  commodities;  changes  in  utility  regulation,  including  the 
potential  for  new  legislation  or  regulation  in  Ohio  and/or  Virginia  and  membership 
in  and  integration  into  regional  transmission  organizations;  accounting  pronounce-
ments periodically issued by accounting standard-setting bodies; the performance of 
AEP’s  pension  and  other  post-retirement  benefit  plans;  prices  for  power  that  AEP 
generates  and  sell  at  wholesale;  changes  in  technology,  particularly  with  respect  to 
new,  developing  or  alternative  sources  of  generation;  other  risks  and  unforeseen 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

34 

events,  including  wars,  the  effects  of  terrorism  (including  increased  security  costs), 
embargoes and other catastrophic events. 

Background: American Electric Power’s Actions to Address Climate 
Change GHG Reduction Commitment 

American  Electric  Power  (AEP)  was  the  first  and  largest  U.S.  utility  to  join  the 
Chicago Climate Exchange (CCX) and make a legally binding commitment to gradu-
ally  reduce  or  offset  its  greenhouse  gas  emissions  to  6  percent  below  the  average 
of 1998–2001 emission levels by 2010. 

As  a  founding  member  of  CCX,  AEP  committed  in  2003  to  reduce  or  offset  its 
emissions gradually to 4 percent below the average of 1998–2001 emission levels by 
2006  (1  percent  reduction  in  2003,  2  percent  in  2004,  3  percent  in  2005  and  4  per-
cent  in  2006).  In  August  2005,  AEP  expanded  and  extended  its  commitment  to  a 
6 percent reduction below the same baseline by 2010 (4.25 percent in 2007, 4.5 per-
cent  in  2008,  5  percent  in  2009  and  6  percent  in  2010).  Through  this  commitment, 
AEP expects to reduce or offset approximately 46 million metric tons of greenhouse 
gas emissions. 
Operational Improvements 

AEP  has  been  able  to  reduce  its  carbon  dioxide  (CO2)  emissions  by  improving 
plant  efficiency  for  its  fossil-fueled  plants  through  routine  maintenance  and  invest-
ments  like  turbine  blade  enhancements  (installing  new  turbine  blades)  and  steam 
path replacements that improve the overall heat rate of a plant and, in turn, reduce 
CO2 emissions.  A  one-percent  improvement  in  AEP’s  overall  fleet  efficiency  can  re-
duce the company’s greenhouse gas emissions by 2 million metric tons per year. 

AEP has also reduced its CO2 emissions by improving the performance and avail-
ability  of  its  nuclear  generation.  AEP’s  D.C.  Cook  Nuclear  Plant  in  Michigan  set 
plant  records  for  generation  and  capacity  factor  in  2005.  The  plant  had  a  capacity 
factor  (energy  generated  as  compared  to  the  maximum  possible)  of  96.8  percent  in 
2005  and  generated  17,471  gigawatt-hours  (GWH)  of  electricity.  Additionally,  AEP 
will  invest  $45  million  to  replace  turbine  motors  in  one  unit  at  D.C.  Cook  in  2006, 
which will increase that unit’s output by 41 megawatts. 

As  a  member  of  the  U.S.  EPA’s  Sulfur  Hexafluoride  (SF6)  Emissions  Reduction 
Partnership for Electric Power Systems, AEP has significantly reduced emissions of 
SF6, an extremely potent greenhouse gas, from 1999 levels of 19,778 pounds (a leak-
age rate of 10 percent) to 2004 emissions of 1,962 pounds (a leakage rate of 0.5 per-
cent). 
Managing Forests and Agricultural Lands for Carbon Sequestration 

To reduce carbon dioxide (CO2) concentrations in the global atmosphere, AEP has 
invested more than $27 million in terrestrial sequestration projects designed to con-
serve  and  reforest  sensitive  areas  and  offset  more  than  20  million  metric  tons  of 
CO2 over the next 40 years. These projects include protecting nearly 4 million acres 
of threatened rainforest in Bolivia, restoring and protecting 20,000 acres of degraded 
or  deforested  tropical  Atlantic  rainforest  in  Brazil,  reforesting  nearly  10,000  acres 
of  the  Mississippi  River  Valley  in  Louisiana  with  bottomland  hardwoods,  restoring 
and  protecting  forest  areas  in  the  Sierra  Madres  of  Guatemala,  and  planting  trees 
on 23,000 acres of company-owned land. 
Deploying Technology for Clean Coal Generation 

AEP  is  focused  on  developing  and  deploying  new  technology  that  will  reduce  the 
emissions,  including  greenhouse  gas  emissions,  of  future  coal-based  power  genera-
tion. AEP announced in August 2004 its plans to build commercial-scale integrated 
gasification  combined  cycle  (IGCC)  plants  to  demonstrate  the  viability  of  this  tech-
nology  for  future  use  of  coal  in  generating  electricity.  AEP  has  filed  for  regulatory 
approval  in  Ohio  and  West  Virginia  to  build  a  629-megawatt  IGCC  plant  in  each 
of these states. The plants are scheduled to be operational in the 2010 to 2011 time-
frame and will be designed to accommodate retrofit of technology to capture and se-
quester CO2 emissions. 
Developing Technology for CO2 Capture and Storage 

AEP’s  Mountaineer  Plant  in  New  Haven,  W.Va.,  is  the  site  of  a  $4.2  million  car-
bon  sequestration  research  project  funded  by  the  U.S.  Department  of  Energy,  the 
Ohio Coal Development Office, and a consortium of public and private sector partici-
pants.  Scientists  from  Battelle  Memorial  Institute  lead  this  climate  change  mitiga-
tion research project, which is designed to obtain data required to better understand 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

35 

and  test  the  capability  of  deep  saline  aquifers  for  storage  of  carbon  dioxide  emis-
sions from power plants. 

AEP  is  a  member  of  the  FutureGen  Alliance,  who,  along  with  the  Department  of 
Energy,  will  build  ‘‘FutureGen,’’  a  $1  billion,  near-zero  emission  plant  to  produce 
electricity  and  hydrogen  from  coal  while  capturing  and  disposing  of  carbon  dioxide 
in geologic formations. 

Additionally,  AEP  funds  research  coordinated  by  the  Massachusetts  Institute  of 
Technology  Energy  Laboratory  and  the  Electric  Power  Research  Institute  that  is 
evaluating  the  environmental  impacts,  technological  approaches,  and  economic 
issues  associated  with  carbon  sequestration.  The  MIT  research  specifically  focuses 
on efforts to better understand and reduce the cost of carbon separation and seques-
tration. 
Renewable Energy and Clean Power 

AEP  strongly  supports  increased  renewable  energy  sources  to  help  meet  our  Na-
tion’s  energy  needs.  AEP  is  one  of  the  larger  generators  and  distributors  of  wind 
energy  in  the  United  States,  operating  311  megawatts  (MW)  of  wind  generation  in 
Texas.  The  company  also  purchases  and  distributes  an  additional  373.5  megawatts 
of  wind  generation  from  wind  facilities  in  Oklahoma  and  Texas.  Additionally,  AEP 
operates  2,285  megawatts  of  nuclear  generation  and  884  megawatts  of  hydro  and 
pumped storage generation. 

More than 125 schools participate in AEP’s ‘‘Learning From Light’’ and ‘‘Watts on 
Schools’’  programs.  Through  these  programs,  AEP  partners  with  learning  institu-
tions  to  install  1  kW  solar  photovoltaic  systems,  and  uses  these  systems  to  track 
energy  use  and  demonstrate  how  solar  energy  is  a  part  of  the  total  energy  mix. 
Similarly,  AEP’s  ‘‘Learning  From  Wind’’  program  installs  small-scale  wind  turbines 
to  provide  wind  power  education  and  renewable  energy  research  at  educational  in-
stitutions. 
Biomass Energy 

Until  the  company  sold  the  plants  in  2004,  AEP  co-fired  biomass  in  4,000  MW 
of  coal-based  power  generation  in  the  United  Kingdom  (Fiddler’s  Ferry  and  Ferry 
Bridge). AEP has been evaluating and testing biomass co-firing for its smaller coal- 
fired  power  plants  in  the  United  States  to  evaluate  potential  reductions  in  CO2 
emission levels. 
Energy Conservation and Energy Efficiency 

AEP is implementing ‘‘Energy Efficiency Plans’’ to offset 10 percent of the annual 
energy  demand  growth  in  its  Texas  service  territory.  In  2003  alone,  AEP  invested 
more  than  $8  million  to  achieve  over  47  million  kilowatt-hours  (kWh)  of  reductions 
from installation of energy efficiency measures in customers’ homes and businesses. 
Total investments for the four-year program will exceed $43 million, achieving more 
than 247 million kWh of energy efficiency gains. 
2005 EPA Climate Protection Award 

In  May  2005,  the  EPA  selected  AEP  to  receive  a  2005  Climate  Protection  Award 
for  demonstrating  ingenuity,  leadership  and  public  purpose  in  its  efforts  to  reduce 
greenhouse  gases.  EPA  began  the  Climate  Protection  Awards  program  in  1998  to 
recognize outstanding efforts to protect the Earth’s climate. 

Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Rencheck,  we  appre-

ciate that. 

Mr. Wilson? 

STATEMENT OF JOHN M. WILSON, 

CHIEF OPERATING OFFICER, 

SIEMENS ENVIRONMENTAL SYSTEMS AND SERVICES 

Mr.  WILSON.  Thank  you  very  much.  Greetings,  Chairman  Kerry, 

and the Committee. 

My  name  is  John  Wilson,  I  am  the  Chief  Operating  Officer  for 
Siemens  Environmental  Systems  and  Services.  It’s  a  company  cre-
ated out of a 90-year-old air pollution control business. 

I’m really pleased to be able to give the overall presentation from 

the practical side for air pollution control here for clean coal. 

Today  I’m  speaking  on  behalf  of  Siemens  power  generation,  it’s 
a $10 billion organization, part of the $100 billion global infrastruc-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

36 

in  the 

ture supplier. And, what I’d like to do, is really like to let you know 
about Siemens Power Generation first. 

We’ve  basically  grown  by  consolidating  many  of  the  well-known 
industry—Westinghouse,  Wheelabrator, 
companies  out 
Bonus Energy, as well as the industrial turbine business of Alstom. 
And  what  we  invest  right  now,  every  year,  is  about  $600  million 
a  year  in  R&D  in  the  energy  sector,  so  we’re  fully  vested  in  this 
energy sector. 

Siemens  recognizes  that  clean  coal  doesn’t  have  to  be  an 
oxymoron,  either,  because  that’s  our  business.  We  basically  focus 
on the safe environmental use of coal today, and in the future. 

So,  what  we’ve  done,  is  we  basically  participate  with  DOE  and 
bring  our  expertise  to  funding  on  clean  coal  technology  programs 
like  the  hydrogen  fuel  gas  turbine,  like  CO2 separation  tech-
nologies,  membrane  technologies,  oxy-fuel  combustion,  and  ultra 
supercritical steam turbines. So we participate in that, all of these 
efforts  because  we  believe  that  coal  is  going  to  be  a  part  of  our 
global  future.  As  you  mentioned,  it’s  50  percent  today,  in  terms  of 
electricity  generation,  growing  to  60  percent  by  2030,  according  to 
the Energy Administration. 

So,  that’s  325,000  megawatts,  essentially,  of  installed  base  out 
there that’s already operating—it’s not going to go away—that’s ba-
sically  going  to  be  there  in  providing  our  needs.  It  take  decades, 
essentially  for  these  plants  to  amortize  their  value,  and  my  busi-
ness  is  actually  focused  on  cleaning  up  the  emissions  at  these 
plants. 

We fundamentally are now in a boom, where we have State regu-
latory  commissions,  with  consent  decrees  that  are  forcing  higher 
levels of emissions controls on the existing plants. And so, what we 
see  today,  is  that  with  the  appropriate  engineering  design,  we’re 
able  to  design  emissions  control  systems  that  basically  are  on  par 
with the proposed IGCC plants that are out there today. 

There’s  a  real  potential  for  improvement,  essentially,  out  there 
today  in  the  existing  fleet,  because  we  see  the  opportunity  and  ca-
pability to retrofit these plants with additional controls that aren’t 
deployed today. If you want to permit a new plant today, you have 
to  have  a  full  suite  of  environmental  controls  for  a  new  source  re-
view, but fundamentally, the existing plants that are out there are 
not necessarily all compliant with that, and they’re just now being 
upgraded. 

So,  with  the  fact  that  there’s  a  lot  of  technology  out  there,  we 
also  focus—as  we’ve  said—across  the  whole  technology  spectrum— 
gasification  and  gas-turbine  technology  for  IGCC,  emissions  con-
trol,  and  ultra  supercritical  combustion  based  technologies.  So,  we 
provide  essentially  whatever  the  market  asks  for  in  terms  of  tech-
nology. 

But  clearly  efficiency,  or  CO2 avoidance,  is  superior  to  CO2 cap-
ture—either post-combustion or pre-combustion. So, we see the effi-
ciency  improvements  in  the  existing  fleet  as  one  of  the  areas  that 
we could look at. Because, clearly, with the average fleet efficiency 
of  33  percent—and  now  plant  technologies  that  are  in  excess  of  40 
percent efficient—there’s a great deal of improvement potential for 
the existing fleet, both in emissions and also in efficiency. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

37 

Gasification  is  a  real  option,  too.  Basically,  Siemens  has  over 
320,000  hours  of  operation  on  gasification  (or  integrated  gasifi-
cation combined cycle) plants around the world. We’ve also recently 
acquired  one  of  the  leading  gasification  technologies.  This  tech-
nology  is  very  favorable  and  works  very  well  on  Western  coals, 
higher  moisture  coals  and  lower-quality  coals.  So,  we’re  also  part 
of the overall gasification technology business. 

But  clearly  the  CO2 policy  issue  not  only  involves  important  ad-
vanced  technology  questions  but  also  the  ultimate  cost  to  the  con-
sumer  and  the  economy.  For  example,  current  estimates  suggest 
that  CO2 capture  and  storage  will  add  several  cents  a  kilowatt  to 
existing utility bills. 

So,  fundamentally,  Siemens  believes  that  the  long-term  storage 
of  carbon,  is  one  of  the  critical  areas—that  we  have  to  focus  on  in 
the regulatory environment. 

So,  in  closing,  I  want  to  make  it  clear  that  there  are  existing 
technologies  out  there  today  to  make  the  coal,  much  cleaner  coal 
and  that  we  are  providers  of  most  of  these  technologies.  In  addi-
tion,  we’d  like  to  see  further  R&D  development  across  the  suite  of 
technologies  because  there  is  no  clear  ‘‘winner’’  technology  today. 
We  need  investment  and  demonstration  programs  in  all  of  these 
technologies  because  it  takes  years  to  prove  out  the  right  tech-
nology and the right application. We also support the development 
of  industry-wide  performance-based/efficiency-based  standards  as 
well  as  a  reevaluation  of  the  new  source  rules.  These  changes 
would  facilitate  the  deployment  of  newer,  more  advanced  coal- 
based  technologies  which  would  result  in  improved  environmental 
performance, including CO2. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Wilson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN M. WILSON, CHIEF OPERATING OFFICER, SIEMENS 

ENVIRONMENTAL SYSTEMS AND SERVICES 

Greetings,  Chairman  Kerry  and  Ranking  Member  Ensign  and  Subcommittee 
members.  My  name  is  John  Wilson;  I  am  the  Chief  Operating  Officer  of  Siemens’ 
Environmental Systems and Services business unit which was created out of a com-
pany with over 90 years of experience in air pollution control technology. I am hon-
ored  to  be  here  today  to  discuss  the  current  state  of  clean  coal  technology  from  an 
infrastructure suppliers’ perspective. 

Today I am speaking primarily on behalf of the power generation business at Sie-
mens. For the last several years, I was the vice president of strategy for the Power 
Generation  Group,  headquartered  in  Orlando,  Florida,  and  Erlangen  Germany, 
which  is  a  10  billion  dollar  segment  of  Siemens  100  billion  dollar  global  infrastruc-
ture business. 

Before  I  speak  specifically  to  clean  coal  issues,  I’d  like  to  direct  the  Subcommit-
tee’s  attention  to  a  unique  global  project  and  recently  published  report  entitled 
‘‘Megacity  Challenges’’  that  is  based  upon  research  conducted  by  two  independent 
organizations with the support of Siemens. The goal of the project was to carry out 
research  at  the  megacity  level  to  gather  data  as  well  as  perspectives  from  mayors, 
city administrators and other experts on infrastructure challenges, like energy sup-
ply and delivery systems, in which this Subcommittee takes great interest. Over 500 
public  and  private  sector  experts  from  25  cities  were  interviewed.  The  results  were 
fascinating, including the projection that by 2030 over 60 percent of the world’s pop-
ulation will live in cities. The key megatrends identified in this report that are guid-
ing  Siemens’  priorities  are:  healthcare  challenges,  urbanization  and  associated  mo-
bility  challenges,  scarcity  of  clean  and  reliable  natural  resources  such  as  clean  air 
and  water,  and  reliable  energy  supplies.  Siemens  has  been  investing  in  the  tech-
nologies  that  address  these  massive  shifts  that  are  driving  the  current  and  future 
needs  of  society.  In  addition  to  the  energy  infrastructure  technologies  that  I  will 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

38 

focus  upon  today,  other  examples  of  our  forward-looking  technologies  include  effi-
cient  lighting,  automation  and  controls,  intelligent  traffic  controls,  water  purifi-
cation and efficient technologies for buildings and rapid transit. 

Siemens’ power generation business has grown to its current size by consolidating 
some  of  the  best  known  names  in  the  power  generation  industry,  such  as  Westing-
house, KWU, Parsons, Wheelabrator, Bonus Energy, and the Alstom industrial tur-
bine business. Our technology portfolio in this business sector is comprehensive, and 
we will invest over $600 million in research and development in the next fiscal year 
in  technology  enhancements  that  will  improve  both  efficiency  and  overall  perform-
ance. 

Siemens  recognizes  that  clean  coal  does  not  have  to  be  an  oxymoron,  because 
there  are  many  technologies  that  can  facilitate  the  safe  environmental  use  of  coal, 
both  today,  and  into  the  future,  as  an  integral  part  of  a  balanced  energy  supply 
portfolio. As part of our strategy, we have been working jointly with the Department 
of  Energy  on  several  key  efficiency  and  CO2 capture  technologies  which  will  play 
a role in the continued use of coal. Areas of cooperative research include: 

• Development  of  hydrogen  fueled  gas  turbines  for  gasification  plants,  possibly 
one approach for reducing the carbon footprint of power generation (FutureGen 
Alliance); 
• Ion Transport Membrane (ITM) for improved efficiency in gas separation.1 Effi-
cient, low cost gas separation is a key enabling technology as part of a CO2 miti-
gation strategy; 
• Oxy-Fuel Turbine: This is a new turbine design that capitalizes on advances in 
gas  separation  and  hydrogen  turbine  design,  providing  a  unique  pathway  for 
CO2 separation, and ultimately, CO2 sequestration; 
• USC  (ultra  supercritical)  steam  turbine  materials—developing  better  materials 

for more efficient, higher temperature and pressure steam turbines. 

The continued usage of coal will be an integral part of any solution in power gen-
eration  in  our  lifetimes,  because  coal  currently  provides  50  percent  of  the  United 
States’  generation  needs.  According  to  the  Energy  Information  Agency,  this  usage 
will  grow  to  almost  60  percent  by  2030.  Compare  this  demand  trend  to  that  for  re-
newable  energy,  which,  excluding  hydropower,  makes  up  a  little  more  than  2  per-
cent of capacity in the United States. For some of the world’s largest economies, coal 
represents  the  dominant  domestic  energy  resource.  Today,  Siemens’  generating 
equipment  provides  over  25  percent  of  electricity  worldwide,  and  we  also  provide 
services to our customers to maintain and upgrade their equipment. 

The  United  States’  fleet  of  325,000  megawatts  of  coal-fired  generating  capacity 
was  built  over  generations,  and  cannot  be  replaced  quickly.  Unlike  commodities  or 
consumer goods, power plants are massive in scale, take years to build, and require 
decades to recover their costs. Economics and regulatory requirements demand that 
we  efficiently  extract  the  most  energy  from  this  installed  base.  Currently,  in  the 
United  States,  the  average  age  of  a  coal-fired  power  plant  exceeds  40  years  (and  is 
increasing). 
SOX, Mercury, NOX and Particulate Matter 

Today  with  appropriate  engineering  design,  we  can  routinely  reduce  criteria  pol-
lutants from these existing power plants by 90 percent compared to an uncontrolled 
power plant; for some pollutants 99 percent reduction is the norm. Modern air pollu-
tion control technologies that are readily available today, with no substantial invest-
ment  in  research  and  development,  can  reduce  emissions  of  criteria  pollutants  from 
any  coal-fired  plant  to  levels  that  are  projected  to  be  achieved  by  integrated  gasifi-
cation combined cycle (IGCC) plants. The attached table in Appendix One compares 
the performance of retrofit air pollution controls to IGCC performance. Even though 
the  performance  is  basically  the  same  at  this  point,  Siemens  recognizes  the  need 
to  invest  in  multiple  technological  pathways,  and  so  Siemens  not  only  provides  the 
technology for the world’s highest efficiency supercritical steam power plants, along 
with  total  emissions  controls,  it  also  has  gas  turbines  and  gasification  technology 
for IGCC plants (to be discussed later herein). 

Although substantial fossil fuel plant upgrades are available, in fact very little of 
the  fleet  has  the  emissions  control  that  would  be  required  for  a  new  power  plant. 
For example, while most units have particulate controls, about one-third of capacity 
has  SO2 scrubbers,  most  have  low-NOX burners,  and  only  one-third  of  the  capacity 
in  the  Eastern  United  States  has  advanced  NOX controls.2 Our  business  in  retro-

1 A cooperative venture with Air Products, Inc. 
2 Recent communication with U.S. EPA 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

39 

fitting SO2 air pollution controls to existing plants has recently boomed in the U.S., 
with many states regulating existing units under consent decrees. 

Today,  all  new  plants  will  include  either  wet  or  dry  flue  gas  desulphurization  as 
required  by  the  Clean  Air  Act  Amendments.  Trading  in  SO2 credits  is  an  incentive 
for the implementation of new, high efficiency flue gas desulphurization (FGD) sys-
tems.  FGD  systems  also  efficiently  recycle  the  sulfates  extracted  from  the  process 
streams.  Over  90  percent  of  the  sulfates  extracted  from  FGDs  are  recycled  for  use 
as  wallboard  in  the  construction  industry.  The  largest  single-stage  FGD  system  in 
the  United  States  utilizes  Siemens  technology,  and  was  installed  at  the  Big  Bend 
Plant near Tampa, Florida. 

In addition to sulfur, burning coal can generate a great deal of particulate matter, 
or dust. The technology of capturing dust has been available for decades as electro-
static  precipitators—or  bag  houses—that  have  been  widely  applied  in  the  power 
generation  sector.  According  to  the  American  Coal  Ash  Association,  nearly  71  mil-
lion  tons  of  fly  ash  is  collected  today,  with  over  40  percent  of  this  is  recycled  for 
uses in concrete products, cement, and agriculture. 

More recently, small particulate matter and aerosols less than 2.5 microns in size 
have  been  identified  as  serious  health  hazards,  and  therefore,  to  meet  even  tighter 
ambient  air  quality  standards,  there  has  been  a  renewed  interest  in  improving  the 
performance of these emission control devices. Siemens emissions control technology 
products  include  wet  electrostatic  precipitator  (WESP)  designs  that  can  meet  the 
most  stringent  requirements.  WESPs  and  bag  house  filtration  systems  can  yield 
greater  than  99  percent  particulate  capture  and  achieve  compliance  with  the  most 
stringent air quality requirements. 

Mercury  is  a  unique  chemical  element  exhibiting  no  health  benefits  at  any  con-
centration (lead is another); mercury can damage the central nervous system, endo-
crine  system,  kidneys,  and  other  organs.  In  the  United  States,  mercury  has  been 
identified  as  a  hazardous  air  pollutant  to  be  regulated.  Today,  coal  plants  in  the 
United  States  emit  between  30  and  50  tons  of  mercury  per  year.  Siemens  provides 
technology  to  capture  mercury,  incorporating  some  of  the  same  design  features  for 
particulate capture. 

NOX, which contributes to visible smog and is a respiratory health concern, is also 
emitted  from  automobiles  and  is  one  of  the  more  challenging  pollutants  to  control 
because  it  is  formed  from  the  nitrogen  and  oxygen  in  the  atmosphere  at  high  heat. 
Several technologies are now available for NOX control, including third- and fourth- 
generation low NOX burners that minimize the creation of NOX, and selective cata-
lytic  reduction  technologies,  or  multi-pollutant  technologies,  that  convert  NOX back 
to  stable  nitrogen  and  water  vapor.  Siemens  offers  new,  advanced  burner  designs 
to reach 75 percent NOX reduction compared to uncontrolled emissions, and can pro-
vide  advanced  catalysts,  or  multi-pollutant  technology,  to  reduce  NOX by  over  95 
percent. 
Carbon Dioxide and Other Greenhouse Gases 

Any  fossil  fuel  used  in  any  application  will  have  CO2 emissions  associated  with 
the  process.  Because  of  CO2’s  potential  role  in  global  warming,  reducing  or  miti-
gating  emissions  is  a  central  strategy  for  Siemens.  Siemens  offer  the  tools  to  man-
age  all  the  emissions  from  power  plants.  And  while  emissions  of  CO2 are  linked  to 
climate change, other emissions including methane and particulates are also factors 
of concern for climate change. The technology to address emissions of criteria pollut-
ants that impact climate change (NOX, CH4, particulates) are available as described 
above. 

Carbon  dioxide,  however,  is  radically  different.  None  of  the  current  capture  tech-
nologies that are used for the priority pollutants can be directly applied to CO2 cap-
ture.  The  best  way  today  to  address  the  reduction  of  CO2 in  the  power  generation 
fleet is the same as for automobiles, by essentially increasing the output of the fleet 
without  increasing  the  fuel  used.  The  current  United  States  fossil  fleet  operates  at 
approximately 33 percent efficiency (with the remainder of that energy lost as heat 
to the environment). If we could improve that fleet efficiency by even just 1 percent-
age  point,  we  could  reduce  CO2 emissions  by  50  million  tons  per  year,  with  no  loss 
in  net  generation.  The  most  efficient  coal  plants  today  can  reach  well  over  40  per-
cent  efficiency,  and  if  the  entire  United  States  fleet  were  operating  at  that  effi-
ciency,  nearly  one-quarter  of  the  CO2 emissions  from  power  generation  would  be 
eliminated.3 Siemens  offers  advanced  technology  to  improve  the  efficiency  of  any 

3 Approximately  500  million  tons  of  CO2 reduction  if  the  fossil  fleet  were  to  operate  at  42.5 

percent efficiency. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

40 

power  plant,  thus  indirectly  reducing  the  CO2 generated  for  each  unit  of  electricity 
produced. 
Integrated Gasification Combined Cycle (IGCC) 

As an alternative to the discussed technologies to capture emissions post-combus-
tion, some of the next generation of clean coal power plants are proposing pre-com-
bustion coal gasification to capture these same pollutants during the fuel processing 
steps.  The  most  desirable  part  of  the  fuel  is  the  energy  content  in  the  form  of  CO 
and  hydrogen,  which  is  extracted  in  gasification,  leaving  behind  most  of  the  pollut-
ants.  Siemens  offers  gasification  for  applications  such  as  power  generation  (IGCC) 
as well as for production of synthetic fuels. 

Siemens  has  demonstrated  320,000  hours  of  gas  turbine  operation  with  gasifi-
cation processes at scales ranging from 8 MW to over 300 MW. Our current product 
strategy is to provide a 630 MW IGCC plant here in the United States. To broaden 
its  portfolio  in  this  sector,  Siemens  recently  acquired  one  of  the  longest  dem-
onstrated  and  commercially  offered  technologies  for  gasification  for  the  production 
of  petrochemical  liquids  or  for  conversion  to  synthetic  natural  gas,  and  for  power 
generation applications. 

The DOE clean coal initiative has focused on pre-combustion capture of emissions, 
along with CO2 capture. The debate on pre-combustion versus post-combustion cap-
ture has now fully developed, with the industry planning demonstration projects for 
both technologies underway. One feature of gasification is that carbon can be effec-
tively extracted from the concentrated high pressure gas stream leaving the gasifier, 
resulting in reduced energy losses and less adverse impact on the cost of electricity. 
Post-combustion capture operates similarly using solvents, like an amine, or ammo-
nia, to capture the CO2 from the exhaust gases at much lower pressures, after they 
have had all the other pollutants removed. Neither of these processes has been com-
mercially  demonstrated  on  a  full-scale  power  generation  facility,  however  we  are 
working to demonstrate this application on existing power plants. 

Nearly  every  scenario  we  have  explored  reveals  that  all  CO2 recovery  comes  at 
a  cost  of  energy,  sometimes  substantial  amounts  of  energy.  Increased  research, 
along with demonstration projects are needed to find ways to reduce the energy in-
tensity  of  CO2 capture  and  removal  for  both  pre-combustion  and  post-combustion 
capture.  Equally  important,  we  must  also  resolve  the  issue  of  carbon  storage,  be-
cause if there is no long-term storage for the carbon, then CO2 capture and recovery 
is  moot.  We  agree  with  the  MIT  study,  The  Future  of  Coal,  that  CO2 Capture  and 
Storage  (CCS)  is  ‘‘the  critical  enabling  technology  that  would  reduce  CO2 emissions 
significantly while also allowing coal to meet the world’s pressing energy needs’’. 

As an Original Equipment Manufacturer (OEM), we are also aware that our cus-
tomers  and  end-users  are  sometimes  reluctant  to  upgrade  or  repair  facilities  to  im-
prove  plant  efficiency  which  may  trigger  new  reviews.  Output-based  efficiency 
standards  could  be  used  as  a  tool  to  encourage  upgrades  and  to  improve  environ-
mental  and  output  performance.  Such  an  approach  has  been  used  for  gas  turbine 
emission  regulations  in  the  recent  New  Source  Performance  Standards  updated  in 
February 2005. 

To  close,  Siemens  believes  that  there  are  currently  many  technologies  to  provide 
the Nation with cleaner coal power generation, and that what is needed is a mean-
ingful commitment from the Government to encourage greater efficiencies. We urge 
increased  support  for  research,  development  and  deployment  of  more  efficient  end- 
use technologies, low or zero-emitting technologies, and cost effective carbon capture 
and  storage  technologies.  We  also  urge  support  for  incentives  to  encourage  private 
sector risk taking for the development and deployment of these technologies. 

APPENDIX ONE 

Comparison of Retrofit Projects and IGCC 

Units 

Recent AQCS 

IGCC 

% Removal 
Lb/MMBtu 
Lb/MMBtu 
Lb/MMBtu 
Lb/MMBtu 
% Removal 
Lb/MMBtu 
Lb/TBTu 
Lb/TBTu 

95–99 
0.03–0.18 
0.010–0.015 
0.015–0.03 
0.00001–0.003 
97–98 
0.00001–0.00026 

99 
0.03 
0.011 
0.011 
0.0006 
95 
N/A 
0.28–2.2  0.56–0.74 
0.9–16.2 
10.2 

Parameter 

SO2 
SO2 
PM 
PM10 
HCL 
HCL 
HF 
Mercury 
Lead 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

41 

Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Wilson,  very,  very  much.  I  ap-
preciate that. I want to follow up with you on some of the tech no-
tions that you just put forward. 

But, before I do, let me try to get the big picture here a little bit 
if we can. I thought one of the most important points put forward, 
you’ve  all  talked  about  the  technology  that’s  out  there,  we’ve  got 
technology,  but  the  big  question  is,  how  to  sequester?  Big  ques-
tion—how  to  capture  carbon?  And  what  we  can  do  to  do  that  rap-
idly. 

The  date,  2020,  rang  a  bell.  This  is  an  issue  where  you  kind  of 
can’t  be  half-pregnant.  If  you  believe  the  scientists,  I  assume  you 
all accept, you’re all accepting the science, or are you simply doing 
this  because  you  see  it  coming?  Let  me  just  establish  that  as  a 
front  line.  Do  you  accept  the  science  on  global  climate  change,  Mr. 
Chaisson? 

Mr. CHAISSON. Yes. 
Senator KERRY. Mr. Denis? 
Mr. DENIS. Yes. 
Senator KERRY. Dr. McRae? 
Dr. MCRAE. Yes. 
Senator KERRY. Mr. Rencheck? 
Mr. RENCHECK. Yes. 
Mr. WILSON. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  OK.  So,  if  you  accept  the  science,  and  you  have 
2,000-plus  scientists  from  around  the  globe,  including  some  of, 
what we consider to be our smart folks, from Jim Hansen and John 
Holdren,  Ed  Miles,  Bob  Correll,  others,  all  coming  together,  and  if 
those  scientists  are  telling  us,  with  alarm,  that  the  indicators  that 
they see are moving more rapidly, and with greater impact, species 
movement  already  showing  up,  millions  of  acres  of  forest  with  bug 
infestation  that  didn’t  used  to  exist  because  they’d  die,  because  of 
the  cold,  now  they  don’t.  No  ducks  for  hunting  in  South  Carolina 
or  Arkansas,  because  migratory  patterns  have  changed—I  mean, 
you run the list. All of the feedback is coming back faster, ice melt-
ing,  et  cetera,  et  cetera,  et  cetera.  Question  marks  about  oceans 
currents’ impact on climate, all of these things. 

So,  here  you  are,  you’ve  got  the  science,  and  those  same  sci-
entists are telling us, ‘‘You’ve got a 10-year window,’’ to get on the 
track where you’re able to get the 3.2 reduction you need going out 
to  2050,  or  if  you  don’t  get  3.2  percent,  you’re  going  to  have  to  get 
a much higher percentage faster in out-years. 

To  know  whether  or  not  we  can  capture  or  have  capture  online 
by  2020  or  sometime  seems  unacceptable  when  measured  against 
the  10-year  window.  Can  you  speak  to  that?  Let  me  throw  one 
other ingredient out there. Back when we negotiated the Clean Air 
Act in 1990, I was part of those negotiations and we were working 
to  put  the  SO2,  acid  rain  provisions  in.  The  industry  came  in,  and 
everybody said, ‘‘Oh, we can’t do this, it’s going to take us 10 years, 
it’s going to cost eight billion bucks, don’t make us do it, you’ll kill 
the industry.’’ The environmental community said, ‘‘No, no, no, it’s 
not going to take 8 years, it’s going to take 4 years, it’ll cost about 
$4 billion, and we must do it, we can afford it.’’ 

To  the  credit  of  George  Herbert  Walker  Bush,  Bill  Reilly,  and 
John  Sununu,  we  did  it.  They  bought  the  science,  they  said,  ‘‘We 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

42 

have to do it.’’ Guess what? It took half the time that the environ-
mental community thought it would, and half the money. Why? Be-
cause  nobody  was  capable  of  predicting  what  happens  once  you 
make the Federal commitment, once you create the standard, once 
you have moved all of these industries toward a now-existing mar-
ketplace. And nobody is able to predict the rapidity with which the 
technology then takes over and provides you with something. 

Aren’t  we  in  that  kind  of  situation  here,  folks?  Where  we’ve  got 
to  put  up  whatever  we  think  it  takes  for  those  demonstration 
projects, for the tax credit, for the science, and guarantee we’re set-
ting a goal, and we’ve got to get this done within 10 years. I’d like 
everybody to comment. 

Mr. CHAISSON. Certainly. I mean, I think that from our perspec-
tive,  the  issue  here  is,  how  do  you  transition  from  where  we  are 
today,  to  where  you  need  to  be  in  2020?  And  I  guess,  our  view 
would  be  that  you  need  a  suite  of  policies,  no  one  policy  will  do  it. 
On a national scale, requiring that all new coal plants have car-
bon capture and sequestration wherever they might be located, and 
having  the  knowledge  to  do  nationwide  geologic  sequestration  is 
probably something that’s going to take 10 years—perhaps 2018. 

There has been a lot of expert testimony presented in the Energy 
Committee or whatever, about the geologic demonstration projects. 
In the short-term, you have a lot of companies like BP and others, 
I’m  sure  several  of  the  folks  pursuing  IGCC  projects  today  would 
be perfectly happy to do carbon capture early, in carefully selected 
situations, with financial incentives to, to support the cost of doing 
that.  Given  the  recent  run-up  in  energy  project  costs,  we’re  going 
to  need  to  see  CO2 allowance  prices  somewhere  in  the  $40  a  ton 
range to actually offset the cost of adding carbon capture and stor-
age, so the third piece we need is an effective carbon cap and trade 
system,  but  it’s  going  to  take  awhile  for  that  to  ramp  up  to  $40. 
So,  from  our  view,  the  complementary  policies  would  be,  first  of 
all,  financial  incentives  for  the  companies  willing  to  move  right 
now—and  I  think  we’d  find  that  many  would  be  willing  to  move 
right now—that would cover the cost of carbon capture and storage 
between their plants starting up, and us eventually getting to, say, 
$40 a ton of CO2 with a cap and trade system. 

A  second  piece  would  be  something  along  the  lines  of  your  pro-
posed  legislation,  Senator  Kerry—an  absolute  date  by  which  all 
new  coal  plants  will  simply  have  to  have  carbon  capture  and  stor-
age—that  puts  people  on  notice  today,  their  behavior  will  change 
based on that, and that will be a date certain, rather than a ques-
tionable date as to when, when we might reach $40 a ton. But be-
hind all that, I think the foundation is, an effective carbon cap and 
trade  system,  which  will  eventually  drive  prices  sufficient  to  offset 
any need for financial support. 

Senator KERRY. Anybody else? 
Mr. DENIS. Certainly, Senator. 
Certainly, like yourself, I wish we could have this tomorrow, and 
not  10  years  from  now.  But,  I  believe  that  we  do  have  to  be  real-
istic  in  the  timeframe  that  it  takes  to  develop—not  only  the  tech-
nology,  but  to  be  able  to  establish  the  framework  under  which  we 
can store the carbon that is going to be sequestered. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

43 

I  have  to  observe  that,  really,  the  focus  really  should  be  on  the 
development  of  technology—whether  it’s  1  year,  2  years,  10  years 
or  twelve  years.  You  know,  yesterday,  the  DOE  even  said  it  was 
2045,  which  I  believe  it’s  a  date  that’s  unacceptable  to  everybody. 
Nevertheless,  the  development  of  technology  really  needs  to  move 
forward. And the reason I say—— 

Senator  KERRY.  What  if  we  can’t  capture  it?  What  if  we  can’t 
store  it?  What  if  you  can’t  find  a  sufficient  storage  capacity,  it 
leaks, or it’s just too costly or geologically problematic? 

Mr. DENIS. That is problematical, and that is a quandary that we 
have. However, I do believe that current research has it that there 
can be found some geological structures where the carbon, the CO2 
can be stored. 

It  is  not  in  all  parts  of  the  country.  There  are  some  parts  of  the 
country that are unsuitable for this, so we need to talk about infra-
structure that may be needed to transport such CO2 to those areas 
that are geologically safe. 

Senator  KERRY.  Obviously  we  can’t  store  it  in  some  places,  be-
cause  we’re  using  it  now  to  push  fuel.  We  actually  tap  into  natu-
rally produced CO2 in order to improve our capture of oil out of old 
wells  and  things,  so  I  assume,  I  don’t  know  what  the  amount  is, 
but I know there’s a sufficient capacity. 

Mr. DENIS. And we have to deal with the liability loss associated 

with such capture, and Congress needs to address that, also. 

But, one of the reasons I say we really need to address the tech-
nology  is,  because  the  focus,  and  our  discussion  centers  around 
coal. But we really can’t overlook the fact that a modern gas plant 
produces  50  percent  of  the  carbon  dioxide  that  a  coal  plant  does. 
So, the problem is wider than just coal, the problem is carbon diox-
ide.  So,  the  technology  that  gets  developed  for  coal,  hopefully  is 
some  technology  that’s  also  applicable  to  some  of  the  gas  genera-
tion  that  exists,  because  even  if  we  replace  all  the  coal  units  with, 
or  do  away  with  coal  units,  and  have  just  gas  units,  we  will  still 
have  half  of  the  problem,  and  that  half  of  the  problem  is  still  a 
large problem. 

Senator KERRY. Senator Boxer’s asked for some time, and I have 

no problem with that, I can come back. 

Senator BOXER. I don’t have to leave until eleven. 
Senator KERRY. No, that’s OK, I’ll let you do it now, and I’ll come 

back afterwards and follow up, make sure we do. 

So, Senator Boxer? 
Senator  BOXER.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  so  much,  I  wish  I 
could stay all morning, but I have another Committee I need to go 
to. 

Again, Senator Kerry, thank you for doing this. 
I  don’t  know  if  you  share  my  view,  but  Mr.  Denis,  you  said  that 
you  don’t  believe  we’ll  have  the  ability  to  capture  and  sequester 
carbon till at least 2020, that was your initial—— 

Mr.  DENIS.  That,  we  will  have  the  viable  commercial  means  to 

do so in a large scale. 

Senator BOXER. OK, but you said at least 2020. 
Mr. DENIS. Yes, ma’am. 
Senator  BOXER.  Now,  I  just  have  to  say  to  my  Chairman,  that’s 
3  years  after  scientists  tell  us  we’ve  reached  a  tipping  point.  So, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

44 

just  speaking  for  myself,  I  can’t  speak  for  anybody  else,  we  need 
a  better  attitude  about  this.  It’s  just  not  realistic.  I  mean,  really. 
And  I  don’t,  in  any  way  want  to  minimize  what  we’re  facing. 
We’ve  done  a  lot  in  this  country  when  we’ve  put  our  mind  to  it.  I 
want to see what it is you think we can do as policymakers to help. 
And,  I  guess  I’ll  ask  Mr.  Wilson,  since  he’s  out  there  now,  al-
ready, putting out some technologies that are helpful. Do you think 
we  need  a  Manhattan-like  Project?  To  do  more  model  projects,  to 
help  us  find  the  way  here?  Because  I  don’t  see  how  we  wait  until 
at least—at least—2020. 

Mr. WILSON. Clearly, a more intensive effort would be highly val-
uable in terms of demonstrating these technologies at the commer-
cial scale. 

Here  is  the  challenge  we  face.  All  of  these  plants,  are  basically 
massive  in  scale;  they  take  years  to  build  and  years  to  prove  out 
their  operational  efficiency  and  their  performance.  At  the  same 
time,  these  facilities  must  demonstrate  economic  viability  within 
the  regulatory  climates,  (i.e.,  a  guaranteed  rate  of  return),  along 
with  all  of  the  other  elements  associated  with  business  invest-
ments.  Without  significant  Federal  guarantees,  in  many  cases, 
these  projects  will  not  move  ahead.  If  you’re  talking  about  a  Man-
hattan-type  Project,  then  we  have  to  have  a  Manhattan-type 
Project,  not  a  business  as  usual  scenario  which  is  how  most  of 
these plants have to operate today. 

Senator  BOXER.  Would  you  support  a  Manhattan-like  Project  in 

Mr. WILSON. Of course, we would support—I mean, we’re a tech-
nology  provider,  and  we  will  provide  to  any,  any  need  that  was 
identified in terms of what our customers want. 

Senator  BOXER.  Mr.  Rencheck,  you  were  a  bit  more  optimistic 
than  Mr.  Denis,  I  think,  trying  to  find  some  out  here,  because  in 
your  statement  you  said,  ‘‘Over  the  last  100  years,  AEP  has  been 
an  industry  leader  in  developing  and  deploying  new  projects.’’  You 
said  that  you  have  a  Memorandum  of  Understanding  for  post-car-
bon  capture  using  Alstom’s  chilled  ammonia  system,  it  will  be  in-
stalled at your 1,300 megawatt plant in New Haven, West Virginia 
as  a  ‘‘commercial  performance  verification  project  in  mid-  to  late- 
2008,  it  will  capture  up  to  100,000  metric  tons  of  carbon  dioxide.’’ 
Once  the  CO2 is  captured,  you’ll  store  it.  So,  you  hope  to  do  that 
by 2008. 

Mr. RENCHECK. Yes, ma’am. 
Senator  BOXER.  So,  are  you  a  little  bit  more  optimistic  than  is 

this area? 

Mr. Denis on future of the sequestration issue? 

Mr. RENCHECK. We believe technology is the answer, and AEP is 
pushing technology on several fronts, we talk about an IGCC plant 
being  constructed,  new,  more  efficient  coal  plants,  being  the  ultra 
supercritical  coal  plant,  the  oxy-coal  plant  for  combustion,  and  we 
also  are  looking  at  back-end  retrofit  technologies,  like  carbon  cap-
ture and sequestration using the chilled ammonia process. 

Senator  BOXER.  So,  are  you  more  optimistic  than  is  Mr.  Denis, 
that  we  could  solve  this  before  2020?  He  said  at  least,  at  the  ear-
liest 2020. 

Mr. RENCHECK. We are working to solve it very quickly. 
Senator BOXER. Good, good. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

45 

Mr.  RENCHECK.  Technology  will  evolve,  and  in  R&D  efforts, 
sometimes  you  take  a  few  steps  forward,  and  it  stalls,  and  you 
have  to  take  a  few  steps  back.  So,  we  are  working  to  make  that 
reality at AEP—— 

Senator BOXER. Could you use more incentives? 
Mr.  RENCHECK.  We  definitely  need  incentives  from  the  Govern-
ment.  We  could  use  additional  investments  up  to  $1  billion  a  year 
in  the  R&D  program  for  DOE.  We  could  use  investments  in  areas 
for understanding geological sequestration. 

At  our  Mountaineer  Facility,  for  example,  in  2004,  we  have 
drilled a well, a 9,200-foot well, where we have studied the geologi-
cal structure underneath the plant, looking for saline aquifers that 
could  store  carbon.  We’ve  done  that  with  the  DOE  and  Battelle, 
and  we  believe  we’ve  identified  porosity  of  the  geological  structure 
that  would  enable  carbon  capture  to  take  place  there.  We  want  to 
test  that  out  with  these  projects.  We’re  going  to  need  help,  we’re 
going to need additional funding to study that. 

Senator  BOXER.  Well,  I  appreciate  your  work,  your  attitude,  it’s 

very helpful. I have one last question if I might? 

Senator KERRY. Yes, absolutely. 
Senator BOXER. And then I’ll leave. 
Mr.  Wilson,  you  say  that  you  are  working  every  day,  your  com-
pany is, to get cleaner coal going, and you have success. I’m trying 
to understand where we are right now, with the technologies you’re 
using. So, you say you have cleaner coal, does this mean, you’re not 
only dealing with carbon, but NOX, SOX and mercury, as well? 

Mr.  WILSON.  We’re  dealing  predominantly  with  NOX,  SOX and 
mercury,  because  we—all  of  the  technologies  we  have,  basically, 
are  capture  technologies,  filtration  technologies,  which  are  able  to 
clean all of the pollutants out of the exhaust stream to where you’d 
have—you basically have no, negligible pollutants left. 

Senator BOXER. OK. 
Mr.  WILSON.  With  respect  to  CO2,  the  only  real  option  available 
is  to  improve  the  overall  efficiency  of  the  plant  so  that  it  uses  less 
fuel, therefore produces less kilowatts per unit output. The capture 
and  sequestration  objective  is  clearly  the  issue  that  the  whole 
panel was talking about—— 

Senator BOXER. OK. 
Mr.  WILSON.—which  does  need  additional  work,  and  a  lot  of  ad-

ditional work, to get—— 

capture? 

Senator  BOXER.  So,  you’re  not  doing  any  of  the  work  of  carbon 

Mr. WILSON. Not predominantly, not yet. 
Senator  BOXER.  So,  you’re  doing  cleanup  of  NOX,  SOX and  mer-
cury,  and  not  to  minimize  that,  that’s  absolutely  crucial  under  the 
Clean Air Act, and it’s important to our families, but—— 

Mr. Chairman, I think what you’ve identified today is really crit-
ical,  here.  And  I  think  this  panel  is  so  interesting,  because  you 
really  do  have,  I  believe,  different  attitudes  on  how  we  can  move 
forward. 

I  hope  we  can  get  bipartisan  support  to  really  move  forward  on 
this. Because, without solving this problem, it’s going to create ob-
stacles for us. I’ve learned a lot, and I thank you so much for your 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

46 

leadership,  and  I’m  sure  we  will  be  doing  more  of  this  together. 
Thank you. 

Senator KERRY. We will, indeed, thank you very, very much. 
I’ll  let  the  others  ask  some  questions,  and  then  I’ll  come  back 

afterwards. Who was next? I think, yes, Senator Dorgan? 
STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Chairman, thank you very much. 
We  have,  in  my  State,  lignite  coal,  something  around  800  years 
worth  of  lignite  coal  reserves,  and  my  guess  is  that  we  are  going 
to continue to use coal—the question isn’t whether, I mean, I don’t 
think  we  have  much  choice—but  the  question  is  how  do  we  use  it, 
and  do  we  use  it  in  a  way—especially  combined  with  new  tech-
nology,  to  make  it  much,  much  less  difficult  for  our  environment. 
In,  I  would  say  to  the  Chairman,  we  have—I  believe—the  only 
coal gasification plant in the country, in North Dakota, it produces 
synthetic  natural  gas  from  lignite  coal.  And  the  production  of  syn-
thetic  natural  gas  from  lignite  coal  is  a—it’s  using  old  technology, 
the  plant  was  built  about  25  years  ago,  but  it’s  an  unbelievable 
plant,  very  productive,  and  we  take  CO2 from  that  plant,  put  it  in 
a  pipe  in  the  world’s—I  believe—the  world’s  largest  application  of 
CO2 sequestration. We put it in a pipe, and move it to the oil fields 
of  Alberta,  Canada,  invest  it  in  the  ground,  to  make  more  produc-
tive  marginal  oil  wells  in  Canada.  So,  you  have  beneficial  use  of 
CO2, even as you sequester. 

Now,  that  obviously  is  not  a  solution  for  all  of  that  which  we 
have  to  deal  with,  but  it’s  a  demonstration  that  there  are  some 
things you can do that make some sense. 

I’d just like to ask a couple of questions, because I—I think we’re 
going to use coal. The question is, can we—in a robust way—invest 
in  technology  to  get  to  the  point  where  we  have  zero  emissions 
coal-fired  electric  generating  plants?  Do  we  do  it  by  capturing  and 
storing  CO2?  Or  do  we  do  it  by,  hopefully,  with  some  technology 
that is an avoidance technology, with the production of CO2? I don’t 
know what the technology will give us. 

But,  here’s  the  situation,  what  I  want  to  ask  you  about.  The 
President and the Administration says, ‘‘Let’s go with FutureGen,’’ 
big old project, really a big project. In fact, in Fiscal Year 2008, the 
Fossil  Energy  and  Coal  Request  is  $426  million,  by  the  President, 
that’s a $1 million increased over the previous year. So, essentially, 
flat  funding  for  fossil  energy  and  coal—which  is  mostly  research. 
And  flat  funding  for  that  at  a  time—it  seems  to  me—when  we 
ought to be saying, ‘‘Wait a second, we can’t hardly run fast enough 
to  catch  up  to  this,  we  need  to  be  really  aggressive.’’  Flat  funding 
for  that,  and  then  we  have  $108  million  for  FutureGen,  which  is 
20—fully 25 percent of that which we’re going to put into fossil en-
ergy and coal research. 

So,  tell  me  your  thoughts  on  that,  is  that  what  we  ought  to  be 
doing?  Or,  is  that  kind  of  a  slow  motion  approach  to  finding  our 
top speed, using technology to address these questions? 

Yes, sir? 
Mr.  CHAISSON.  Senator,  a  couple  of  responses.  First  all,  on  the 
DOE  program  funding,  I  think  the  MIT  report  does  a  pretty  good 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

47 

job  of  reviewing  that,  and  I  think—for  all  practical  purposes— 
they’re  talking  about  something  like  $1  billion  a  year  being,  sort 
of minimum. And I think both Professors Deutsch and Moniz testi-
fied,  or  have  stated  that,  when  they  both  have  been  at  DOE,  run-
ning those programs, you know, many years ago, at least Professor 
Deutsch,  in  those-year  dollars,  the  program  was  actually  larger 
than that. So, it’s just sort of getting it back to what it used to be. 
I think, in addition, as far as near-term carbon capture, whether 
it be in North Dakota, or Indiana, we’re going to—it costs two and 
a half cents a kilowatt hour to add carbon capture to a plant today. 
And,  as  I  said,  you’re  going  to  have  to  get  to  $40  a  ton  of  CO2 be-
fore you offset that. I think there are a lot of companies—not every 
company—but there are many companies that would do this today, 
if there was some way to bridge that financial gap between having 
to add two and a half cents cost today with no ability to offset those 
costs, and some future point in time where that would be offset, be-
cause of the CO2 benefits. 

Senator DORGAN. But, the implication of your answer is that the 
technology  is  there,  it’s  just  a  matter  of  cost.  I  don’t  think  that’s 
the case. I mean, it’s true, we can capture in certain areas, but cap-
ture  and  storage—it  seems  to  me—requires  much,  much,  much 
more technology. And, the pursuit of that technology is going to re-
quire  substantially  new  investment.  And,  it  looks  to  me  like  the 
President’s budget is, perhaps, less than half of what is necessary, 
with  no  increase  from  the  previous  year,  which  suggests  that  this 
is not a priority. I think it’s a huge priority. 

Others? Yes, sir, Mr. Rencheck? 
Mr.  RENCHECK.  We  need  additional  support  in  funding,  I  rec-
ommend  approximately  a  billion  dollar  a  year,  consistent  with  the 
MIT  folks.  And,  we  also  support  FutureGen,  and  we  think  it’s  im-
portant  for  the  further  development  of  the  IGCC  technology.  We 
are working now, off of a platform technology to go commercial that 
was developed in the early eighties, to mid-nineties, we’ll take that 
to  a  commercial  scale  with  today’s  present  technology  and  prove  it 
in  operation,  but  then  FutureGen  takes  it  to  the  next  step,  where 
it will, truly, involve the invention of new technology, such as a hy-
drogen  combustion  turbine  that  will  truly  enable  them  to  generate 
electricity, separate out CO2, and capture. 

We  also  need  monies  to  study  the  geologies.  As  you  know,  dif-
ferent areas of the country have different formations, and at times, 
the  formations  aren’t  consistent  within  a  region.  So,  we  have  to 
drill  more  holes,  understand  more  about  the  geology,  and  start  in-
jection projects in those areas, so we can understand how CO2 will 
behave in those rock formations. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Are  any  of  you  bullish  on  where  we’re  headed 

here? Are you bullish on technology? 

Mr. WILSON. Yes. 
Senator DORGAN. OK. 
Mr. WILSON. Yes, I’m bullish on technology and I—— 
Senator  DORGAN.  Give  me  some  encouragement,  would  you,  Mr. 

Mr.  WILSON.  Yes,  the  point  I  just  wanted  to  make  is  we’ve  al-
ways been an advocate of higher funding, essentially, on the devel-
opment  programs,  we’re  a  participant  in  virtually  every  DOE  pro-

Wilson? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

48 

gram  that  comes  out.  And  we  provide  our  expertise,  essentially, 
into  these  programs.  And  we  are  very  bullish  that,  if  we  want  to 
accomplish a greater goal, we certainly think we can. 

It’s the political will that has to be behind it in order for funding, 
and also for the demonstration project that my compatriots all talk 
about. Is that their significant projects have to be demonstrated, in 
order  for  them  to  be  commercially  viable,  and  adopted  wholesale. 
So  that,  we  believe,  yes,  indeed,  I’m  bullish,  that  the  technology 
is there. The question is, it has to be brought to the scale that util-
ity plants operate at. 

Senator  DORGAN.  And  I’m  not  suggesting,  by  the  way—just  to 
finish  this  thought—I’m  not  suggesting  that  the  demonstration 
through  FutureGen  of  IGCC  is  irrelevant,  it  is  not.  I’m  not  sug-
gesting  it’s  not  valuable,  it  is.  What  I  am  saying  is  that,  even  as 
we do this, and claim a significantly larger part of our budget, and 
our appropriations for FutureGen, we’re not seeing the ramp up of 
a  country  that  says  there’s  an  urgent  need  to  deal  with  coal  re-
search, and the research on carbon capture, so that we open up and 
unlock  the  opportunities  to  be  able  to  continue  to  use  our  coal. 
That’s my, that’s my problem with this. 

And so I, let me thank Senator Kerry, for leadership in this area. 
I  think  all  of  us—Senator  Thune,  myself,  and  others—all  of  us 
have to figure out that this is urgent. I mean, this isn’t something, 
this isn’t like every other problem. 

If we’re going to be able to continue to use these resources in the 
future, given the intersection we’ve now come to with respect to en-
ergy and climate change, if we’re going to continue to use these re-
sources, we had better figure out that these minds of ours—the fer-
tile  minds  of,  that  exist  here  in  this  country  that  have  unlocked  a 
lot  of  mysteries  through  scientific  inquiry  and  research,  we  can  do 
the same with technology in coal development. 

But  it  requires  significant  investment.  And  it  is  not  coming  in 
this  budget.  So,  we  have  to  be  attentive—that’s  why  I  think  this 
hearing is very important. 

I  appreciate—I  interrupted  you,  Mr.  Chaisson,  I’m  sorry  for  in-

terrupting you—— 

Mr. CHAISSON. That’s fine. 
Senator  DORGAN.—but  let  me  thank  the  Chairman  for  the  time, 
and  I  thank  all  of  the  witnesses  for  your  presentations.  I  was 
chairing  another  hearing  so  I,  but  I  had  read  your  presentations, 
and I appreciate your contributions. 

Senator KERRY. Senator Dorgan, thank you very much. Couldn’t, 
couldn’t  agree  with  you  more.  Part  of  the  purpose  of  this  hearing 
and  the  others  we’re  holding  is  to  raise  the  level  of  urgency  about 
this. 

And,  as  I  said,  you  can’t  be  half-pregnant  on  this  thing.  Either 
you  accept  the  science,  and  then  you’ve  got  to,  if  you’re  accepting 
the  science  for  valid  reasons,  to  act  on  it.  And,  we’re  not.  So,  we 
have a huge challenge. 

Let  me  establish  something  quickly  before  I  turn  to  Senator 

Senator  Dorgan  spoke  about  the  capture  of  CO2 that’s  taking 
place now, and the piping that takes on, and I had mentioned ear-

Thune. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

49 

lier,  we’re  able  to  pipe  CO2 naturally  out  of  the  Earth,  and  we’re 
using it also for enhanced oil recovery, I guess it’s called. 

What’s  the  restraint  here,  on  the  capture?  You  keep  saying, 
‘‘Well,  we’re  going  to  have  to  develop  the  ability  to  be  able  to  cap-
ture  out  of  the  IGCC,’’  can  you  share  with  us,  what  do  we  get  out 
of  IGCC,  what’s  left  to  get,  and  why  can’t  we  get  that  other  piece 
yet? 

Mr. Rencheck, go ahead. 
Mr.  RENCHECK.  Yes,  on  an  IGCC  plant,  the  fundamentals  of  the 
way it works with the flue gas stream, when you shift the gas reac-
tion  into  hydrogen  and  CO2,  you  now  have  to  combust  the  hydro-
gen. That CO2 adds mass flow into the gas turbine, so it’s like add-
ing horsepower into a car engine—when you remove that, you gen-
erate much less electricity, and then you have to supply energy for 
the compression, to either put it into a pipeline, or to sequester. 

We need to evolve that integration and those systems, so that the 
electricity  amount  produced  is  contained  and  maintained,  and  not 
degraded. 

Senator KERRY. But that’s the challenge, but not the actual cap-

ture of the carbon itself? 

Mr.  RENCHECK.  On  IGCC,  it  is  ahead  of  pulverized  coal  units  in 
that  area.  If  you  looked  at  the  two  technologies,  PC  combustion  is 
further  advanced  than  IGCC,  there’s  a  lot  to  learn.  In  the  capture 
piece,  I  would  put  IGCC  ahead  than  pulverized  coal,  but  the  tech-
nology  race  is  on  for  the  two  to  see  which  one  will  ultimately  be 
the winner. And, we believe that both, both have a place, and both 
have a role. 

Senator KERRY. But the key is not to degrade the power that you 

get out of it in the process? 

Mr. RENCHECK. That’s correct. 
Senator KERRY. OK. 
Mr.  RENCHECK.  You  can  see  power  prices  as  an  example,  using 

today’s state-of-the-art technology—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Because  if  you  degrade  it,  then  you’ve  got  to  re-
place  it.  And  then  the  question  is  cost  for  what  you’re  providing. 
Mr.  RENCHECK.  Fifty  dollars  a  megawatt  would  go  to  $113  a 

megawatt, is an example on a pulverized coal unit—— 

Senator KERRY. I understand. 
Mr. RENCHECK.—in that range. 
Senator  KERRY.  What  about  on  the  sequestration,  if  you  could 
all,  somebody  else  raised  their  hand,  but  you  wanted  to  add  some-
thing? 

Dr.  MCRAE.  Just  on  the  issue  of  technology,  just  to  follow  up  on 
the  comments  that  were  made  by  Senator  Dorgan—coming  from 
MIT, I’m clearly very bullish on technology. 

One  of  the  key  themes  in  the  MIT  Coal  Study  is  a  sense  of  ur-
gency,  to  really  move  very,  very  quickly.  And,  I  think  our  time 
scales  are  somewhat  shorter,  to  get  the  information  that  you  need 
to solve this problem. 

I  think  that  the  discussion  about  capture,  sequestration  illus-
trates  how  people  have  thought  about  it  in  the  past.  We  have  to 
think about it as a system—all the way from the beginning of min-
ing the coal, all the way through to the sequestration. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

50 

If you think about how we’ve dealt with conventional pollutants, 
like  sulfur  oxides,  and  nitrogen  oxides,  we  took,  basically,  conven-
tional  combustion  processes,  and  then  added  to  them  control  tech-
nologies to remove those pollutants. If you, sort of, think about the 
CO2 capture  problem  in  a  slightly  different  way,  there  are  some 
very,  very  interesting  technologies  coming  along  that  could  poten-
tially  cut  the  cost  of  both  the  capture—but  without  compromising 
the thermal efficiency of the plant. 

For  example,  if  you  burnt  the  coal  at  pressure,  with  oxygen, 
you—it’s  much  easier  to  take  the  carbon  dioxide  out  of  the  gas 
stream,  and  you’ve  already  got  a  compressed  gas  stream  which  is 
partially  ready  for  injection  into  the  reservoir.  And  so  our  view  is 
that,  while  FutureGen  is  focused  on  IGCC,  it  should  not  be  to  the 
exclusion of very different ways of thinking about the problem. 

I  mean,  I’m  very  optimistic  about  the  opportunities—you  know, 
a lot of the technologies that we’ve been talking about are 50 years 
old.  There’s  not  a  lot  of  investment  that  has  been  built  into  how 
to  capture  CO2 out  of  a  gas  stream.  I  mean,  we’re  still  using  tech-
nology that’s 50 years old. The problem is to turn it around—what 
molecule  should  you  have  to  design  to  take  the  CO2 out  of  the  gas 
stream? You know, pose it that way. 

So, our view is that if you step back a little bit from the problem, 
think  of  it  as  a  systems  perspective,  it  opens  up  a  whole  bunch  of 
different ways of thinking about the problem. 

So,  I  think—two  points.  One,  is  that  I  think  we  have  technology 
to  deal  with  the  problem  today,  at  cost.  I  think  there  are  lots  of 
opportunities for dramatically lowering those costs, costs over time. 
The other issue is the issue of scale. In the United States, there’s 
very little activity that addresses this problem at scale. To be able 
to monitor it, to make sure that it actually stays in the ground—— 
Senator  KERRY.  That’s  the  10  demo  projects,  so  to  speak,  that 

we—— 

Dr.  MCRAE.  Most  of  the  interesting  work  that’s  going  on  is  out 
of—outside  of  the  United  States.  All  of  the  big  sequestration  ex-
periments  are  being  done  in  Algeria,  they’re  being  done  in  the 
North  Sea,  they’re  being  done  in  Canada,  and  I  just  had  a  work-
shop  over  the  last  couple  of  days  at  MIT,  where  we  brought  to-
gether  all  of  the  people  that  are  doing  the  sequestration  experi-
ments from around the world, and one of the key themes that kept 
coming up over, and over, and over again, was the need to do these 
at scale, and the need to develop a monitoring program so that you 
could assure the public that the stuff is going to stay in the ground, 
where you put it. 

Senator KERRY. Great. 
Dr.  MCRAE.  And  our  view  is  that  you  can  do  that  in  less  than 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  I’m  going  to  come  back  to  this,  because  I 
want  to  pursue  it,  I  just  don’t  want  to  cut  in  on  Senator  Thune, 
so let me go to Senator Thune, and then we’ll come back. 

10 years. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator THUNE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I want to express my 
appreciation  for  you  holding  this  hearing  on  what  is  a  very  impor-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

51 

tant topic, clean coal technologies, and the important role that coal 
can  play  in  securing  our  energy  independence.  And,  as  I  know  ev-
erybody  on  this  Committee  is  probably  aware,  that  we  have  an 
abundant supply of coal, in fact, coal-fired plants supply 22 percent 
of our U.S. energy demand, and over 50 percent of the energy used 
by the electric power sector. And, it is projected the U.S. has a 250- 
year domestic supply of coal. 

As the witnesses have testified, I think we are on the horizon of 
an  exciting  new  generation  of  coal  power,  IGCC,  and  other  ad-
vanced  clean  coal  technologies  are  very  much  in  their  infancy 
stages, but considering the potential for carbon capture and seques-
tration, coal could provide a clean and reliable source of energy for 
generations to come. 

So,  I  too,  appreciate  the  testimony  that  we’ve  heard  this  morn-
ing, and your thoughts about where this is headed, and I am inter-
ested  in  knowing,  as  well,  what  we  can  do  to  facilitate  the  things 
that  will  get  us  to  where  we  need  to  be,  sooner  rather  than  later. 
And  I  think  the  next  step  is  to  continue  investing  in  these  tech-
nologies,  so  that  IGCC  can  be  implemented  on  a  wide-scale,  and 
that’s  going  to  require  significant  investment,  research  and  devel-
opment.  So,  we  welcome  your  input  and  suggestions  about  how  to 
do  that  and  what  we  ought  to  be  doing  here  to  support  the  efforts 
that are underway. 

Let me, if I could, pose a couple of quick questions. 
Mr.  Denis,  in  your  testimony,  you  state  that  Sierra  Pacific’s  Ely 
Energy Center, which is a four-unit coal-powered complex, totaling 
2,500  megawatts  in  eastern  Nevada,  will  pave  the  way  for  addi-
tional  renewable  energy  sources  in  eastern  Nevada.  I’d  be  inter-
ested  to  know  what  is  the  relationship  between  coal  facilities  and 
future  development  of  renewable  energy  projects,  such  as  wind 
power?  And  how  much  of  the  new  transmission  capacity  could  be 
available for other types of energy, and energy generation, such as 
wind? 

Mr. DENIS. Certainly. Certainly, Senator. 
The  relationship  between  the  Ely  Energy  Center  and  the  addi-
tional  development  of  renewables  is,  the  Center  is  being  built  in  a 
very sparsely populated portion of our State. Essentially, there are 
no  transmission  facilities,  there  are  no  wires,  but  yet,  there’s  a  lot 
of wind. So, you can put up all the windmills you want, but there’s 
nowhere for the electricity to go. 

This  $600  million  transmission 

just  economically 
unfeasible to build just for several hundred megawatts of wind and 
resources  that  exist  in  the  area.  We’ve  identified  up  to  about  500 
megawatts  of  proposals  from  wind  farms  that  are  in  the  area  that 
could develop, and could use this transmission line, then, to get the 
power to the market, primarily to the Las Vegas region. This is 250 
miles north of Las Vegas, is where this plant is. 

So, without the ability of the Ely Energy Center being there, and 
economically justifying the construction of this facility, we basically 
have some locked-in geotherm—wind resources. 

In addition, the northern part of the state of Nevada, as it’s clos-
er  to  California,  is  really  blessed  with  geothermal  resources.  We’re 
the leaders in geothermal production. Yet, there’s going to be more 
geothermal energy than there are people to consume the electricity. 

line 

is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

52 

We need to get that electricity to the South, where the big load cen-
ters are. 

So,  we  have  now,  a  combination  where  we  have  a  marriage 
where this coal unit is a catalyst to provide for additional, and fos-
tering  additional  development  of  renewable  energy.  So,  that’s  the 
nexus that exists between the two. 

Senator  THUNE.  Well,  we’ve  got  the  same  problem  in  South  Da-
kota, a lot of wide-open space, a lot of wind—in fact, I saw a study 
the  other  day  that  South  Dakota  could  provide  52  percent  of  the 
entire electrical demand in this country, just from the wind we gen-
erate  in  our  State  alone.  But,  we  have  the  same  problem—we’re 
not  close  to  population  centers,  and  transmission  is  prohibitively 
expensive. 

And,  so,  I  was  interested  in  what  you’re  doing  there,  in 
leveraging with an investment in another facility, but being able to 
use  that  capacity  for  renewables.  We  also  have  a  lot  of  wide-open 
space,  and,  wind  turbines.  Things  that  in  some  parts  of  the  coun-
try,  people  don’t  want  to  have  in  their  back  yard,  are  things  that 
my state would welcome. 

South Dakota, obviously, is close to Western sub-bituminous coal 
from  Wyoming  and  Montana—you  mentioned  how  it’s  more  eco-
nomical  to  use  Eastern  bituminous  coal—do  you  know  of  any  re-
search  that’s  taking  place  in  either  the  public  or  private  sector, 
working to make Western sub-bituminous coal more economical for 
IGCC?  And  in  your  view,  would  such  research  warrant  a  Federal 
investment? 

Mr. DENIS. Well the—the issue of sub-bituminous coal, the stud-
ies  that  have  been  performed,  particularly  by  Electric  Power  Re-
search  Institute  is  that  when  you  add  the  carbon—the  estimated 
costs of the carbon capture systems, and you’re talking about IGCC 
with  Western  Powder  River  Basin  coal,  sub-bituminous  coal,  that 
the  economics  are  that  it  is  less  costly  to  add  the  carbon  capture 
to a supercritical coal unit. 

The  answer  here,  I  think,  the  takeaway  from  that—in  other 
words,  IGCC  is  more  costly  with  Western  coals,  with  carbon  cap-
ture  than  it  is  on  Eastern  bituminous  coal  without—with  carbon 
capture, relative to a supercritical coal. 

I  think  the  takeaway  from  this  is  that  there  is  no  silver  bullet 
with  regards  to  what  is  the  answer  to  the  CO2.  We  really  must  be 
investing  in  multiple  initiatives—not  just  in  FutureGen,  and  not 
just  in  the  experiment  that  we  are  conducting  with  EPRI  at  Wis-
consin Energy, WE Energies, or the answer that AEP has for their 
Ohio plant—we really must be looking, rather than placing the bet 
on  just  a  single  technology,  we  must  be  looking  across  a  series  of 
technologies at present, so that we’re not disappointed in the future 
that we picked the wrong technology going forward. 

Senator THUNE. Well—— 
Mr. DENIS. I’m not sure if I answered your question, but—— 
Senator  THUNE.  I  think  you  did,  I  was  just,  specifically  homing 

in on Eastern sub-bituminous, versus Western. 

Mr. Chaisson? 
Mr.  CHAISSON.  Senator  Thune,  I  guess  I’d  like  to  sort  of  add  a 
slightly different perspective. The EPRI work has been based solely 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

53 

for 

on  the  Shell  gasifier,  which  is  the  sort  of,  best  gasifier  for  low- 
ranked coals, of sort of the traditional gasifiers. 

There  are  two  new  gasifiers  that  are  probably  going  to  be  excel-
low-ranked  coals,  the  new  Siemens  gasifier,  and 
lent 
Mitsubishi’s gasifier, which simply are too new to have been incor-
porated  in  these  studies.  And,  I  know  NRG—a  large  independent 
power  developer  that’s  very  active  in  Texas—is  been  very  bullish 
on using the Mitsubishi gasifier on Texas lignite coals. 

So,  I  think  the  availability  of  gasification  for  low-ranked  coals  is 
probably  a  more  complicated  picture  than  has  been  presented  by 
some of these earlier studies. 

Senator THUNE. OK. 
Mr. RENCHECK. I would concur. The issue with the Western coal 
being less efficient is with the moisture in the coal. In the gasifier, 
you’re  required  to  dry  the  coal  before  you  can  partially  combust  it 
within  the  gasifier.  That  drying  takes  energy,  which  makes  it  less 
efficient than a pulverized coal plant. 

Those processes, for example, we’ve signed a Memorandum of Co-
operation  with  Siemens  to  help  develop  that  technology,  but  those 
processes need funding for development, and with the proper fund-
ing, would advance over time. 

Senator THUNE. I, yes, Mr. Denis? 
Mr. DENIS. Just to add to my prior statement that there’s no sil-
ver  bullet,  and  we  really  must  look  at  a  menu  of  technologies  to 
prove  out  which  one  works  best—in  the  sense  that  there’s  no  one- 
size-fits-all, there should not be a one-size-fits-all attitude. 

Also,  the—in  my  opening  statements,  one  of  the  issues  that  we 
have  in  the  West  is  also  the  altitude.  Our  Ely  site  is  at  6,200  feet 
of altitude, and yet, there is to be proven whether some of the tech-
nologies, in particular, IGCC, how they perform at those higher lev-
els where the air is less dense. 

That’s  not  to  say  it’s  not  a  good  technology,  in  fact  our  company 
was  one  of  the  few  companies  that  participated  in  the  DOE  Clean 
Coal  Program  of  the  1990s,  we  built  an  IGCC.  It  never  worked.  It 
sits idle, and it was abandoned, ultimately. 

Senator KERRY. Who built it? 
Mr. DENIS. It was a combination, I believe, it was a Kellog gasi-

fier—— 

Senator KERRY. When was it built? 
Mr. DENIS. I’m sorry? 
Senator KERRY. When was it built? 
Mr. DENIS. It was built, it was started in—the negotiations with 
DOE  started  in  1991,  it  started  construction  in  1995,  was  com-
pleted in 2001. 

Senator KERRY. And why did it not work? 
Mr.  DENIS.  It  was  first  of  a  kind  technology.  We  were  experi-
menting—this was when DOE and their Clean Coal Program of the 
1990s was experimenting with different IGCCs to determine which 
technologies  worked.  We  eventually  abandoned  the  facility,  it  sits 
outside  of  Reno,  idle.  The  consumers  of  the  State  and  the  Federal 
taxpayers lost $335 million on that. 

But, it taught us some important lessons in the need to move for-

ward—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

54 

Senator  KERRY.  Is  it  not  retrofit?  Is  it  not  retrofittable  to  the 
technology  that  General  Electric  or  Siemens,  or  others  have  devel-
oped? 

Mr.  DENIS.  No,  it’s  not.  It’d  be  more—it’d  be  less  costly  to,  prob-

ably, start from scratch than to try and modify what is there. 

Senator  THUNE.  Well,  I  thank  you—those  aren’t  exactly  the  an-
swers  I  wanted  to  hear,  Mr.  Chairman,  but  I  appreciate  them, 
nonetheless. So, thank you for your input. 

Senator KERRY. Well, don’t go away for a minute, because I want 

to explore something that may be of interest to you. 

The  difficulty  that  Senator  Thune  mentioned  with  respect  to  the 
wind  power  that  could  be  produced  is  the  transmission.  And,  I 
know  that,  there’s  an  issue  always  about  the  length,  the  distance 
from  the  wind  turbine  to  the  grid,  but  I  assume  transformers  can 
have  a  profound  impact  on  that,  correct?  If  you  can  come  into— 
sorry, go ahead, Mr. Rencheck? 

Mr.  RENCHECK.  It’s,  it  really  is  the  voltage  level  of  the  trans-
mission  lines.  AEP  is  proposing  across  our  system,  and  in  other 
places,  to  construct  a  765  kV  line,  765  kilovolt  that  would  be  able 
to transport power more efficiently. 

Part of the discussion around CO2 is also the efficiency of energy 
transmission. Those high-voltage lines are very difficult to get per-
mitted,  as  we  all  know.  In  West  Virginia,  we  permitted  an  exten-
sion that took us upwards of what, 12 years? 

Mr. KAVANAGH. Sixteen. 
Mr. RENCHECK. Sixteen years to get permitted. So, that can have 
a  very,  very  large  effect  on  being  able  to  move  power  across  the 
Country. 

Senator  KERRY.  We  obviously  don’t  have  16  years  to  fool  around 
with,  here.  But,  that’s  why  I  think  we  ought  to  consider  thinking 
out of the box a little bit, and thinking, as you’ve said, sort of sys-
temically, and differently. 

But,  with  respect  to  that,  you  know,  the  1930s,  when  electricity 
first  came  around,  Roosevelt  decided  that  it  was  important  to  get 
this out to the whole Country. And so, the Government invested in 
making  certain  that  within  a  certain  period  of  time,  every  home 
was going to be wired. Now, I don’t think this is unlike that. 

If  South  Dakota  has  the  ability  to  be  able  to  provide  52  percent 
of  the  electricity,  and  we’re  looking  at  this  emissions  challenge  we 
have  over  these  next  years,  what  is  the  value  of  our  investing  in 
that  line,  and  providing  an  ability  for  them  to  do  it,  and  you  joint 
venture this with the urgency that we have to provide that. 

Mr.  DENIS.  Ultimately,  it  boils  down  to  the  cost  of  electricity.  If 
you  look  at  the  cost  of  that  investment,  plus  the  cost  of  the  elec-
tricity produced by the wind—— 

Senator KERRY. But, I’m not talking about this being private sec-
tor-driven,  I’m  talking  about  the  Federal  Government  investing  as 
we  did  in  the  TVA,  and  otherwise,  in  order  to  provide  the  connec-
tion, and help make this happen at a cost that then doesn’t kill the 
consumer, and makes a return on investment viable. Until you get 
going, until you get up and running and you’ve pushed these other 
technologies. Is that viable? 

Mr.  WILSON.  Siemens  provides  transmission  and  distribution 
products  and  services;  essentially,  this  is  one  of  our  major  busi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

55 

nesses, both in the U.S. and globally. And, your point is well-taken; 
the  U.S.  is  not  a  highly  well-interconnected  system  compared  to 
Europe or other highly interconnected systems. 

There’s  a  great  deal  of  value  that  could  be  gained  by  increasing 
the  transmission  and  distribution  capacities  of  the  U.S.,  to  basi-
cally  balance  the  loads.  This  would  enable  us  to  make  use  of  the 
best most efficient plants and decrease the emissions. It also would 
provide improved access for and wider distribution of, of our renew-
able sources. This is another of the key challenges that we’re going 
to face. 

Senator KERRY. Mr. Rencheck? 
Mr. RENCHECK. Yes, the 765 kV line is just that—it will open up 
a  highway  for  electric  transmission.  And  you  will  find  private  in-
dustry willing to invest in that, as well, with Government funding, 
it  could  be  expanded.  The  point  will  be  in  the  permitting  process. 
If  we  wanted  to  expand  those  lines,  we  couldn’t  wait  16  years  to 
address that. 

Senator  KERRY.  I  agree.  We  have  to  have  an  expedited  process, 
we’ve got to put on in place. We’ve got to behave like this is urgent. 
It  is  urgent,  so  we’ve  got  to  behave  that  way.  And  I  think  we’ve 
got to take a look at these kinds of options. 

I’d  be  happy  to  work  with  you,  Senator  Thune,  to  see  if  there’s 

some way to go at that. 
Dr. MCRAE. Senator? 
Senator KERRY. Yes. 
Dr.  MCRAE.  The  issue  about  the  infrastructure,  which  is,  you’re 
touching on with power lines, is very, very important, it’s an often 
critically  missing  part  of  the  debate.  I  mean,  we’re  dealing  with, 
not  just  with  transmission  lines,  for  moving  electricity,  we’re  also 
beginning to be looking at—— 

Senator KERRY. We’re going to have to move carbon dioxide. 
Dr.  MCRAE.—carbon  dioxide,  and  getting  the  regulatory  struc-

tures in place—— 

Senator KERRY. Right. 
Dr. MCRAE.—to be able to do that, I think, is very crucial. 
Senator  KERRY.  I  completely  agree  with  you,  I  understand  that. 
If that’s the avenue we go down. Now, you know, if we push the 
R&D,  in  2004,  I  talked  about  putting  $2  billion  up  front  on  the 
table  immediately  for  clean  coal  technology  R&D.  Because,  I  think 
the  minute  you  start  to  push  this,  who  knows  whether  you  guys 
are  going  to  come  up  with  some  other  technology,  or  someone  at 
MIT, or Cal Tech, or Carnegie Mellon or somewhere, is going to sit 
there  and  say,  ‘‘Hey,  there  may  be  a  better  way  to  do  this.’’  Once 
the marketplace is beckoning, I’ll bet you there are 10 new Googles 
out there, waiting to be created—— 

Yes, go ahead. 
Dr. MCRAE. Perhaps a small anecdote might illustrate this point. 
I teach the Senior Design Course in Chemical Engineering at MIT, 
and this semester we had 72 students who were interested in how 
to  burn  coal  in  a  clean  way.  We  broke  the  class  up  into  18  teams 
of  four  students,  and  each  team  was  assigned  a  different  piece  of 
the  problem.  And  this  is  the  first  time  in  my  whole  academic  ca-
reer,  that  after  the  class  finished,  teams  of  students  have  come 
back  to  me  and  said,  ‘‘We  want  to  continue  to  working  on  this 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

56 

project,  because  we’ve  got  this  neat  new  idea  for  how  to  capture 
CO2,’’  or  a  neat  new  idea  to  think  about  how  to  build  a  fertilizer 
market. 

I think—two things here. One is, that there’s a group of very tal-
ented  young  people  who  want  to  work  on  this  problem,  but  more 
importantly,  by  thinking  out  of  the  box,  they  can  come  up  with 
many different ideas about how to tackle the problem. 

I  mean,  just  one  example,  just  following  up  on  your  discussion 
about  Wyoming,  if  you  think  about  it  as  a  systems  problem,  you 
can—in  addition  to  taking  CO2 and  putting  it  in  the  ground,  you 
can  also  use  it  as  a  basis  for  a  C1  chemical  industry.  And,  if  you 
have  electricity,  but  you  can’t  move  it,  you  can  make  hydrogen,  if 
you had the CO2, then you can make methanol, you’ve got a trans-
portation  fuel.  That’s—you’d  have  to  work  through  this  in  a  lot 
more detail. 

But  the  idea  here  is  that  we  need,  in  my  view,  to  start  to  think 
about  this  problem  much  more  broadly  than  just  pure  generation 
of  power,  because  I  think  that  opens  up  a  very  different  way  of 
thinking  about  the  technology.  And  it’s  what  I  see  when  I  look  at 
all of these technologies, is a crucial thing about beginning to think 
about them in a life cycle sense. 

You  hear  a  lot  about,  for  example,  solid  photovoltaic  cells  as 
clean  power  sources.  But  what’s  often  missing  is  the  debate  that 
you  probably  have  to  run  them  for  at  least  3  years  before  you  get 
more  power  out  than  was  used  to  actually  produce  it  in  the  first 
place, and there are all kinds of other environmental impacts asso-
ciated with the production of silicone. 

So,  I  think,  in  addition  to  sort  of  thinking  about  infrastructure 
issues, I think we need to couple that with sort of a life cycle view 
of what these technologies might be, because, on the surface, some 
of  them  look  very  good.  But,  when  you  look  at  the  co-effects  of 
them, you often get a very different picture. 

Senator KERRY. Yes, Mr. Denis? 
Mr.  DENIS.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think  you’ve  touched  on  something 
that  is  very  important,  and  this  is  that  the—if  we,  as  we  agree  in 
the  science,  there  has  to  be  a  comprehensive  solution,  the  solution 
is  not  only  the  carbon  capture  and  sequestration.  We  really  must 
focus on the development of renewables, we must focus on the con-
servation  of  energy.  I  know  you  have  a  proposal  in  a  bill  to  make 
the  Capitol  carbon-neutral,  I  observe  that  we  don’t  have  compact 
fluorescent  lights  in  this  room.  Things  that  we  could  be  doing  to 
reduce  our  energy  use  in  this  Country,  that  really  have  the  effect 
of reducing the carbon dioxide. 

So,  it’s  not  a  simple  answer,  it—I  think  it’s  a  portfolio  of  initia-
tives  that  we  need—really  need  to  pursue  to  solve  this  quandary, 
this problem that we have in front of us. 

Senator  KERRY.  Oh,  I  couldn’t  agree  more.  That’s  why  I  intro-
duced the bill. We can’t talk about this with legitimacy, if we don’t 
take steps here in the Capitol and elsewhere to become carbon neu-
tral and energy efficient. 

The  book  that  my  wife  and  I  have  just  written  has  a  chapter 
about  energy  efficiency  and  the  three  biggies,  clean  coal  being  one 
of them. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

57 

I mean, there are only three ways we’re going to grab this thing 
fast  enough.  And  one  is  clean  coal  technology,  two  is  alternative 
and  renewables,  and  three  is  energy  efficiency.  You  can  do  your 
other  things  at  the  margins,  but  those  are  the  big  three.  And  the 
energy efficiency piece happens to be the cheapest, fastest, most ef-
ficient and effective way of grabbing it fast. And a lot of companies 
have understood that. 

You  know  Texas  Instruments  built  a  new  plant  down  in  Texas 
that saved 88,000 jobs. It’s going to provide $14 billion to the econ-
omy over its lifetime, and they’re burning 25 percent more effective 
on  their  energy  use,  35  percent  less  water,  I  mean,  these  are  the 
things  we  can  do  all  over  the  country,  we’ve  got  to,  and  there’s  a 
lot  of  money  to  be  made,  incidentally,  in  the  companies  that  wind 
up doing these things, it’ll be more effective. 

Let  me  come  back,  if  I  can,  for  the  clean  coal  piece  of  this  for  a 
second,  I  just  want  to  make  sure  my  own  understanding,  as  well 
as the record, is complete on it. 

The  IGCC,  Integrated  Gasification  Combined  Cycle,  in  layman’s 

terms, can you just tell people what that does, how it does it? 

Mr. Rencheck? 
Mr.  RENCHECK.  It  partially  combusts  coal  to  produce  a  syngas, 
synthetic gas, and that synthetic gas has sulfur, methane in it. You 
clean out the sulfur, and what you essentially do, then, is combust 
the gas, it’s a clean gas at that point. 

Senator KERRY. And it requires no flue component at that point? 
Mr. RENCHECK. You get an exhaust emission out of the HRSG of 
basically  the  combined  cycle  plant,  the  heat  regenerative,  heat  ex-
changer. You get the combustion flue from the gas turbines. 

Senator  KERRY.  And  how  complicated  is  it  to  attach  the  carbon 

capture to that? 

Mr.  RENCHECK.  It  would  require,  basically,  a  new  type  of  com-
bustion  turbine  that  would  burn  hydrogen.  And  that  is  one  of  the 
emphases  of  FutureGen  to  develop.  The  DOE  is  also  working  on 
that,  both  with  Siemens  and  General  Electric,  but  you  would,  es-
sentially, at that point, move the gas stream from a methane-based 
type  gas  stream  to  a  higher,  if  not  purer,  hydrogen-based  gas 
stream.  And  its  combustion  profiles  are  a  lot  different  than  with 
the  syngas.  And,  to  understand  that,  and  be  able  to  get  the  deliv-
ered horsepower from that engine so that you could maintain elec-
trical output is what the quest is all about. 

Senator  KERRY.  But,  prototype-wise,  the  basics  work,  the  key 

now is to take it to scale. 

Mr.  RENCHECK.  For  the  conventional  combined  cycle,  that’s  cor-

rect. For the hydrogen turbine—it’s still in the laboratory. 

Senator KERRY. What—sorry. 
Mr.  WILSON.  Siemens  is  actually  heavily  involved,  in  the  DOE 
programs  for  development  of  hydrogen  fuel  combustion.  And  your 
point  is  well-taken  in  terms  of,  it’s  a  different  combustion  phe-
nomena,  it’s  a  much  hotter  flame,  and  thus  a,  higher  performance 
standard is required of the gas turbine. So, we’re working in order 
to  make  the  turbine  parts  more  robust,  to  be  able  to  maintain  the 
turbine and maintain the cooling technology, so they don’t degrade 
quickly. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

58 

So, the hydrogen turbine, the next step in advancement, in terms 
of  gas  turbine  technologies.  Gas  turbines  originally  operated  very 
very inefficiently and at very low temperature. They’re now very ef-
ficient, very high temperature with methane-type gasses. The next 
step in turbine technology is the hydrogen capable gas turbine and 
Siemens  is  heavily  involved  in  the  development  of  this  technology. 
Senator KERRY. And, is that the key to the carbon capture itself? 
Mr. WILSON. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  Now,  what  kind  of  a  threat  is  thermal  solar? 

Solar thermal? 

Mr. WILSON. Threat, it’s actually a very promising technology. 
Senator  KERRY.  But  if  you  can  do  solar  thermal,  and  drive  a 
steam  turbine  as  a  consequence  of  that  and  produce  electricity, 
what does that say to the coal industry in the long-term? 

Mr.  WILSON.  Well,—we  actually  are  suppliers  of  steam  turbines 
for  virtually  almost  all  of  the  solar-thermal  plants  in  the  world. 
Siemens  has  a  steam  turbine  that  actually  is  well-suited  for  solar 
industry application. 

The  challenge  is,  it’s  a  fraction  of  a  percent  of  the  contribution 
of  thermal  electricity  to  the  overall  electrical  demand.  The  scale  of 
these  projects  is  relatively  small.  These  are  all  multi-megawatt 
plants,  compared  to  the  utility-scale  project,  which  is  500,  1,000, 
2,500 megawatts. 

Senator KERRY. Yes, but isn’t that, because they’re new and they 

are sort of coming online, can’t they be taken to scale? 

Mr. DENIS. Mr. Chairman, if I may—— 
Senator KERRY. Yes. 
Mr.  DENIS.—next  month,  we  will  put  in  El  Dorado  Valley,  just 
south  of  Las  Vegas,  into  service,  the  largest  solar  thermal  facility 
built  in  the  United  States  in  the  last  15  years.  It’s  a  64  megawatt 
facility, using the sun, the strong sun that we have in southern Ne-
vada,  to  generate  the  64  megawatts  of  electricity.  The—as  you 
come into Las Vegas, if you land, you will look to one side—— 

Senator KERRY. Well, you hope you land. 
Mr. DENIS.—you will see half a square mile covered with mirrors. 
Senator KERRY. Yes, I’ve seen that. 
Mr.  DENIS.  That  will  generate  the  64  megawatts.  We’re  very  ex-
cited about this. There are similar facilities that exist in California 
that  were  built  in  the  1980s,  late  1980s,  but  this  one  is  the  first 
one  built  in  the  last  15  years.  And  we’re  very  excited  about  that, 
and it will provide—— 

Senator KERRY. Who built it? 
Mr. DENIS. The company that started—it has changed hands sev-
eral  times,  it  was  initially  Duke  Solar,  then  they  sold  it  to  a  com-
pany  called  Solargenics,  which  is  now  the  majority  of,  the 
Solargenics is owned by a Spanish company called Axiona. 

Senator KERRY. Very interesting. 
Mr. DENIS. But it is a promising technology for the deserts of the 

Southwest. 

Senator  KERRY.  What  other,  besides  the  IGCC  and  this  current 
concept,  the  hydrogen  separation,  are  there  other  possibilities  for 
clean coal? 

Mr. WILSON. Clearly, there are. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

59 

Dr.  MCRAE.  There’s  actually  quite  a  broad  spectrum  of  possibili-
ties.  One,  for  example,  is  to—instead  of  using  air,  you  use  oxygen 
to  burn  the  fuel,  and  if  you  use  oxygen  to  burn  the  fuel,  then  the 
primary combustion products are just water and CO2, and that sep-
aration  problem  is  much,  much  easier  than  it  is  with  the  conven-
tional  technologies.  The  downside  is,  that  you  actually  then  have 
to supply the oxygen. 

But,  what’s  interesting  is  that  there  has  been  a  very  slow  and 
measurable  downward  trend  in  the  price  of  oxygen.  So,  oxy-firing 
is  a  system  that  I  think  is  a  very  interesting  alternative  to  IGCC. 
It  also  is  an  interesting  possibility  for  retrofitting.  So,  that’s  one 
technology. 

Senator  KERRY.  How  many  viable,  how  many  different  tech-

nologies, are being seriously explored at this point? 

Dr.  MCRAE.  In  our  Coal  Study  we  did  an  initial  sieving,  and  we 
had  about,  I  think  10  or  20  of  them,  and  then  we  brought  them 
down to four, which are the ones—— 

Senator KERRY. Right. 
Dr. MCRAE.—which we think could be brought to bear very, very 

quickly. 

Senator  KERRY.  We’re  going  to  be  doing  an  incentive  bill,  in  the 
Finance Committee, sometime in June. As we think about those in-
centives,  should  we  be  narrowing  it  down  to  the  four?  Or  should 
we  frame  it  in  a  way  that  allows  people  to  make  their  own  choice 
within the 20, let’s say, or more. 

Dr. MCRAE. My sense is that you need to engage the community 
with  lots  of  different  ideas  about  how  to  deal  with  this  problem.  I 
think the history of sort of mandating technology has not been very 
good.  If  you  open  it  up  to  the  marketplace  and  provide  the  appro-
priate incentives to deliver, then I think, in fact, you’ll get very dif-
ferent  and  very  innovative  ways  of  dealing  with  the  technology. 
And  there’s  enough  out  there  to  suggest  to  me  that  there  are  real 
possibilities, and real alternatives to IGCC. 

We can use IGCC now, there are some problems with the hydro-
gen  turbines,  and  there  are  also  some  capture  issues,  but  I  think 
they’re  relatively  small  time-scale  problems  to  solve,  compared  to 
bringing some of these other technologies. But they are there. 

And I think just to build on a point that Mr. Denis made is that, 
what  we  need  is  a  portfolio  of  approaches,  so  that  we’re  bringing 
on technologies that are evolving over time. And, more importantly, 
that  we  put  in  place  mechanisms  to  learn  from  these  technologies. 
One  of  the,  the  big  problems  that  we  had  in  carrying  out  the 
Coal  Study,  is  that  it’s  very  difficult  to  extract  the  lessons  learned 
from  some  of  these  demonstration  projects.  And,  one  of  the  things 
that I would argue, that if we do open this process up, that, in fact, 
we  pay  attention  to  how  we  can  more  efficiently  learn  about  these 
technologies. 

Mr.  Chaisson  mentioned  about  some  of  these  gasifiers—it’s  very 
difficult  to  get  your  hands  on  what  the  chemistry  that  is  going  on 
inside those, what really is new and different. And my sense is that 
this, this kind of information—— 

Senator KERRY. Why is it so difficult to get your hands on—? 
Dr.  MCRAE.  I  think,  in  part,  because  it’s,  the  way  it’s  viewed 

commercially, you know, they view it as a—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

60 

Senator KERRY. You mean, because it’s proprietary. 
Dr. MCRAE.—proprietary, yes. 
Senator KERRY. So, people hold it close to the vest. 
Dr.  MCRAE.  But,  I  think  there  are  things  after  the  technologies 
being tried, if you’re going to provide large amounts of government 
support  to  invest  in  these  technologies,  that  you  should,  in  fact, 
have the ability to—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Guarantee  that  there  is  some  sort  of  review  ca-

pacity for methodology and so forth? 

Mr. DENIS. Mr. Chairman, I—— 
Senator  KERRY.  Well,  that  makes  sense,  yes,  Mr.  Rencheck?  I’m 

sorry, who—? 

Mr.  DENIS.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  hope  that  in  that  June  package  of 
incentives that you were talking about crafting, that you don’t for-
get  the  incentives  for  renewables.  We  believe  that  the  investment 
tax  credit  and  the  production  tax  credit,  the  extension  of  those  for 
at least 8 years is important to make sure that we have continuity 
in the program. 

Senator KERRY. Those will be, absolutely. 
Mr. DENIS. Also the, there’s a disallowance, utilities cannot avail 
themselves of those investment tax credits presently, and the elec-
tric  utility  industry  can  be  a  key  catalyst  in  making  sure  that  we 
bring  this  country,  and  that  we,  in  fact,  bring  a  lot  more  renew-
ables,  which  may  do  away  with  a  lot  of  coal  plants,  may  do  away 
with a lot of gas plants. 

Senator KERRY. Good advice. 
Mr. DENIS. Thank you. 
Senator KERRY. And we will do that. 
Mr. Rencheck, then Mr. Chaisson. 
Mr.  RENCHECK.  We  are  working  with  Babcock  &  Wilcox  to  pilot 
an oxy-coal plant in Barberton, Ohio. It will be a 10 megawatt elec-
tric  demonstration  plant,  or  scale  plant,  and  from  that,  we’ll  use 
that to study and learn, so that we can scale it up to a commercial- 
size plant. 

As  we  talk  about  funding,  it  is,  it  was  imperative  that  we  were 
able to fund demonstration plants. It takes a lot to get it from the 
drawing  board  to  a  commercial  scale  that  we’re  talking  about  that 
can  be  economically  applied  to  the  grid,  and  hold  down  electric 
rates. 

Senator KERRY. Understood, absolutely. I can see that. 
Mr. Chaisson? 
Mr.  CHAISSON.  Just  two  points,  Senator.  One  is,  we  would  cer-
tainly  support  having  a  very  broad  approach  to  incentives,  so  that 
any potentially viable technology gets a shot at the incentive fund-
ing.  But,  I  would  point  out  that  our  organization’s  perspective  is 
much  broader  than  CO2,  and  while  we  agree  that  there  are  a  lot 
of  promising  options  for,  for  capturing  CO2 from  coal  to  electricity, 
the  processes,  the  other  environmental  aspects  of  those  processes 
may vary significantly. 

And, at the moment, one reason why we are primarily only sup-
portive  of  coal  gasification,  is  because  of  all  of  the  other  environ-
mental  aspects.  I  think  our  view  is  that,  in  the  long  run,  for  coal 
to  be  sustainable,  it  must  deal  with  CO2,  but  it  ultimately  has  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

61 

deal with all of the other environmental aspects. And those should 
not be forgotten. 

Senator KERRY. I couldn’t agree more. Obviously, as we go down 
the road here, the marketplace is going to decide some of this, but 
probably some public policy needs to look at, the downstream water 
use, land use, and overall cost impacts. Because, if you look at liq-
uefied coal, for instance, I don’t know if anybody here is advocating 
it but, there’s more and more evidence that that is just a huge mis-
take.  I  know  there’s  some  momentum  here,  by  some,  to  sort  of 
move in that direction, but it’s more energy exploitative in the end, 
more costly, and threatens an even greater degree of CO2. 

I  think  we  have  to  think  in  the,  again,  the  larger  piece  here,  of 

the consequences. 

Is  there  anything  with  respect  to  the  clean  coal  piece  that  we 
should  know,  that  you  haven’t  had  a  chance  to  share  with  us  as 
we think about this? Yes. 

Mr.  CHAISSON.  I’d  just  make  one  final  comment.  I  think  we  see 
underground  coal  gasification  as  an  extremely  promising  tech-
nology, Lawrence Livermore lab is doing a lot of work in that area, 
it’s  really  not  on  the  radar,  except,  perhaps  the  Governor  of  Wyo-
ming,  who  you  might  want  to  have  come  in  and  talk  about  that— 
but  that  technology,  if  it  proves  out  anything  like  its  promise  ap-
pears, it may be a very cost-effective way to use coal, with full cap-
ture  of  carbon,  and  at  the  same  time,  to  really  minimize  most  of 
the adverse impacts of using coal. And it’s, it’s just not in the stud-
ies,  it’s  not  kind  of,  on  the  radar,  but  there’s  actually  a  surprising 
amount  of  commercial  activity  moving  forward  in  North  America. 
Senator KERRY. Well, that’s terrific, thank you for calling that to 
our  attention,  and  we  will  dig  into  it,  get  a  handle  on  it,  take  a 
look at it, and understand it better. 

Yes, Mr. Wilson? 
Mr.  WILSON.  I  just  wanted  to  make  one  last  point  in  terms  of, 
we’re looking at a lot of promising technologies for the next genera-
tion. We want to make sure that we address the fact that we have 
a very large fleet out there now. Whatever options you put in place 
need  to  also  address  the  existing  fleet,  and  essentially  incentivize 
industry to address that existing fleet at the same time you invest 
in  new  projects.  You’ve  got  to  level  the  playing  field,  and  not  nec-
essarily grandfather everything out there. 

Senator  KERRY.  I  couldn’t  agree  more.  I’m  very  opposed,  person-
ally, to a lot of grandfathering, which is why I got involved in TXU, 
and I think we have a serious issue there, and obviously we’ve got 
a  fight  here  on  the  new  source  performance  standards  issued  over 
the  last  few  years  which  I  think  was  just  a  terrible  mistake,  and 
will be one of those big contributions to the problem we have. 

Yes, Dr. McRae? 
Dr.  MCRAE.  Just  one  comment  I  would  make,  this  morning  was 
spoken  mostly  about  what’s  going  on  in  the  United  States,  but  we 
shouldn’t lose sight of the fact that there’s an enormous amount of 
activity going on in Europe, and in China and I think there’s a cru-
cial need to figure out how to—— 

Senator KERRY. Are we sharing any of that? 
Mr.  WILSON.  I  work  in  a  global  organization,  and  everything  we 

do is basically on a global basis. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

62 

Dr. MCRAE. But, my general sense is, that there is sharing, indi-
vidually,  amongst  companies,  but  there  is  an  opportunity  to  learn 
a  lot  from  some  of  the  technology  demonstrations  that  other—that 
are  being  done  in  other  parts  of  the  world.  This  meeting  that  we 
had  on  Monday  about  sequestration,  I  think,  just  getting  all  of 
these countries together to talk about how to do it—— 

Senator KERRY. Who brought them together? 
Dr. MCRAE. This was MIT and Chamboucher, excuse me. 
Senator  KERRY.  That’s  a  very  good  thought.  We  need  to  think 
about  how  to  augment  the  global  effort.  Previously,  if  I  may  say, 
when  Senator  Worth  was  serving  as  the  Policy  Director  at  the 
State  Department,  that  position  was  essentially  created  to  em-
power  us  to  be  engaged  in  these  kind  of  talks.  Obviously,  for  the 
last  few  years,  given  the  Administration’s  attitude  about  Kyoto, 
there has been zero exchange in that regard. I think there’s a very, 
you know, there’s a huge pent-up demand for us to get involved in 
that kind of a dialogue, and I think we will, very shortly. Yes? 

Mr. RENCHECK. We sponsored an Asian-Pacific partnership meet-
ing,  where  we  had  members  from  India  and  China  attend  in  very 
large numbers. It went over quite well, in discussions of energy ef-
ficiency, and also new generations of combustion and IGCC plants. 
So that, that sharing of technology is starting to occur. 

There was recently a sponsored meeting in Japan that also went 

along those lines. 

Senator KERRY. I can’t thank you enough. I think it’s been a very 
helpful,  very  interesting  exchange,  and  we’re  all  learning  up  here, 
trying to get up to speed. 

I don’t think there’s any disagreement about the urgency, and it’s 
interesting to hear you all accept that, readily accept the challenge, 
and  understand  that  if  you  had  greater  resources,  you  believe  you 
could  move  this  thing  an  awful  lot  faster.  I  have  complete  con-
fidence in that, incidentally. 

Again, referencing back to the Clean Air Act experience, and the 
Clean  Water  Act  experience  of  the  1970s,  there  is  no  doubt  in  my 
mind  that  once  we  get  a  standard  in  place,  create  a  market,  get 
this  moving,  American  ingenuity—global  ingenuity—but  American 
ingenuity  will  contribute  significantly,  and  we  can  get  this  done. 
But,  we’ve  got  to  treat  it  as  the  emergency  and  urgent  effort  that 
it is. 

Thank you for contributing to that dialogue and we will certainly 

follow up with you. 

I’m  going  to  leave  the  record  open  for  2  weeks  in  the  event  that 
any  colleagues  want  to  submit  any  questions  in  writing,  and  the 
full text of all of your testimonies will be placed in the record. 

Thank you very much, we stand adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:54 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  12:54 Feb 14, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\78880.TXT JACKIE

